Thanks for the link, but I'm not satisfied. The scientist in that article also just made the claim without citing any studies. I suspect this has reached the level of being an urban legend. The wikipedia article http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sex_and_intelligence states that while there is consensus about men's IQ varying more, there is no consensus when it comes to average IQ. EDIT: Fixed formating and a typo
Even today some of monty pythons sketches are pretty daring.  I imagine that there would be plenty of people today that would be put out by the first sketch 'Hitler in England' or by 'The Dirty Vicar'
Your link isn't talking about the same thing that bhauth mentioned. bhauth is referencing studies of identical twins raised separately -- this is a very good way of separating out "nurture" from "nature." Your link references a study debunking some sort of "twin study" I've never heard about -- looking at the correlation between fraternal twins and identical twins, raised together. I can certainly see where that sort of twin study is going, but sounds much more suspect to me.
&gt; Iceland was No. Interesting how the article is chopped off there (after all, it's a period that's supposed to end a sentence :)
subversion is not a backup.
The yuan is pegged to the dollar. The vast majority of our imports come from China. A falling dollar is a falling yuan - not inflationary. As for the $1T China is holding, you need a sense of perspective. The USD GDP is about $12T - therefore the equivalent ratio is if you make $35,000 a year and owe someone $3,000. Its nowhere near enough to cause the US to go into a "death spiral"   
most homeless are people out of prison or mental hospitals with nowhere to go. and a lot of them are psychologically unable to live in one place for any significant amount of time. so thanks to people like you who think "why the hell can't everyone be as functional and well-adjusted as me", the homeless get beaten mercilessly every day, not to mention stupid laws like this get passed.
I like his use of the term "irrational A players." I've been thinking about this lately. How irrational does an A player have to get before they are no longer an A player? I know people that have much higher IQs and GPAs than me but make decisions which to me seem irrational.  For example, my GF has (I think) a 3.9 GPA and she wants to go to law school even though she doesn't want to be a lawyer. I have another friend even smarter who recently seems to have started buying expensive things only because they're expensive. Theoretically they should both end up with way better jobs than me. This is very confusing to me.
yuk.
Do you know what happens when you spray an aerosol upside down?! ;)
So I guess us men can't pass on intelligence?
There's no hunger in America... just food insecurity.
their life entials making "art" your life entials reading and posting about his life hmmmmmmm
Here's the scenario he's referencing: Identical twins are born. They have the same DNA (genetics). However, at birth, for whatever reason, the mother and father decide not to raise both of them and either keep one or put them up for adoption. The two twins are then raised by separate families (society). The result he's implying exists (I don't know if it does, but I wouldn't be surprised), is that their is a positive correlation between a twin's intelligence with his sibling. If there were no genetics involved in the situation, since the two were raised separately, you would expect their IQ scores to be independent.
we should solve the causes first.
I've never shoplifted anything. I've never been detained or hassled by a store for shoplifiting. I don't mind showing a receipt to a dude when I walk out of a store like Best Buy that has lots of expensive, easily concealable items to protect. I've had to go through this painful, 10-second receipt-showing procedure maybe 10 times in my life, tops. That's how things work in a communal society where people have to get along with each other ... not everything has to be a libertarian axe to grind. Maybe if I'd been seriously hassled many times, I would feel differently, but it's never happend, so I don't. Note to cranky libertarians who insist on exercising this right to not show a receipt: You are being a pain in the ass. And a store is a private business. So if everyone starts exercising this right, Best Buy will just have a checkbox contract we'll all have to initial on entering for the first time, to agree that we can be searched on the way out. And we'll all be worse off.
I couldn't agree more completely.  When you are unable to restrain an 11 year old without resorting to potentially lethal force, what business do you have being an officer of the law? Why don't the cops do what they did before the taser?  A crack with a nightstick or a swift punch to a pressure point seems to be a safer and more humane way of bringing a subject under control, rather than running thousands of volts of electricity through the body of an 11 year old CHILD.
cool concept, wiki for real estate, re folks are contributing,   seems that it is just launched
So you're arguing the affect is equal between the two? I honestly don't see the false dichotomy you're indicating exists. If the argument were "IQ is genetic" vs. "IQ comes from environment", then you could say *that's* a false dichotomy and it's a mix. But I think almost everyone believes it's a mix, so where's the fallacy? This article simply says that the genetic *component* of IQ favors men over women.
You're both wrong about politeness.  There are armed polite societies (American South) and armed impolite societies (Mogadishu, Israel), disarmed polite societies (Japan) and disarmed impolite societies (New York, much of the Middle East).   Perhaps all other things equal adding weapons makes people more polite.  But other factors are plainly bigger.
I fail to see the "amazing" bit here. Your visual systems are smart enough to notice that, overall, you're looking through a transparent blue or a transparent yellow. It then compensates color perception based on these filters, giving you a sense of what the true color would be if the semi-transparent filter were removed. Sure the color values are the same (or close) when you use something to the effect of Photoshop's eye-dropper to compare composite color values, but you have to understand that your visual system is taking into account the surrounding screen of solid color (same can be said for shadows). Your brain calculates based on surroundings, and gives your conscious a close approximation of the color's value based on other color values (screens, shadows, et al.). While this is a great example of that, I might disagree with the amazing part of the title.
Why change a good thing.
Yes! Only 18 more months until I get to have sex!
As fucked up as our justice system is in regards to liability issues, I highly doubt a cop would ever be put on a sex offender register for breaking up a fight between minors in the line of duty.
Here is the transcript:  http://www.americanatheist.org/win98-99/T2/silverman.html &gt;Sometime around my early thirties I stumbled upon evolutionary biology, particularly in the form of Richard Dawkins’s books The Selfish Gene and then The Blind Watchmaker and suddenly (on, I think the second reading of The Selfish Gene) it all fell into place. It was a concept of such stunning simplicity, but it gave rise, naturally, to all of the infinite and baffling complexity of life. The awe it inspired in me made the awe that people talk about in respect of religious experience seem, frankly, silly beside it. I'd take the awe of understanding over the awe of ignorance any day. Ah, so Dawkins had a hand in it...
&gt;since Muslim minorities are free to practise their faith in historically Christian countries, the Western world should expect Muslim countries to show more respect for the rights of local Christians (and, indeed, Jews).
No, it is a black eye for proprietary standards. If Adobe didn't forbid developpers from using the specifications to write flash players, we would have plenty to choose from. Hopefully SVG will fix that. 
It seems right to me.
Putting Loud Mouth Rilley in his Place!
Agreed. The only remarkable accomplishments of these people seems to be their ability to take IQ tests.
&gt; Unless you have evidence of some well-armed   &gt; society with less violent crime than... pretty much   &gt; anyplace in northern or western Europe, Try Switzerland.  And you can buy guns in most other countries in northern and western Europe anyway.  Maybe the northern and western Europe thing is a clue...
God The possibility of intelligent design is the most convincing reason I know of to at least not think questions about God's existence to be pointless.  It seems strange that we have no problem assuming intelligent design if we think something could have been made by a human, but then throw intelligent design as an option out the window when it comes to things that could not have been made by a human.  This approach just begs the question about naturalism.   However, I would accept methodological naturalism if intelligent design was either prima facie incapable of providing useful knowledge, or was very unlikely to.  Yet, this is blatantly wrong.  If we did not use the assumption of intelligent design in our everyday lives then society would completely fall apart.  So, if it can provide useful information in everyday life, just as looking for naturalistic explanations for everyday events does, then I see no reason why this can't be true on a greater scale.   In fact, it could be more useful than naturalism.  For example, see this excellent article explaining the intelligent design underpinnings of the "Wealth of Nations."  http://www.acton.org/publicat/m_and_m/new/article.php?article=8  I am not especially well read in economics.  However, from what I understand, "Wealth of Nations" is the ideological basis for our modern capitalistic system that seems to work much better than more recent secular systems, such as communism.  If you take a brief look at the very long article, you'll notice a striking difference between the assumptions Smith makes about human nature and those Marx makes, and that Smith's assumptions are firmly rooted in the assumption of intelligent design whereas Marx assumes there are only mechanical causes at work in nature.  --------  Morality Morality is essentially rational self interest.  Thus, it takes into account both avoiding what is bad and getting what is good.  However, bad and good change depending on whether you believe people have eternal souls or are just another type of animal.  Believing people have souls affects morality in two ways.  First, and most importantly, the extent to which you truly believe this impacts how inherently valuable you think people really are.  Second, if these souls are created, then their creator will punish those who abuse the souls. However, morality that is merely a human construct and is contrary to people's inherent value deserves to be broken.  Neither you nor I should ever let anyone rule over us for their own benefit.
Exactly.  This is the problem I have with female cops - they just simply don't have the physical strength that a male has.  Plain and simple physical differences...no sexism.
Apple worked harder, thank God, during those years. I'm glad I stayed away from early Windows and all its funky MSDOS.SYS, CONFIG.SYS memory reservation games. Networking on early MSDOS and early Windows (before WfW days) was a true nightmare too. Microsoft only really applied the pressure when they released Win 95. The company became an evil empire after that with all this IP wrangling, competition FUD, really bad interface defaults guessing (MS Paperclip, anyone?), product bundling, funky EULAs from hell, forced upgrades, and the Embrace, Extend, Extinguish strategies. And then lying and committing perjury in court about how they fought their competition -- that didn't help their cause. You know, at one time, Microsoft could have saved face and played nice with GNU and FLOSS, and everyone could have gotten along rather nicely, but now the trust has been so destroyed that pursuing this would be a lost cause. Innovation is not pursued in an environment where there is no freedom of choice. I really have to laugh when I see these commercials where people are encouraged to dream up ideas and use Microsoft tools to get them there. That's a laugh so hard my sides split. Joel on Software also had an interesting thing to say about Microsoft APIs the other day that I completely agree with. I think he said that he often finds no compelling reason to upgrade his company's Microsoft development environment. Microsoft keeps renaming their APIs over the same thing, and with very few new features added to make it worth anyone's while. There's far more innovation developing on the Linux platform, which is one reason why I switched to it. Another great big thing is that it got so danged expensive to develop on the Microsoft OS. In order to remain competitive in the MS developer market, you had to purchase MSDN Universal every year and get in all the beta programs, and kiss your spouse and children goodbye while you holed up in a room trying to learn everything all the time. You had to purchase several workstations that you could format and reinstall alpha and beta MS stuff on all the time. You get so sick of installing stuff, come up with an unstable OS, and all the reboots. Thank goodness I switched to Linux -- I think I would have lost my mind if I had had to pursue this stuff much more than I did past 2000. 
Bottom line. Adobe should look closer how to distribute software on Linux! Hint: One binary to serve them all isn't the solution.
But it's on a per-cell basis in the embryo, leading to various groups of cells having various X chromosomes active. This is why, for instance, only female cats can be calicos.
I had no idea that Pythonic cults could trace their roots to prehistoric times!  ;)
Genius is more commonly found with mental *dis*abilities such as bipolar disorder. Einstein was thought to have an IQ of 140, but he was known to have an attention span of *days*. I have an IQ of 135, I have an attention span of (Ironically I got distracted at this point in writing) between minutes and up to a few hours depending on the demands. IQ is irrelevant for testing genius, because there's several kinds of genius. You can be a genius musician, and be completely illiterate except in music. You could be like Tesla, he invented tons of stuff we take for granted like Alternating Current and should be hailed as a genius for it, but lets face it the man was between retarded and a lunatic.
Right, my defense is bullshit. It just happens to be pulled from the references **you** provided. You dumb fuck. Page 2 of your first reference. &gt; Although most countries collect information on the number of crimes recorded or reported by the police, absolute comparisons of crime levels are often misleading. Recorded crime levels will be affected by many factors including: &gt; a) Different legal and criminal justice systems;  &gt; b) Rates at which crimes are reported to the police and recorded by them;  ... And if you're referring to (trying to deny) the fact that American police have been heavily militarizing and increasingly killing people in "no knock" raids, don't even bother. FURTHERMORE, your recent (better) sources totally contradict your earlier (weaker) sources. &gt; Homicide &gt;Since the definition of homicide is similar in most countries, absolute comparisons of rates are possible. For the period 1999 to 2001, the average rate (the number of homicides per 100,000 population) was 1.6 in the EU with the highest rates in Finland (2.9), Northern Ireland (2.7) and Scotland (2.2). For other countries, the highest rates were found in Russia (22.1), Estonia (10.6), Lithuania (10.6) and the USA (5.6). Which makes a lot more sense than your "murder and manslaughter figures". Especially if manslaughter includes vehicular manslaughter which could easily be included in one country (Brussels) but not in another (USA). And the homicide rates make most sense because the countries that have high rates of internal conflict and poverty, or clinical depression in the case of Finland, are the ones with the highest rates of homicide. This makes sense. Your "murder and manslaughter" figures on the other hand are total nonsense. Furthermore, &gt; In the EU capital cities, the average number of homicides over the period 1999 to 2001 was 2.3 per 100,000 population with the highest rates in Belfast (5.6), Amsterdam (3.1), Vienna (2.8), Stockholm (2.8), London (2.6) and Berlin (2.3). There were higher rates in some American cities: Washington DC (42.9), New York NY (8.7) and San Francisco CA (8.1). In other words, the usual story from the sources YOU provided. You're an idiot you know that? You know that: 1. poverty correlates strongly with crime  2. the USA has a lot more poverty than Europe  3. Americans lie about crime stats to make themselves look good But when you put 2 and 2 together, you got 73!
HAHA, men are smarter then women. I'm a man. HAHA
If anything, I think women are more interested in proving themselves superior to men.
In the words of someone for more articulate than myself : "The rapid, sweeping deterioration of values is characterized by a preoccupation—even an obsession—with the procreative act. Abstinence before marriage and fidelity within it are openly scoffed at—marriage and parenthood ridiculed as burdensome, unnecessary. Modesty, a virtue of a refined individual or society, is all but gone ...  No idea has been more destructive of happiness, no philosophy has produced more sorrow, more heartbreak and mischief; no idea has done more to destroy the family than the idea that we are not the offspring of God, only advanced animals, compelled to yield to every carnal urge."
Me too. rdiff-backup makes this easy.
Can you blame him for being angry?  After all these years of hard work, some jackass has the balls to say that they only care about Windows. I mean really, how was SBCL to know that 95% of the world's computers don't run on UNIX? And it gets worse. This lowely Windows programmer thinks he is too good for a "unsupported, half-complete port". So what if any 1.0 libraries written on Linux have a good chance of not working on Win32? I bet you he is going to start complaining about DECODE-UNIVERSAL-TIME not working on dates before 1970. I bet he didn't even bother reading the release notes that say it is only the timezone data that is unreliable.  
um, no. Data on dual engineering instances of autism vs non dual engineering families. I would bet there's not enough cases for such a study, whereas the heavy metal theory has at least some data behind it. Also Page 2 link broken.
Ah, and you don't think the difficult Linux sound and video API drivers are partially to blame? I don't know -- I write software on the web level, not this low level. I don't know how tough it is in this realm. From the non-sound viewpoint, I think SVG will change it, but so far Microsoft doesn't have a clue about helping promote that, and I'm sure they don't want to do this. Every try and draw a piechart really easily using nothing but web standards, and making it work on IE and Firefox? It's like near impossible without using the extreme hard work (and several lines of Javascript or whatever), to make it all happen in CSS, DHTML, and Javascript. By SVG becoming a standard supported by IE, and being consistent with how Firefox supports it -- that would make a world of difference here. Adobe -- I wish someone would flip on their "cool mode" switch. They have so much potential to not become another Microsoft and to join the GNU / FLOSS community. Heck, if they would try to be everything that Microsoft is not (except make cash), that would be a good start. 
in other words - cipla is the piratebay of the medicine world - and again here also it very well justified in sticking to the 'big' corporations.
yes.  and even if i had seen another example of this before, i would still find it cool.
This is a myth. They and many other OPEC members have capacity beyond what the US media represents them to have. Watch and see. At this point we are pretty much married to supporting the Shia, thanks to the brilliant Team Bush post war planners. This will force Saudi's hand. The op-ed linked above is simply the polite announcement before the storm. The future decline in the dollar is due to its use as the petro exchange currency of choice. Increase petro volume - Increase dollars available, decrease value of dollar. This is the underlying of why Cheney accused Rangel of not understanding how the economy worked.  You can go long on oil and the dollar if you want, but I'm short on both at this time.
We still manufacture quite a bit, $927.5 billion last year, which is more than china.  There might be some confusion between production and employment.   We have far fewer people in manufacturing than we did 20 years ago but our production capacity has been fairly stable.  Sure it hasn’t grown but we still produce an immense amount of stuff and only 9.2% of it is agricultural.  Most of our exports are capital goods (49.0%) which you don’t buy in a store so you don’t really see what American industry makes.  Capital goods are also going to be far more competitive as the dollar weakens.
hey everybody
I don't see how it's hilarious or incredibly offensive. A clever visual pun, no doubt but hardly worth anything more than a chuckle. If you have a deeper personal interest in the joke I could see it having a different value. e.g. if you're anti-Christian or just don't think they should take themselves so seriously it might be kind of a "haha take that" joke which may carry more humor to it I suppose. I just don't see how a clever pun could be the rolling on the floor type laughter I'm getting from some of these comments unless you have some baggage related to the issue itself.
Parkinson's is only recently common because people are now living well into their 70's.  Back in 1900, when the average person died at 50, Parkinson's was an extremely rare condition. 
Don't forget 'home of the brave' ... oh, wait, a trip to the airport reveals that that's not true either.
The first of the police cars, sometimes called the "bomb sweep," may drive a few minutes ahead of the motorcade to clear the way. A team responsible for detecting hazardous materials also rides near the front.
actually WTF was a police officer doing here in the first place?  if a *school teacher* cannot restrain and keep under control an eleven year old having a tantrum and/or involved in some kind of school yards scuffle s/he should not be in the profession in the first place.
This was not a response to the article. Rather, to joshdick's comment:  "I'd argue that intelligence is influenced by society much more than genetics"  And no, I'm certainly not saying it's equal. Rather, I'm saying the complex interactions between the two make it rather silly to talk about them as if they were in isolation. 
Huff! Huff! Wank! Wank!
It looks like the "compartment" detaches from the alarm and locks to the sender's wrist somehow (like half a pair of handcuffs) so they will be able to escape from the fire but (theoretically) will have to find a policeman or fireman to remove the "cuff". Otherwise, it's just silly ;)
Yeah that's what the article says at the Monthly, but that's not the reality and this is widely known outside the US. Watch and see. Meanwhile I'm shorting oil as per my last post.
Oh, the relevancy. Let's turn it around, shall we? How many cars **should** american tanks have crushed before september 11, 2001?
Hurray! Now we don't have to manually write all that rot13 code! This function is so useful that I think I'll go out right now and rot13 all my strings.
anecdotal evidence: near where i grew up there is a very large intel facility that is the main employer in the town.  there is actually a lot more cases of autism there, apparently because of all these intel engineers having kids.
Thanks Mr. Prager for making normal Christians look like fanatical lunatics.  Just makes me hate people even more than I did before.
Yeah, Germans would never let themselves be cowed into subverting their basic freedoms.  Not by religious nuts.  Not by partisan politics.  Not by short guys with funny mustaches.  Never ever I tell ya. P.S.:  Just playing with you :)
&gt;are true to a much more extensive degree in Iran You think completely unevidenced media biased letters are pretty good? You seem to act like its a given that people are more repressed in iran than in america. For those of us not so enlightened as to presume this, could you cite some examples? I trust ahmadinejad FAR FAR more than the american president bush. And I dont think the us could write a similar letter to iran. They said the entire country was part of the axis of evil and constantly accuse them of wanting to build a nuclear bomb.
Description of Richard Dawkins from the New Testament [Romans 1:21-23](http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=romans%201&amp;version=51) &gt;21 Yes, they knew God, but they wouldn’t worship him as God or even give him thanks. And they began to think up foolish ideas of what God was like. As a result, their minds became dark and confused. 22 Claiming to be wise, they instead became utter fools. 23 And instead of worshiping the glorious, ever-living God, they worshiped idols made to look like mere people and birds and animals and reptiles. Idols need not be physical constructs they can be ideas.
that's good to hear. I'm pretty impressed with SBCL. I downloaded 90 common lisp libraries I was interested and tried to generate a big image using CMUCL, SBCL, and CLISP. SBCL was the only one that compiled every single library without a hinch.
She should be strong enough to restrain an eleven year old though.
Since when is risk aversion and focusing on the end product bad thing?  Isn't the goal to deliever end products with as litle risk of failure as possible?
&gt;Results of the trials and a final report from researchers are due on April 1, 2007  Says it all.
You misinterpreted his comment.
Err?  Shed Skin doesn't even remotely resemble Python, or anything like it. * It is entirely statically typed.  * No access to the standard library, or any other Python code.  * No iterators.  * No generators.  * No closures.  * No first-class functions/classes.  * No reflection (`getattr`, `setattr`, ...).  * No arbitrary-precision arithmetic.  * Single inheritance only.  * Singly-typed lists/tuples only.  * No varargs. In short, pretty much no Python features at all, other than what can be implemented by a syntactic wrapper around C++.
mozy
Though you shouldn't hit a kid with a nightstick either... The basic point is that the police officer (male OR female) should be strong enough to grab the kid and subdue him!  No need for a taser or anything else.  Grab him, secure him, cuff him, and situation is under control.
-&gt;
All this article does is prove that all theoretical science like the big bang and evolution is really just BS.
Try practicing what you preach BBB!
Where are all the python links?
I've hung out with a lot of programmers who tend to use XML for just about any data: configuration files, serialization, etc.  It's a matter of your experience with people whether his statement rings true or not.
Unless you're arguing that preliminary IQ tests favored women, then the adjustment would necessarily bias the tests in favor of them if there's any genetic component.
Question: Do these taser's have settings?  Perhaps the cop set it to the lowest setting thinking the child would stop attacking? Just a thought, not condoning the action in anyway whatsoever...
I think your pants would be more than fishy if that happened...
Could have something to do with the fact you can vote as often as you want.
The title starts with _Lazy_.
[House of Saud warns Exxon Mobil about the coming drop to their bottom line.](http://reddit.com/info/t4ss/comments) Some corporations just deserve to be punished. Exxon has gotten away with way too much for too long. The discouragement of "new energy investments" will be resolved by the coming oil glut.
For fun, I translated this into Haskell and added support for punctuation and digits :)  module Morse where   import Data.Map (Map,fromList,unions,findWithDefault)   import Data.List   import Data.Char   alphaCodes =     [".-","-...","-.-.","-..",".","..-.",   -- A-F     "--.","....","..",".---","-.-",".-..",    -- G-L     "--","-.","---",".--.","--.-",".-.","...",   -- M-S     "-","..-","...-",".--","-..-","-.--","--.."] -- T-Z   numberCodes = [".....","-....","--...","---..","----.",      "-----",".----","..---","...--","....-"]   morseMap = fromList (alpha ++ number ++ punc)    where alpha  = zip ['a'..'z'] . map longCode $ alphaCodes    number = zip ['0'..'9'] . map longCode $ numberCodes    punc   = [(' ', "   "),        ('.', longCode ".-.-.-"),        (',', longCode "--..--"),        ('?', longCode "..--..")]   longCode = concat . intersperse "-" . map dotDash    where dotDash '.' = "dot"    dotDash '-' = "dash"    dotDash _   = error "longCode: dotDash: invalid character"   morseChar k = findWithDefault "(invalid)" (toLower k) morseMap   morse = unwords . map morseChar   main = do    putStrLn "Text -&gt; Morse code\n"    putStrLn "Please enter your message then hit ENTER"    message &lt;- getLine    putStrLn (morse message)
Amazing... I just learned that people actually care where they are on others myspace pages.  I found that fascinating.  Who gives a shit if you are someones "#5" or whatever...
like jesus did?
Hi! I'm a Lisper. Allow me to add one data point to your collection of "Lispers". Your explanation of XML-hate is valid, but it's too high-level. If XML weren't a "Real World" standard, we'd have to come up with another excuse to hate it. Why? Because it's *ugly*. There's a *reason* we're Lispers, and it's because we like pure things.
Yes, totally agree. The template syntax is covoluted. Why goto all that trouble when can use some other language without the problems. Also it's been years since the language was standardized. It needs more frequent upgrades or it just faces oblivion.
Not always.  True, there many people who resist evolution because it's counter-intuitive that simple physical and biological principles could give rise to such complicated creatures, and so they believe that an all-powerful being must have been the necessary force.   Many people also resist free markets because it's counter-intuitive that simple psychological and economic laws of human action could give rise to such a complex and wealthy society as we have, and so they believe that powerful governments must have been the necessary force. But more often than not, the second group ridicules the first.
From the article: "Men are often quite original but deficient in what is technically demanded." It's true. This one time my buddy Ian filled a trash can with water, took a dump in it, and leaned it against our RA's door. We planned to have it flood his room with shit-water but the door opened outward, into the hall. He got written up, but the idea was a good one.
Wow, so much has changed... Paul Graham now posts under 10 psuedonyms instead of just one!
Well they could have saved likely hundreds of thousands of dollars by spending 5 minutes training a normal teacher how to use a tazer if they're going to allow that. I mean who needs a few years of police training in all the moves needed to restrain a violent person if you can just go tazer whoever the hell you want.
Of course, the &amp;amp;lt; is supposed to be &lt; but I'm not sure how to include a &lt; symbol inside code.
Wow good article!
&gt;  Females have less variability in everything - height, intelligence, hair color, body weight et cetera. In height, hair color and body weight there seems to be just as much variability in females as there is in males.  I'm not sure I'm buying it. Come to think of it, wasn't there a story a while back about how blond hair arose first in females in order for them to attract more males?
Yes the protocol is GPL'd.  I doubt they could sue and I expect that was always part of Bram Cohen's plan.
I was just wondering the same thing.  :)
Wow, writing non-free consumer-level software is complicated! Glad I don't have to do it.
I think the idea is that if you take a person and, say, double all of his dimensions, then you get an "equally formed" but larger person whose weight will be 8 times bigger, so Weight/Height^3 will remain constant.
I know you're giving anecdotes and not data, but even analytically, paper reading and tea buying habits seem like ill-conceived metrics of intellectual curiosity.
I found this link in a comment posted by bstadil in the other reddit topic on men's higher IQ (http://reddit.com/info/t48y/comments/ct5q3 ). It's fairly old, but I'd never seen it before and found it very interesting.
Oh, I'm certainly bearish on the dollar.  But I don't see oil going down much in the next several years. Actually, as far as reserves go, there's a lot of speculation that the Saudis have been overstating them.
Can't say I'm a huge fan of either the online boasting about IQs or the rack comment.
Python doesn't have closures either.
Looks like a good conversation-piece. What about bagels though ;o) The device that I wish would be redesigned is the ordinary electronic calculator. The basic model bought today is virtually the same as one bought in the late 70's - LCD has replaced LED, but that is about it. By now all calculators should have backspace, multiple-line displays and more clever save-abilities.
It is funny seeing knee-jerk reactions coming from both sides on this. Fox newsies defend their freedoms by telling Ahmadinejad they are ready for war. Reddites critisize the right wingers for being dumb arrogant americans. What ever happened to constructive criticism? The fox fans have a valid point.  Iran happens to be one of the most oppressive nations in the world.  Surprise, they are a muslim nation.  The fox fans are simply reacting to what they see as a hypocritical leader trying to get a rise out of the US.  It worked. But, the irony is that these are the same people that support the invasion and occupation of Iraq for no apparent benefit other than to show the world 'we mean business'.  I am sure there were some intelligent, well thought out responses to Ahmadinejad's letter that didn't try to pick a fight with their president. All the comments on Reddit so far critisize the fox responses as typical US ra-ra garbage.  Some of them are.  However, others actually have substance to them.  We are justified in our concern with Iran.  Please don't forget that.  Also don't forget that Fox has the final say about what kind of tripe goes up on their website.  Ahmadinejad was trying to get a rise out of the fox newsies just like Fox news was trying to get a rise out of you guys.  Keep your heads and foster some critical discussion.  Please.
So in your opinion, no programming language should ever, ever, have some simple demo programs written in it for beginners?
"Thanks Mr. Prager for making normal Christians look like fanatical lunatics. Just makes me hate people even more than I did before." You are aware that Dennis Prager is a Jew, aren't you?
Did it contain a Sony Battery, perchance?
Love the spelling eh? Another bad typing job!! You can smack me around for it in the replies. The funny this is I actually noticed it as I hit submit...
Risk tolerance is probably more of a factor in whether someone is looking to join a startup.  I guess the A players may have done the risk analysis and decided they're not much worse off that way, and much better off in other ways.
There are many elite universities in the United States for film editing, but the school that seems to be on the rise is Florida State University.
Well, I've come to expect the non-informed status of Reddit commentors.  The ignorance reflected in my downmodded comments above is one more example. Population overshoot is a very serious problem throughout the world.  Population reduction will soon be a *requirement* throughout the world, as finite resources run out.  Most of those alive today will see this, you're children certainly will. http://www.carryingcapacity.org/checkup_datasheet.html  http://www.energybulletin.net/4735.html  http://www.hoover.org/publications/uk/2933321.html  http://dieoff.org/page14.htm  http://www.findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_qa3861/is_200307/ai_n9295892  http://www.greatchange.org/ov-catton,malthus.html There are many, many more.  A good book to read is Jared Diamonds "Collapse", which shows how human civilizations throughout history have exceeded their local carrying capacities, again and again. Globalization (and other things) has meant that we can now do it faster, all over the planet.  These limits are being reached throughout the biosphere, with massive reductions in resources throughout the world.  This includes *renewable* resources, such as fisheries, fresh water, soils, forest, etc.   The bottom line is simple, the world's carrying capacity for human life (politely ignoring the rest of the biosphere for the moment) is being drastically reduced - population reduction will be absolutely necessary very soon. I well realize that this has nothing to do with the original article on this thread - but then neither did my comments about population reduction, which seems to strike Reddit commentators as being unaccurate.  The facts, are much different, however.  I would certainly support an educational campaign to reduce the population, both here in America and around the world.  I would certainly support this as a matter of *choice* too, instead of "forced conscription".  That this point was lost on the commentors reveals that people really *do not read*.
Lbh zvffcryyrq "Uheenl!"
see my recent comments above. Not only is it not BS, it will soon be necessary.
damn, bugbear is totally dominating that shit
It puzzles me why he didn't use Orkut's favicon for the O. I was trying to figure out what he could be trying to say with EN* before I read the rest of the word and filled in the blank properly.
He's apparently real...  on the first page of the article is his short bio and email address if you want to contact him.  I just hope there are more like him.
&gt; The vast majority of our imports come from China. Actually, not true, Canada at 16.9% is the number one country for imports, followed by China at 15%, Mexico at 10%, Japan at 8.2 and Germany at 5% according to the [CIA World Factbook](https://cia.gov/cia/publications/factbook/geos/us.html). &gt; As for the $1T China is holding, you need a sense of perspective. The currency exchange market is roughly $2T per day. If China could concievably account for half of the total market by themselves, they could make one hell of a big difference in the value of the dollar. I'm not saying they would and ramifications for their own economy would be serious but comparing the foreign debt held by China to the US GDP is not the only thing to consider. 
&gt; Python doesn't have closures either.  def slava_is_wrong(a):    return lambda n: a + n   add2 = slava_is_wrong(2)   add3 = slava_is_wrong(3)   add2(3) # returns 5   add3(3) # returns 6 You were saying?
interesting. the old one looks neater
Jumping out of the frying pan and into the fire!
Sorry dude, police brutality against a (very) minor is a much bigger deal than another wacked out kid killing people.
Because he used it for the O in "browser", and he didn't want to use the same icon more than once (except for the blanks). But Opera.com would have been a good choice.
404 Error, page is down.
I'm new to this kind of low level stuff with Linux when we start talking device layer drivers and file systems beyond smbfs, nfs, reiser, ext2/3, and sshfs. But if I understand ZFS properly, it permits you to extend a RAID-5 partition without having to reformat and restore data on the larger partition? If so, then that's cool. Much of our server hardware could use something like that. I'm not a big fan of software-based RAID and prefer hardware-based RAID, so I'd like to see a standard for something that permits extending RAID-5 partitions without having to reformat and restore. 
Very nice, cgibbard.  I prefer your .-, -... to my 01, 1000 array.  I was going to use .-, etc for the output but I thought the dot-dash looked nicer because the .s aren't in line with the -s.
Anyone who wants to examine the prison issue, should do some reading on *prison industries* too.  There are now billions of dollars being made by forced labor in America, with "prison wages" resembling sweat shops.  Some prisoners are "employed" to support the war in Iraq, for example, making military supplies.  Everything from clothing to license plates is now being manufactured by conscripted labor in this country.  Favored contracts are being provided to various states for these "industrial prisons" too, which is why you will **not** see prison populations go down, but go **up**.  It's a simple matter of economics, more slaves means more profits. It has nothing to do with "crime" at all. Also, victimless "crimes" are at the forefront of high prison populations (such as the war on drugs).
Windows is garbage for backups. Hundreds of files are auto-locked, making them unreadable/writeable whenever the system is on. The haphazard fs layout makes the location of imporant files very unpredictible. In other words, windows backup software will be able to guess much fewer defaults - you will most certainly find yourself having to do lots of configuration with a GUI. So, winblows is pretty much ruled out of this discussion.
In Haskell:  import Data.Char   rotate base ch = chr ((c - b - 13) `mod` 26 + b)    where c = ord ch    b = ord base   rotLetter ch    | isLower ch = rotate 'a' ch    | isUpper ch = rotate 'A' ch    | otherwise  = ch   rot13 = map rotLetter
I do not see much of a difference but then again I am not looking a a huge hi-def tv
What's with the funky font on this website? It's like the site was made in another character set. You often see this funky font problem when doing to Russian or Japanese sites that have been made with English versions. Perhaps the Java programmer screwed up the API and used the wrong character set data type for his variable? God I hate Java. 
Because adding chemicals is the cheapest possible way of killing microbes. Ozone and ultraviolet are more expensive. And reverse-osmosis is the most expensive of all. Furthermore, if the pipe network isn't being maintained then it will add its own contaminants to the water. Possibly even biological contaminants which would be why you'd add more chemicals.
Come on guys, keep downmodding! After all, this is what you've all been begging for and bitching about for a year now. It finally happens and you don't even care? Typical.
what is the point of this post and how does it relate to the previous post?
[Some images of the highway, via Google](http://images.google.com/images?svnum=100&amp;hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;imgc=color&amp;safe=images&amp;q=karakoram+highway+Indus%7CGilgit%7CHunza%7Csite%3Aflickr.com)
First, let me just say, YOU ARE A DICK. Second, it was not his store, it was owned by a huge corporation. Third, I would gladly help the police subdue even a violent shoplifter AS I HAVE DONE IN THE PAST. Fourth, if you fucking follow me into RadioShack and loudly accuse me of stealing, YOU ARE AN ASSHOLE. Fifth, I feel sorry for his children, their DNA might be second-rate. Sixth, you are still a dick. Seventh, you seem to feel I am not allowed to remove my gloves and put them in my coat! Perhaps I should seek out a store manager and ask his permission first?! Edit: Eighth, what the FUCK do you propose an innocent person do, submit to a search by every random asshole who doesn't know what he saw?
Actually Ford sells very well in the UK because they have a reputation of making cars that actually last. I just sold my car for £750 ($1500) 4th hand and we bought it for around £1150 (2nd hand) around five years and a few ten thousand miles ago, the reason it didn't end up near £200 like any other third hand car was because it was a Ford Fiesta (diesel) and for anyone who hasn't had one they're almost unbreakable. The worst that happened was a flat battery (and usual wear with age that the MOT checks for), because it's a diesel the thing was up and running after a minute. Incidentally it's quite fun pushing a car down a hill.
I am gobsmacked that this idiocy got 133 points in 13 hours.
Yeah, it's that virtue of modesty that forces people like you to make laws limiting the freedom of others. Somehow "virtue" is twisted to mean voting Republican, supporting all sorts of things (like torture!) that are immoral on their face, and cutting taxes for the rich while our country sinks in debt! This is "virtue", right? Because that's the rest of the story that isn't in your post. When the self-referentially "virtuous" start behaving in ways that are clear immoral and hypocritical, what right remains for them to force their own "virtue" down other people's throats? You and your cronies can waste my tax money, you can fight your war for Leo Strauss' ideal of a ruling class, you can control me with your ridiculous laws, but you CANNOT CONTROL MY MIND! And I- and many other people- can see clearly what hypocrisy is, and "moral" folks like you say that in one breath and in the next say that ten thousand more dead Iraqis is somehow better than a gad damn gay wedding.
it doesnt have 'four yorkshiremen'! :( thanks for posting it though.   
You obviously have not been paying attention to the prices of corn and soybeans lately...
What you seem to be describing is psychological consciousness. The problem with that is that psychological consciousness is *known* to be unnecessary for all of: * action  * thought  * learning  * memory and consciousness generally impedes these things. Consciousness is an entirely separate faculty.
A *school* **resource** officer had a taser? Since when did this start happening, anybody know? And that parent's comment, *“I know what it is and it doesn’t scare me – so long as it’s used properly it’s not serious.”* is revealing too. I don't have an opinion about the reported "facts", but it is disturbing that resource officers carry tasers, and parents are utterly ignorant of their dangers.
I wonder if this could be what caused the waters of the Mediterranean to break through the Bosphorus and start filling up the Black sea.  That also happened around 8000 years ago.
Darwinism, cause and effect, and even more. All-in-all a very educational day for that student. Probably learned more in those few seconds than the parents ever bothered to teach about respect for authority.   
Not worth my while.
Goose, meet gander.
edit, ok, amazon or similar would work.
Yes, and by that logic one can defer sex indefinitely. There is always another meeting or something else that "affects your future in a positive way". People in past generations didn't let that stand in their way.
Linux does have complex multimedia applications that you can compile about anywhere; MPlayer comes to mind. There are also abstraction layers such as SDL. If you are writing an open-source flash player, you can legally borrow from this huge code base. If you are writing a closed-source player like Adobe is, you have to rediscover everything, so it takes longer. Good point about SVG not covering audio. 
Sorry but this is retarded, would anyone fall for this?
What is far more disturbing is that the lack of effective parenting has created an environment where they feel a need to carry them. You are right about ignorant parents. It's ignorant parents that lead to children like this.
Yes, there is no BMI *myth*. BMI was meant to be used as a population statistic, non as a measure of individual fitness. For example, you look to see if people with a large BMI have a higher rate of heart dieases.  But, as you said, it has been shown that waist measurements are much more predictive than BMI anyway, so even the population-wide use of BMI is questionable. see http://www.nature.com/ijo/journal/v25/n5/abs/0801582a.html  http://docnews.diabetesjournals.org/cgi/content/short/3/11/6 I remember a study (that I can't find) that claimed that BMI's predictive value fell to zero when incorporated into a PCA analysis including waist size - in other words, almost all the information is in the waist size, and BMI is just along for the ride.
&gt; males get trained to do that, Really? Is there some Academy somewhere that I missed out on? I don't remember that being part of my curriculum.
No you can't. Although the option to vote is given again, additional votes do not change the vote count.
I keep hiding items on reddit. Sometimes they stay hidden. Often, they come back after refreshing the page. I'm not logging out and I'm not doing anything else besides reloading the front page. Am I missing something?
No, I'm saying it isn't worth posting on reddit. As a demo for beginners it is just fine.
Yeah, I was wondering why you were downmodded too. However, I don't think the concept of colonization is wrong.  I disagree that humans are *ready* for it though. We've yet to learn how to live properly on *this planet* before we fuck up the next one. I had a conversation with one of the principle *husbands* for the "Mission to Mars" project and voiced this very same concern.  I do not personally believe humans can achieve interstellar flight for several reasons, including energy and resources.  But if we were to take with us to the stars our present level of "human bias, prejudice, ignorance, and practices", we would probably, quite soon, kill ourselves out among the space rocks.  We're simply not ready for the stars on a evolutionary time scale.  Even now, our technology is light years ahead of our ability to live here, right now, with each other.
huh?  What do you mean?
Yes, educated. Preferably with a stout board. Of education!
I miss it
You are thinking phasers. Those can be set on stun.
I've been around kids that have been victims of physical and sexual abuse.  I once helped take care of a six year old CHILD that had given seven broken bones to a 35 year old ex-Marine before he was brought back under control.  Kids are completely capable of causing serious harm even to adults.
Dupe! ;)
because all of the extreme underperformers in the big companies scare the A players away. I know that after several seasonal jobs in medium sized companies, I'm not going anywhere near those again once I go full time. it's like showing up for your first day of the ninja-assassin syndicate just to find that all of your co-workers are fat, lazy cops.. 
Yeah, Kaplan is a consistent embarrassment to the LA Times. Her column comparing O.J. and Michael Richards? Please, sister.
Sometimes it makes sense to talk about averages, other times it doesn't. In the case of exercise for muscle mass gain and weight loss, what they don't tell you is that ALL of the benefits fall on a small fraction of the population. For some people, exercise works like a charm, for most others it doesn't work at all. I am assuming though that co-sleeping is something worth at least trying with every infant. Furthermore, I know you did it wrong just from your description. You say that "we moved our last daughter", both your and your partner, yes? That's a mistake. The mother should have moved with the daughter out of the family bed. This way she doesn't need to wake up completely to breastfeed your daughter, something she has to do anyways. You *are* breastfeeding her, yes? Because if you're not then you're trading your slight health problems from lack of sleep for MAJOR health problems for your daugher. That's not exactly compatible with being a good parent, is it? So assuming she's being breastfed then the mother has to wake up *anyways* and it's better for the mother to be near the child. This reasoning is airtight and blatantly obvious. If it's never occured to you, I'm blaming sleep deprivation.
Tribal living was arguably the "best model" for human civilization that has ever been devised.  Abandoning that method, we've exchanged for such things as "work", "employment", "wages", "taxes", heart disease, stress, cities, roads and all the other "convienences" of modern life, that have all come at a very high price in terms of resources, planetary destruction, pollution and long-term health effects. Some "advancements" have been beneficial, but many are not.  Most, if not all, are unsustainable and the end of civilization as we know it, is ringing louder and louder.
You're missing #2.5, "Pull the fucking kid away from the other kid." Duh!
I am interested in understanding why emacs cannot be used for editing root-editable config files. Do you suggest changing their permissions to allow them to be modifiable by *anyone*?   
Jews, Christians, whatever.  "Fanatical lunatic" is non-denominational.
I agree with all seven (edit: eight) points. coldwarrior, it doesn't matter how many statistics you present, what bobcat experienced was clearly crossing the line into inappropriate behavior by the store manager.
Your ignorance is appalling.  But I refuse to do you your work for you, what so many Reddit posters demand "Show Me"!! There is a vast body of evidence that civilization has not improved life and lifestyles at all, but you'd have to be willing to actually *read it* to begin to remotely understand the reasoning and facts behind it. That should be enough information for you to get off your butt and get going, but somehow, I suspect you're keep on enjoying the bottom end of the gene pool.
Well, yes.  It just happens to be a true April Fools joke. (Parrot is a real project, and it really is intended to run both Perl and Python - and hopefully Ruby - on a common virtual machine.)
How much does one need to think about "war = bad"?
It still raises the question about where we get "A players" and "B players" then. I heard that one venture firm ranked all the applicants into A players and B players, and the funded companies run by B players beat the A players by a huge amount on average. Although more research is needed, this suggests that not only is measured IQ bullshit, but that our entire holistic perceptions of people may be bullshit.
I was flabbergasted so I screencapped the third illusion, dropped it into photoshop and built my own masks. After applying the mask and limiting what I could see to only the two squares of interest, the colors were optically similar enough for me to say they are the "same". The actual numbers on the colors are: top center square R=130 G=70 B=51, side center square R=126 G=71 B=18. Ok, I'm a guy and the slight movement in R and G means nothing to me and even the larger movement in B when combined with RG doesn't really affect my perception much with my stunted male cones (retina). Also, fyi, the compression artifacts were just too bothersome so I averaged the colors by gausian bluring the center squares (they were cut out and on their own layer to eliminate bleeding from adjacent squares. So, ballparking it, I say WOW for two squares that look so totally different when all the rods and cones are being stimulated in my retina to them being essentially the same when all the other colors are not confusing my retina, optic nerve and the big photoshop in the back of my brain, well, I'm impressed.
I'm not sure why it was posted to reddit either.
Now this I don't understand. Why teach beginner (CS 101) students something not as mainstream as the most prominent languages in use in the world today: * Perl  * PHP  * Java  * C# (VB is a thing of the past -- most VBers I know left for C# when it came out in order to say their apps are better and in order to get more cash in the market) Sorry, but LISP, Python, Ruby, Haskell -- these languages just aren't ready for the mainstream yet. I would think that a good starting point would be Perl. Perl is a beautiful language if done properly and if it were not abused by all those Perl one-liner programmers. Perl is also a worthwhile skill that even a CS flunky, who simply learned this one language in this first class, could start to use in the marketplace immediately. It's also cross-platform. PHP is my favorite language, but I would reason to bet that more CS professors would prefer to introduce students to CS by teaching Perl over PHP for many reasons. Moving from Perl to PHP is not a huge stretch. Java is nice, but requires compiling all the time and the declared types get annoying for the budding student. Better to start with something easier. So there you have it. I think all schools around the world should begin to teach CS students with Perl over any other language. Then, introduce them to other languages after that. When I went to college, they started you on Pascal instead of C, because they said it was a "teaching language". Yet Pascal made it seem like working with strings was an afterthought, and was quite annoying. And how many of us prefer curly braces to BEGIN/END blocks? I do. Now you hardly ever hear about Pascal in the universities. Perl could become the new teaching language of choice. Now if they could just finish Perl 6 with this new Parrot runtime....
&gt; Apple worked harder, thank God, during those years. I'm glad I stayed away from early Windows and all its funky MSDOS.SYS, CONFIG.SYS memory reservation games. Networking on early MSDOS and early Windows (before WfW days) was a true nightmare too. True, but Apple doesn't play nice with others either. Everytime Apple licenses other vendors to produce Mac clones, they ineveitably yank the license and screw over the vendor. That is why I stopped using Apple products. &gt; You know, at one time, Microsoft could have saved face and played nice with GNU and FLOSS, and everyone could have gotten along rather nicely, but now the trust has been so destroyed that pursuing this would be a lost cause. Just out of curiosity, what exactly has MS done to the open source community aside from saying "We're better" and refusing to give away their own code base? (I'm not saying that they haven't done anything, just that I haven't looked at it that closely.) 
Perl:    `$str =~ tr/a-zA-Z/n-za-mN-ZA-M/;`
h/t [americablog](http://americablog.blogspot.com/2006/11/calling-bullshit.html) 
My roommate was really, really into the whole "speed seduction" thing.  (It goes by many names, including "THE GAME".)  The assumption is that all girls are incredibly stupid, easily manipulated finite-state automatons.  Therefore a "player" needs a large bag of tricks to keep the "target" from realizing that she's being "hypnotized".  The people who sell speed seduction books strongly recommend "magic" as one of those tricks.
Yeah, but the lambda returned from the slava_is_wrong function cannot mutate the lexical variable a, so I'm right, as always. Just because Guido misunderstood some academic literature and thought "ooh, lambda, fancy name" doesn't mean that Python's lambda is anything more than what Java gives you with anonymous inner classes.
I'm not a fowl.
I think it was more the "feel free to preserve your delusions" part...
Website publishing company
hell yea
I've never found the concept of "credit" to be something desirable or advantageous. The cost, as it were, was always to my detriment.  So I got debt free and stayed that way.  But I'm bombarded with offers on the phone, email and snail mail. I suppose Habitat for Humanity could try for some sort of clause to prevent this type of thing from happening to the new owners (maybe), although I'm unclear as to how this could be setup.  But if real estate can't be sold to future developers, then I don't see why Habitat couldn't try enforcing the same things.
this is a riddle, "look inside the site, no INSIDE the site" See if you can find it!
h/t [talkingpointsmemo](http://www.talkingpointsmemo.com/archives/week_2006_11_26.php#011343)
Nice topic (*boom tish*) Try learning assembler.   Then when you learn C, it all makes sense.  C is the portable assembler!
&gt; My IQ isn't going to put food on the table or beer in the fridge. It strongly correlates with the ability to do those things.
Don't hate. Please don't. Hate, fear, anxiety - they're the tools of the Pragers, O'Reillys, Hannities, the Roves and their Swiftboat minions. For them to control life by getting the masses to fall into rank, first they must make you fear life, and hate breeds fear. They would rather you hate those they target, but failing that they'll settle for you hating them and making their us/them polarization game simpler.    Keep reading, keep listening, keep learning, even from those you do not like and especially from those you do not understand. Give to others the respect you would like to receive and follow your conscience. Life is not always kind and gentle, but generally we do get what we give.  Pardon my preachy tone, but I suspect I'm a bit farther along in life than most reddit readers, learned from my many mistakes, love life and am speaking to you as I would to my children, my grandchildren, my friends.
What would you propose as a definition or metric? Just off the top of my head, I'd propose that a person's intellectual curiosity is the level of utility they get from exploring their world. Based on this, it would seem to me that trying new foods and reading the paper would at least correlate with intellectual curiosity.
And right after that it mentions that reared-apart twin studies are ALSO vulnerable in their methodology.
Sounds interesting, want to read more!
Technically, closures in Haskell (or lambda calculus) can't mutate lexical variables either.  We forgive them because *nothing* can mutate lexical variables in those languages. The comparison to Java is apt though - same issue, different root cause.  Python's "assignment is binding if the variable doesn't exist" rule is fucked up anyway.
And his point was that they have the name ("bittorrent") on the preferred TLD (".com") even though he misstated it originally

&gt;But I don't see oil going down much in the next several years. I'm in agreement, though I could see the price dropping dramatically in 5-10 years as all the energy producers that are trying to get plants built now are able to finish them (oil / wind / solar / geothermal / nuclear / you name it).  There is a mad rush of money on R&amp;D now for energy production as well as conservation, this is going to impact heavily on the oil industry.  I could be wrong though, China and India may keep demand high. 
Johnson Power!!!1!
We actually agreed on something? I guess its time I found someone else to piss off.
It's almost like Microsoft/Sony/Nintendo can now print their own money.
I have a new theory that our current president, former cokehead that he is, is trying to do so much damage to the economy that the only choice will be to legalize narcotics. That would free up an incredible amount of law enforcement budget on the federal, state, and local level, as well as incarceration costs. It would also open up the possibility of sin-taxing the newly legal trade. **And** he'd be able to go back to the coke legally.
It was more interesting.  Not taken over by politics.  I miss it.
Don't blame the soldiers - they are trained to kill. They aren't police. Blame the people who put them there - the willful ignorance of the American public.
Emacs does, but only for line-wraps.
Funny, my guess is the O'Reilly factor would be the one saying "Islam" this and "Muslim" that.
In the last few days, since I've been reading on police corruption, I came across other websites that posted pictures of dirty cops, lawyers and their ilk. But I won't post the link.  I think this is a *good* idea.  Letting these scum work in the dark prevents us from knowing about their crimes. This reminds me of "Assassination Politics" (look it up), which was an interesting idea on how to effectively remove such dirtbags. Unfortunately, the guy who penned it got arrested.  Seems like the status-quo defenders didn't like the citizenry to act for themselves. The irony of the article however, is that when our checks and balances in our judicial system no longer work, the people have no options left except individual action.  The article implies that the State is "afraid", as if this is wrong somehow, but it's as it should be, at all times.  As our servant, the State and its agents should be answerable to the people.  And when it stops answering to the people (like now), then the people have the right to rebel against it's overarching "authority". Cooperating with the police (in my *experience*) has proven to be disastrous (at any level), but everybody else may have a differing opinion or experience.  I see no problem with exposing informants either. The very fact that they are going after Bucci say's that they refuse to be "intimidated", although that's **exactly** the principle and operating factor utilized by the State thugs.  The duplicity is however, lost on them. *"While prosecutors haven't pointed to a case where a witness or officer was harmed because of the Web site, it has been used to shatter an undercover agent's anonymity."* This is noteworthy.  There is **no proof** of harm caused by revealing who these thugs are.  And the entrapment operations utilized by undercover agents absolutely sucks.  But it's okay if the *State* does it, just don't **you** try it.  The double standards are amazing.
Skyskraper, the question is not whether we can or should travel to another planet and colonize it. My question goes deeper than that. Remember the early days of jet flight? Everyone said we would never break the sound barrier...until someone did. I am not a scientist and I don't really care about how it will be done. But Hawking's comment that we should be able to power up to 'almost the speed of light' just doesn't gel. Speed is speed, and if we can travel that fast, there is absolutely no reason we can't travel faster than the speed of light. Speed and light are two totally different physical effects. I will probably never see it, but one day man will travel beyond the light. And when we do, we will colonize the universe. We have no choice. We can't stay on our single planet and survive.
For comparison's sake, the US armed forces is around [2 and a half million](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/American_armed_forces), with only 1.4 million in active duty. Anyone else see something strange there?
Tutorial on how to get iTunes to rip to high quality mp3s instead of low quality mp4s.
LOOTERS caused the Iraq civil war?
&gt; If you believe muslims are more prone to violence than christians, say so rather than tip-toe around it. See, that is *not* what I believe. I believe that some people who *profess* to be muslims are more prone to violence than *some* christians. (Some professed christians are quite violent; say, the ones that blow up abortion clinics, or bomb foreign countries, etc.)
Piratebay never cured anyone.
Apart from the content, what exactly changed? It looks exactly the same, except for the little side bar on the right edge. I guess the reddit designers got it right the first time :P
this little girl is a lawyer in the making...  Without the negative connotations, hopefully!
New site that just launched that provides graphs for Shoutcast broadcasters.
Reddit needs less screenshots of bored Firefox users.
It's refreshing to see the actual implementers of a new technology get some credit, rather then pegging it all on some exec or manager's supposed genius.
Can someone post a link to Google Earth's view of the site they found the residence at?
Homer:"I know a genuine Panaphonic when I see one"
&gt;Just out of curiosity, what exactly has MS done to the open source community aside from saying "We're better" and refusing to give away their own code base? * Ballmer's recent accusations of Linux IP infringement without proof. Although his minions back-pedaled on his statement, I still don't trust him, Bill, or Microsoft. * FUD: Fear, Uncertainty, and Doubt. It actually rolls up into lies. * The tactics spelled out in the Halloween docs:   - [Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Halloween_documents)  - [Actual Source](http://www.catb.org/~esr/halloween/) * Been the largest proponent of [DRM](http://youtube.com/results?search_query=DRM&amp;search=Search). They're also so uncool in so many ways it's like they've hit a point of no return: - What they did to [Ernie Ball](http://osdir.com/Article9517.phtml). - Bill Gates [lying under oath](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-1960403143809172490&amp;q=Bill%20Gates) P.S. I didn't know that about Apple. I switched from Apple to Windows one year before Windows 95, and then switched from XP to Linux in 2000. I've never gone back. When I arrived at Linux, it was the year it went cool with RH8. I'm now on the latest [Ubuntu release](http://www.ubuntu.com/desktop), as well as my wife and children, and I run it as my primary system at home and in the office.
That there's a lot of it?
Are these people dead?
The obvious explanation here is that the problems on IQ tests are, in general, of a type that more men are exposed to.  Most if not all IQ tests are written by men.  I have no problem believing that men score higher on IQ tests, but I don't believe this means men are more "intelligent". Furthermore, as an example, the Stanford-Binet test comprises 10 sections.  Your final score is merely a composite number, and depends on the weighting of the sub-sections. If you weight visual-spatial (which is generally considered to favor males) more than other areas, you will bias the test differently than if you give more weight to the verbal half of each factor.  Two people with identical "IQ scores" may have widely different profiles across the sections.   &gt; Parts of the corpus callosum, a major neural system connecting the two hemispheres, as well as another connector, the anterior commissure, appear to be larger in women, which may permit better communication between hemispheres. From http://www.sciam.com/article.cfm?articleID=00018E9D-879D-1D06-8E49809EC588EEDF&amp;pageNumber=4&amp;catID=9 From this a crude guesstimate might be that multi-disciplinary thinking may favor women, while narrowly focused reasoning may favor men; this may be like, to an extremely rough approximation, two CPU cores vs. one faster CPU core, or less roughly, two network nodes connected by gigabit ethernet vs. 100 mbit. 
The Army keeps you sleep deprived? dude thats worrying...
Just this once, you're not right.  See my [earlier explanation](http://programming.reddit.com/info/sdko/comments/cslc3). (Besides, as nostrademons said, even if Python's closures *did* lack the ability to mutate outer bindings, they would still qualify.)
That's *their* story.  Of course the UCLA incident shows they'll taser you multiple times for no reason.
This Administration refuses blame, which means they refuse responsibility too.  And accountability. So it makes perfect sense to blame the American people for their failures.  Simple.
*I think all schools around the world should begin to teach CS students with Perl over any other language.* You must be joking.
Where can I find a video game combining the two in such a way that my whole family will love it?
I agree. I understand that the author was simplifying a point about the movie industry not "getting" the internet. But please. Somebody along the way, in the middle of those thousands of pages worth of agreements, explained the difference between a corporation and a protocol.
might be ok if there was a keyboard interface
Human Survival Truth Reality Global Warming Climate Change I just spent an hour reading a disturbing website. http://www.planetextinction.com/ It may come across as a bit hysterical in parts, but I think that is more to do with us than the facts.  In fact it seems to me that there will be thousands (millions?) of things that humans have changed due to destruction of Nature and pollution changing chemicals in the atmosphere. (I suspect this will become a big problem for climate change, as all life depends on radiation from the sun (and universe), and as our atmosphere changes, so will this radiation.)
Manna from heaven. Rather sad, actually.  Junk food for a junk culture.
Pakistan [ranks 35th](http://www.answers.com/topic/list-of-countries-by-income-equality)  in income equality as measured by the Gini index of income.    From [Economy of Pakistan](http://www.answers.com/topic/economy-of-pakistan): &gt;However, Pakistan has no individual with as much as a billion US dollars, according to Forbes magazine and has the distinction of being (by population) the largest nation to have no billionaires. Among countries that have never had billionaires, Pakistan has the largest economy.
If you don't want people to know where they are going... now just to hide the tracks!
There's not one problem with people that wouldn't go away if there were no more kids.
A real estate agent is not a prestigious job. No kidding? Well, that isn't why I became an agent.
I don't get the link with 'Union Member?' and high scores, but apart from that...? Care to enlighten us anyone?
Wiki is always a good place to start http://c2.com/cgi/wiki.pl?LearningCee
&gt; Some TASER devices, particularly those employed by police departments, also offer a "Drive Stun" capability, which does not involve firing barbs and is intended to cause pain without incapacitating the target. TASER defines "Drive Stun" as "the process of utilizing the EMD as a pain compliance technique. This is done by activating the EMD and placing it against an individual’s body. This can be done without an air cartridge in place or after an air cartridge has been deployed." [5] &gt; "The Drive Stun causes significant localized pain in the area touched by the TASER but does not have a significant effect on the central nervous system. The Drive Stun does not incapacitate a subject but may assist in taking a subject into custody." http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Taser
That was when Kyles family moved to SanFran to be with more environmentally aware people (who drive hybrid cars). They were so full of themselves that they loved the smell of their own farts. Although I have to say I love  the sound of my own farts :-D
No, really. Perl, when taught properly and in an organized fashion, can be a beautiful, easy to read, easy to understand language. Sure, I use PHP every day, and sure I wish it supported namespaces, Unicode strings, the ability to use "." instead of "-&gt;", and a small handful of other things, but I use it because it's mainstream for web apps on Linux, has a rich API, and a mostly non-academic, pleasant developer community for it, and is so easy to use that it lets me focus on business processes rather than language academics. Perl, however, is more academic that appeals to professors, has a crankier RTFM-type developer crowd to ask advice from, has a rich API, and is not promoted as a premier web language in the mainstream today (although that is changing). 
Mm-hmm.  If I were going to give to a charity, I sure as hell wouldn't give to a Christian charity.  I have far better things to do with my money.  Like oh, I don't know, trying to save the planet.  What's the point in helping people if we're just going to kill the place they live?  Too bad reforestation efforts don't get to sit outside stores and ring annoying bells.
#21 is better.
These wing nuts are degenerating fast to cavemen.
Can we get a tasers.reddit.com?
The best pointer is that you better learn how to use pointers. BadaBoomTish  http://xkcd.com/c138.html
And the MXN and CAD have barley moved against the dollar. Check the charts [here](http://finance.yahoo.com/currency). Certainly nothing like the EUR and Pound have done. The Mexican and Canadian economies are much more woven into the fabric of the US economy. Any substantial devaluation of USD will probably follow suit for the MXN and CAD - the net result will be that Chinese, Canadian, and Mexican goods will cost the same. The bonds China has purchased (like all govt bonds) have a set maturation date where the US government agrees to pay back the principal. If China wants to sell its US treasuries, it will sell them on the open market - meaning their must exist a buyer to purchase them.  This is a neuatral situation as far as the US Treasury is concerned. They simply need to honor the interest and principle payments to the new owner. Some sort of way a misconception that China can force the US to "pay the principal now" - which only highlights a total lack of understand of how the bond market works.
Well, yes, they are in short supply especially since we're planning to turn them into fuel now.  But again, I doubt that would do much to help our economy - very few people are employed growing corn and soybeans (thankfully).
hilarious discussion between a student loan officer and a student.
"Ohhhh you're no fun anymore!"
OK, well, maybe.  Hasn't been the kind of experience I've heard of with Fords (not having had personal experience with them).  Still, I doubt you could compare this Fiesta against a Honda or Toyota.
If your girlfriend thinks you will support her while she's going to law school, maybe that's not so irrational after all.
Much the same, but no [taser](http://reddit.com/search?q=taser) stories.
I'd also be a little concerned as to where the ejaculate is supposed to go. If the thing is airtight then the presumably it would have to stay in the urethra -- not a pleasant thought. If you, er, churn out a lot of the stuff the pressure  buildup could have very unpleasant repercussions... You better hope the protective film wears away before it starts drying up, too!
I'm curious, what about Python's "assignment is binding if the variable doesn't exist" rule is fucked up?
Debatable - Personally I hate getting caught by the short rabbits!
Are people so lazy that they can't create fake friends themselves these days? What if you think your fake friends suck, do you get a refund?   I think a website devoted to creating fake pages for real people who suck is a much better idea.
It exists, and iirc it is a stronger correlation than between genetically unrelated kids raised in the same family.
Yeah, and also most, if not all, programming languages. :rolleyes:
The author also mentioned that the studios offered BitTorrent "a nice chunk of change" to distribute the films. Huh? I don't think anyone believes that the studios paid any $$$ to BitTorrent. More than likely BitTorrent paid an advance on sales to the studios.
If the US had more soldiers - and politicians - like this, we wouldn't be up to our eyeballs in the shit we are in now.
Were you missing the point where the kid was beating the piss out of the girl? A kid who was so aggressive that he wouldn't even stop *after* being tasered? If that is happening in school, you're damn right you need a peace enforcer there. A teacher is there to teach, not be the police.
The best of the Wii sports.
That is exactly what I am thinking..and if we put these on a map or something to see how many times it is happening all over our country, I think we would be shocked.  What did they do before tasers?  I really think this is totally unnecessary and unthinking.  But, it does go hand in hand in creating a nice tidy police state.
Right, but that's not the point.   The point is that you normally perform an experiment, generate sufficient proof yourself, understand what's happening well enough to write something about what you've done that is sufficient to satisfy the scientific community when combined with your tests.  Then you publish it in a few conferences and journals.   You're not concerned about people licensing the technology after all of that, because it's well proven.  This is how the scientific process works.  There is a normal channel for unbiased peer review that they have tiptoed around.
Or overstock.com
Actually the majority of redditors are non-American, or at least not living in the States. &gt; our FM survey data shows that roughly 50% of you are not living in the USA, very cool -- http://reddit.com/blog/1year
A more direct link is [here](http://www.usatoday.com/news/washington/2006-10-30-abstinence-message_x.htm?csp=34). The US Gov is now going to give the states federal grant money to disburse to organizations which promote abstinence with teenagers and young adults. It's a bit unrealistic if you ask me, but if the Gov is giving away free money like this for something so easy (yet ineffective) to promote, I'd be the first to stand in line to collect! I mean, how hard can this be? Put up a couple billboards about the dangers of teen sex, and then bring into the schools a doctor with some creepy slides on STDs and gruesome HIV deaths. Then, a check comes in the mail. And no red-state parent will fault you for it. Like duh, where do I sign up? 
That's it!  I have had it with these mother-fucking tasers on these mother-fucking cops! Really, I can see no excuse for this.  *I* could have taken down an 11-year-old boy.  I might hurt him rather badly in the process.  But that's better than Tasering him, and any cop should have the ability to do better than I.
With very few exceptions, the Ford's/GMs(Opel)/Chryslers(MB) sold in Europe are not made in North America.  Most are made.....in Europe.
cavemen are in the other direction ...
&gt; I am interested in understanding why emacs cannot be used for editing root-editable files Here's [one reason](http://72.14.209.104/search?q=cache:ZNM6jDBlCO0J:www.linux.ie/lists/pipermail/ilug/1999-June/003077.html+emacs+as-root&amp;hl=en&amp;gl=us&amp;ct=clnk&amp;cd=23).  Here's [another](http://groups.google.com/group/uk.comp.os.linux/msg/6c1dc693c5e33387?dmode=source&amp;hl=en&amp;output=gplain). You can Google around for others. &gt; Do you suggest changing their permissions to allow them to be modifiable by anyone? Nice try, troll. Can't you think of [any](http://archives.neohapsis.com/archives/openbsd/2002-11/0419.html) [other](http://lists.gnu.org/archive/html/emacs-wiki-discuss/2005-12/msg00014.html)  [way](http://groups.google.com/group/comp.emacs/msg/cec55e6f604f7253?dmode=source&amp;hl=en&amp;output=gplain)? Here's a fourth, the way i do it:  $ sudo cp /etc/whatever.conf ~   $ sudo chown me ~/whatever.conf   $ emacs ~/whatever.conf   $ sudo chown root ~/whatever.conf   $ sudo mv ~/whatever.conf /etc 
HOW CAN ANY ONE COMPANY HOLD BACK THE NFL FROM BEING AIRED....THIS IS NUTS....
I've not been a C++ fan, but Boost certainly helps make it more acceptable. I work at a company that employs several hundred C++ developers.  It's not going away anytime soon.
You got a Wii devkit, startup capital and a year or two of funding for me/us?
It's funny.  I got in a fight with and arrested by my school resource officer (he'd given an order without lawful authority) two years ago, and he didn't have a taser.  Are they that recent or something?
Exactly the point I was making in my other posts. It seems that many redditers think that the aggressor here is a little child you can pick up by the scruff-of-the-neck and pull aside. He may have been a toughened bully who I wouldn't want to meet, let alone having him attack my child.
Yes, but what good does it do us?   Women still talk 3 times as much.
agree
You are thinking like an individual, not like a huge corporation. Sure, if you had unlimited funds and lawyers at your beckoning, you might want to go after a single private citizen and spite them by bankrupting them/hassling them with court.  However, in reality, Wal-Mart doesn't give a damn about spiting you or anyone else; maybe an individual manager or employee does, but no company officer would ever approve such a waste of resources.  First, they want to keep you as a customer, even if you're difficult--a lifetime of lost sales, even for a single individual is a significant amount of money. Second, they don't want any type of bad press that could affect sales--they certainly would not risk this just to spite someone. Third, sure Wal-Mart could tie you up in court for countless hours, but those are hours that their attorney is billing them at $300/hr.  Do you really think they want to spend thousands of dollars to spite a customer into never shopping with them again? Think again.  A manager might threaten you, but if your situation reaches the lawsuit level, you'll likely get a call from some corporate MBA voicing a pleasant apology and offering a gift certificate--this is far and away the best tack for a corporation like Wal-Mart to take, and they're smart enough to take it.
If you are interested in an informative site that isn't trying to sell you something go to http://www.hussmanfitness.org/  It’s filled with information on how the body works and helpful information about fat loss and muscle gain.
I get it.
testament to a functional UI... sort of  like Google in 2001... looks pretty much the same  in 2006...   
Make sure it's necessary to use C. C is very good at doing the things you can only do in either it or assembler, but it's very bad at doing most other things.
Winning a single election cycle isn't usually considered a Winning Streak, unless one was educated in new math at public school. Nevertheless I appreciate the general sentiment.  Rock On kiddies!
The IQ measures a very specific kind of intelligence, that which we typically associate with males.  It was created by males with types of questions dealing with things that males are taught to value and encouraged to study. It should be no surprise that they score higher.  Hopefully, in the future we will embrace more of a Howard Gardner sort of approach to intelligence, which includes 8 different types of intelligence and can, obviously, measure far more than the IQ test can.  It is, after all, not a biased test, but a limited test.
Ah, right you are. And I agree. To further avoid confusion, I propose a common vernacular for these particular individuals: Religious Nutjobs. :)
This is patently false.  It may be true on average, but in individual cases it doesn't matter; although men are on average stronger than women, any particular woman may be stronger (even signifigantly so) than the average man.  If you want to put everyone through the same tests, that I can agree with wholeheartedly.
I've never worked at Wal Mart, but this sound spot-on and completely rational.
School is a matter of sucking up. I don't know how intellectually difficult your school was, but for all of mine, I am sure that any non-disabled person in a good enviornment could do great. &gt; And women work harder than men actually, that quote is utter flamage trash. please  .
Is there an "Effective C"? I'm looking for something akin to Meyers' "Effective C++" or Bloch's "Effective Java".
"Not that there's anything wrong with that."   
"There is a vast body of evidence that civilization has not improved life and lifestyles at all..." Yet you are using a computer to write your message. Why are the researchers aware of these findings never living in small rural villages in the South American jungle? When I ask some piss poor and hungry Africans if they want to come to America, they rarely say: "No thanks, I think I am happier here!" Ofcourse those are extremes. A sustainable small scale healthy community is theoretically possible. I've read E.F. Schumacher's Small Is Beautiful and David Ehrenfelds books. They both make valid points. However, I do think there is an inate human desire to invent "stuff" that makes life easier/better/different. Unfortunately, side-effects of such innovations are not always known in advance (see: externalization). But the many disadvantages that come from human progress (a debatable word in this context) do not imply we should just disregard innovation alltogether and go back to a sustainable equilibrium. As long as there's a chance of a better future, somebody, somewhere, will try and create it; hostile space or not.
It ambiguates variable creation with variable mutation.  Specifically, when you want to rebind an outer variable instead of creating a new local one with the same name, you need to use the `global` (or upcoming `nonlocal`) scoping keyword.  For example:  x = 5   def foo():    global x    x = 23 The alternative is to simply have separate syntaxes for the two actions, as in Lisp/Scheme.
oops.
Maybe not. But we have PORN.
Most of them cannot afford a fishing pole.
Sure, spend 6 years accelerating a space craft toward a solid mass over 6 light years away. Then how do you slow down again and land somewhere which might not even have oxygen, water and everything else we need? And what about destroying the earth while developing these matter / anti-matter engines?
Halliburton should be seized.
I dunno though. He's pretty good at making sure he's covering his ass and can't be sued and stuff. He's after all a pro at that sort of thing.
Smartest comment in this entire thread.
&gt;The guys in this video were idiots. The people who think this is typical behavior are idiots, too. I wish I could believe that. If this sort of counterproductive behavior by soldiers isn't typical, why does it so frequently happen right in front of a video camera? Just really, really bad luck? Why has the Army been cracking down on blogging, photo sharing, and video sharing by troops in Iraq?
Well he -is- from San Francisco.
[...]I stumbled across this site and found the materials and resources available from it quite good. They offer over 200 “Quick Start” Resume Templates and a host of other features including an easy to use Job Search Engine.  Almost everything on the site is free and you aren’t required to “log in” to download the templates or “build a resume” like other sites that are similar. [...]
See also http://www.wired.com/news/technology/0,72199-0.html  for a number of articles on the particle accelerator in Switzerland.   I toured the TRIUMPH accelerator in Vancouver and was well impressed. Couldn't help but be reminded of countless first person shooters though.
I know it's a joke, but reading this makes my skin crawl...
My web comic. Yup. Lost souls; love; loss; yard gnomes. We got it all.
I think that article got posted a day early on IGN. Hint hint.
I think that article got posted a day early on IGN. Hint hint.
...   So why are you still working for that company?
Quite so for an atheist.  Why don't you swear on say... *Science News*?
MIT's OpenCourseWare is a start. In general, there is a set of topics you learn in a good CS curriculum-- go to any top-4 department website, e.g. http://www.csd.cs.cmu.edu/education/bscs/currreq.html  to get an idea of the topics. The important ones for your particular line of work depend on what you're doing. You should have a solid knowledge of at least one higher-level language (any of Common Lisp, Scheme, SML, Ocaml, Haskell, Erlang (I think), or the like will do the trick). For any kind of Internet-related startup, you should have a good knowledge of networking and parallel programming, such as what one would get in a networking class and a parallel class. Basic background in statistics. Basic knowledge of machine architecture (must know assembler, must know what an ALU is).   Significantly deep knowledge of complexity theory, graph theory, combinatorics, and generally be able to follow the conversation when a CS theory nerd starts rambling (This is deemed useful even by systems people.).  That's most of it, aside from just being a hacker, which you learn from hacking.
&gt;Everyone, I don't care what language they speak, would interpret a police officer shouting "I want you to empty your pockets now!" as an "imperative" in the general sense, even if an imperative verb is not used. That was *my* point.  Don't split hairs about the grammatical form of the cop's command if the person receiving it knows it's a command.
It is sad.  Genetically modified,  chemically soaked, saturated oils, sodium (instead of salt)... yikes!  Healthier would be herbal suplements washing ashore, I think.
Do like the Soviets? Force prisoners into battle, and shoot them if they turn back?
Online friends are just as important to people as their offline friends, according to the results of a recent survey....What might be a surprise, though, is that all of this online interaction is apparently not detracting from interaction with close friends and family offline.
I, uh, well, you're *dangling*...ahem
What's with the periods? I'm pretty sure Reddit doesn't filter submissions with "porn" in the title.
I know this is totally off topic, but if I see/hear that annoyingly smug lady sing that stupid overstock.com jingle one more time, I'm stabbing someone. Can't they get rid of that lady with that freakish smile... or at least come up with a new commercial this year?
Stuttering treatment software implementing delayed auditory feedback and altered auditory feedback to promote fluent, stutter-free speech
The best practice for programming in C: Don't.  Unless you do low-level systems coding that has to interact directly with the operating system API and assembler, just don't.
just looks like the titles to the stories were not as long and catchy as they are these days
Yep.  Its actually a pretty cool little town.  I spent part of my honeymoon there.  Not everyone in the town is as nuts as this homeowner's association. But then again, I've yet to meet a homeowner's association that I liked.
During their silver anniversary, a wife reminded her husband: Do you remember when you proposed to me, I was so overwhelmed that I didn't talk for an hour?" The hubby replied: "Yes, honey, that was the happiest hour of my life."
procrastitron was right. This data is very incomplete since it does not correctly ensure a fairly random sample. Simple as that. I will admit though, that noone can realistically argue against the conclusion that a larger number of men have high intelligence/ability. At the extreme ends it's *all* men. Examples: top 500 chess players, top hobbyist programmers, top math innovators. If one to were to argue that women have the same *ability*, well that sounds more like an insult to me. Determination is the best measure of any person. eg. the quote "genius is 90% perspiration". So we can talk all day about environments, female affirmative action, and how women might be so much more intelligent than men, but to me, intelligence is a tool. If you aren't going to use it better than anyone else then your better off just using it to whack yourself in the head. until you die.
*the man was between retarded and a lunatic.* Blasphemy!
People need to read the fine print. I have little sympathy for people taken advantage of when it should have been obvious. And if it's not obvious, its in the fine print.
Who is Alex Jones, and why do I care?
Russell was a great philosopher and mathematician.  I'm sure he would be delighted that he influenced people.
Oh, right, that's where I've seen it! ..updating wikipedia because modern usage beats old dead poets every time.
It's stupid. There's nothing to get. A playstation 3 site has Xbox advertising. Holy shit! What a controversy.
I got 6. Netscape, Google, Yahoo!, Blogger, Wikipedia, Skype. Guess I need to surf more...
The [comp.lang.c FAQ](http://c-faq.com/) is very good.
here's four yorkshiremen - hilarious!! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Xe1a1wHxTyo "... luxury"
It's not the census data that's suspect here, it's the way it's being used. They're saying that military recruits, on average, came from marginally richer neighborhoods in recent years than in 1999. That may be true, but it's baloney to use that to draw any conclusions the economic outlook of the recruits themselves. What's more, they're using income data from the 2000 census in all cases, meaning neighborhoods that hit the skids in a big way in the last few years won't be reflected in these numbers. I'm not a statistician, but I can see that this is trash. &gt;I know the Heritage Foundation is right-wing. So I'm pretty sure they wouldn't have released their findings if they'd found out that the US military was dumber than the US civilian population. What are you hoping to gain by listening to a group that you openly acknowledge is intellectually bankrupt?
Yes, we would.  You can send in all the SpecOps you want, but if you're fighting an unjust and unjustifiable war, it will eventually wear them down. My sister's boyfriend is Special Forces; he can tell you the same types of tales from Iraq, Aghanistan, and the Caucasus.  Special Forces type deployments are typically effective and durable in laying the groundwork for local involvment, but you can't fool all the people all the time if a war is simply unjust and against their best interests.  And Iraq has proven to be a president's trillion-dollar folly, a train wreck that friends of mine in the services view as "we're in there, we have to finish the job" rather than "this is what needs to be done to protect America".  There is a gaping chasm between the two -- no career military officer is going to throw away their career by speaking out against the chain of  command (unless they have decided to leave the service), but you can always read between the lines.  There don't seem to be many experienced career military guys that view the Iraq adventure as a wise move; in fact, I seem to recall that being the case all the way back in 2003.  But what the hell do they know -- they're just over there, living with locals, growing ZZ Top beards and polishing up their Pushtun and Dari for the next redeployment... 
So how does this relate to ninety percent of reddit?   
Three New York City High School Students were invited to attend the 2006 Nobel Prize Ceremony Honoring Six American Nobel Prize Winners.
So let me understand it. You bought it 2nd Hand but you sold it 4th Hand. So how did the car jump one full hand?
When I was in high school in Lincoln, NE the school resource officer was a real cop who was at the school every day.  He carried a gun and a baton.  I am sure though that every district has a different setup though
You are incorrect to refer to the US government as your own. It's not like the US extends it's diplomatic influence throughout the world, forcing other countries into agreements that are not in their best interests.. wait;)
*Real* purists write f \in O(g). Or maybe this is my delusional imagination of what real purists write :)
A sure sign that bubble 2.0 is about to pop.  Articles by serial start-up artists about how great it is to get a chance at hitting a home run.  IT'S FUNNY IF IT WASN'T TRAGIC.  SOME PEOPLE ACTUALLY HAVE AMNESIA. what this a-hole doesn't say is that thousands of "A" types spents years in the valley trying one startup after another to only end up back in the safe arms of big corporations once they ran out of their worthless options to wipe their asses with.
"Who is Alex Jones, and why do I care?" Whoops - sir, you asked the Wrong Question, you'll have to come with us.  You have the right to remain silent, anything you say can and will be used against you... You don't see anything wrong there?
A little web app inspired by link clouds and Hebbian Learning. Links grow when you click on them.
Are you sure about that? I always thought it was Logitech, but I could be wrong.
this what posted last year; so what ever happened?!
Especially great for people seemingly only familiar with the same three sketches.
Yes, because we should really be getting pointers on sexual morality from a Mormon.  Forcing 13 year old girls into marriage against their will and sanctifying rape: OK.  Saying that black people have inferior souls to white people and have been cursed by God: just ducky.  Premarital sex between consenting adults: the worst thing ever.   Come on, I'm sure you could find someone more morally and spiritually bankrupt, more intellectually shallow, unapolagetically racist, more hostile to reason, decency and equality than old [Fudge K. Packer](http://mormontruth.blogspot.com/2005/12/boyd-k-packer-current-mormon-apostle.html).  Like, say, David Koresh, or John Wayne Gacy.
12 year olds can't hurt anybody. You would have to be crazy to use a taser on a 12 year old. Oh. Never mind.
That was put badly. Usually people who say blah blah complex blah blah too complicated to talk about blah blah are BSing their way into preventing people from investigating the topic, which is what I thought at first. However, it is thought of best in terms of a conditional probability table: Suppose you have only two values of intelligence, high and low. (Wrong assumption, but the following table scales to continuous values.) Then, you have two variables that intelligence is conditioned on, nature and nurture, or genes and environment. Suppose further that nature and nurture can each only be good or bad (Wrong assumption again, but again, it scales). Then you have four entries in the table: P(high|Nat=bad, Nurt=bad) P(high|Nat=bad, Nurt=good) P(high|Nat=good, Nurt=bad) P(high|Nat=good, Nurt=good) You can infer the values of P(low|...) from these. However, you can't infer anything else. There is otherwise no relation between these four probabilities. The implication by the people who ask "which is more important" is that intelligence is a weighted sum of gene quality and environment quality, which seems false.
Here's why I get so bothered about this. People look at the results presented here on gender and IQ and walk away with a silly belief like "Men are inherently and naturally smarter than women." I think there is real danger in placing too much importance on genetics.
&gt; CAD have barley moved against the dollar. In Jan 03' one CAD was worth $0.65 USD, now it's $0.88. That's over a 30% move in 3 3/4 years. If you look at the 5 year chart [here](http://www.economist.com/markets/currency/graphs.cfm) (click the 'launch the graph link' to get a nice java app that allows multi year graphs), the chart looks like it's still climbing, consolidating gains for the past couple months but not leveling off It's true that the Canadian economy is tightly integrated with the US economy but I watch that exchange rate carefully since I live in Canada and get paid in USDs and the economists up here have been predicting parity for a while now. 
Auto-locked files make them unwritable, rarely unreadable. The FS layout is totally clear: User-specific stuff goes into Users (which could be symlinked--I don't know what it's called--into another drive), Windows goes into Windows, and Program binaries go into Program Files. And there're always system variables (%TEMP%, %APPDATA, etc.) How is that unpredictable?
It is interesting to know Cipla "exports drugs" to the US. I am guessing this must be just contracts from Big Pharma in the US. I took a course (IP Strategy) cross-listed with the Law School last year, and the views of those aspiring Big Pharma lawyers were really disturbing.. (IP "strategy" for Pharma, at least, was pretty negative "patent fences/islands/walls" etc) After years of lobbying, Big Pharma (in the US) has erected really really high barrier to entry into the Pharmaceutical industry by some really "clever" legislature.. [(link to wikipedia)](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Food_and_Drug_Administration#Criticisms_of_US_drug_packaging_and_distribution_practices) I seriously doubt we will see a Cipla product in US drug-stores any time soon..(correct me if I am wrong.) I hope underdeveloped/developing countries still put their people ahead of foreign corporations and Hamied continues to make cheap life-saving drugs... 
Like I said, your pathetic delusion is about the worst thing that civilization has created. The only reason that you have the time and energy to think of these stupid ideas and then spout them off to random people all over the world is because of the very civilization that you have decided to revile. I rather pity you, really.
The problem is the US current account deficits are on going. We not only need China to continue holding what they already hold, we STILL need China and GCC countries to buy up USD obligations at a 900 billion dollar a year clip. It is the ongoing financing needs alone that can criple the USD; unless it can be replaced by the missing US consumer (-.5% savings rate) or by government budget balancing (tax increases), there's no prospect of domestic buyers of our USD debt. On top of this, MBS's are starting to go bad. The housing bubble has only started to pop, and the Fed is forced to keep rates up to support the 'strong dollar' facade, while dollar continues to lose ground. So, 'neuatral' this is not.
happens in a programming project all the time!
A's are those who get it, and knows how to do it, and does it.  Usually someone with an aptitude or desire to learn, but a core compentency which is a + contribution to the bottom line, or lift off.  Motivation. B's are everyone else, dead weight, or testers that can be motivated by A's to perform. Some A's a tech gurus, but lack social aptitute.  Technically these sub-As need a general coordinator who  understand both. Maybe we should say some people are  A* and others (technical genius) are As.  The rest are B's. Sometimes Bs are really As by paradox, they work harder cause they know they are an A but just haven't been "proven" in some sense (lack of stimulation, or something)...   e.g. the college drop out who hits it big time. With the competition high from academic ranks.. I see too many super GPAs that can't do basic research or even take a project to market. or even identify a product.  But they can get A on tests.
They didn't have comments then (or I'm blind).
I don't know why I didn't become a photographer...
I don't get it. If you are so convinced that civilization is going to end soon anyway, why are you wasting all this energy to try and condemn it? If you're right, you'll be proven right soon, won't you?
This is a simple equation, yet it yields powerful results. When you mix incompetence with golf, this is what you get. What do you get? You get pain in the region of the crotch, my friend.
No. Take 100 men and 100 women, randomly, call that A. Throw away 50 male idiots, call that B. You now have 150 people.  Take the portion of B with IQ &gt; 120, call it C.  Take the portion of A with IQ &gt; 120, call it D.  I claim that with high probability, C=D, because you were only throwing away idiots, so you didn't mess with the stuff going into C or D.
Not like you'd really want to....
wow...
He should then be taken to the principal's office, bent over the desk and get sixty lashes on his dumb ass.  That's how it worked in the old days, and look how normal we turned out.
were you missing the point that the kid was an 11 years old in a middle school?  and not a 20 something thug in some juvenile facility? a teacher is not there to 'be the police' but certainly to keep a minimum of discipline;  this is not the thing thing as to 'be the police' and is definitly part of the job of teaching.
Comments were added about a year ago. Actually, looking at noname99's link, they must've been added sometime in Dec. 05. http://reddit.com/info/t5ns/comments/ct5og
you can never know too much about sheep
There were, what, like, five contributors back then?
We're a long way, however, from "the right environment." There are plenty of social reasons for disparities in IQ, and many of them are problems that we ought to address.
The layout looks nicer. There is a wider column for the article titles and there are 50 articles displayed by default.
When you've got a hammer, everything looks like a nail.
Or in more real-world terms, it makes it too easy to mistype a variable name and end up with a syntactically valid program that does entirely the wrong thing.  You're not warned about these errors (well, maybe PyLint will); your program just gives wrong results. This is probably my #1 bug in Python, PHP, and JavaEE's Unified Expression Language, ahead of all type errors, logic errors, and even state errors.  When you've been staring at code all day long, you won't notice that you're binding the new variable `situationsummary` instead of assigning to the existing variable `situationSummary`.  You'll just notice that somewhere, results are not happening. I woulda thought we'd learned our lesson with C's == vs. =, but evidently not.  Programming languages should not be vulnerable to typographic errors. (I should probably add that the problem is not as bad in Python as in PHP or JavaUEL, because an *access* to an unbound variable is an error in Python, while it gives something usable yet nonsensicaly like "" or 0 in PHP or JavaUEL.  Most mistypings are accesses.  Assignments are more visible (always on the left side), and repeated assignments to a single variable usually involve compound operators like +=, which will throw an error if unbound.  My claim of "most common error" applies to all my PHP/Python/JavaUEL program errors combined, not just the Python.  However, I still think it's brain-dead to incorporate a language feature that gives a different-but-still-valid program on a one-keystroke error.  Yes, this applies to = vs == too.)
Seinfeld's Kramer (Michael Richards) is getting slammed for his rant against Black hecklers while performing at the Laugh Factory in L.A. But was he just really pissed and lashing out at them, or is he *actually* a racist?  The Electronic News Network investigates and finds out a few amusing (or tongue in cheek?) angles to that answer...
I got those plus Alexa, Economist, and Bloglines. Anybody got the rest?
So what ridiculously amazing things have you done with that supposedly ridiculously amazing brain?
These old-media dumbasses just don't get it. This would have been idiotic back in 1998, and is incomprehensible today.
Is he correct when he says that Jewish politicians have sworn on the bible? This was a surprising factoid.
Very typical of modern humans to think that those from the past were not as smart or developed as they really were.
I'm going to have to agree with most of those saying that regardless of age, the fact that the boy had to be tasered twice shows us that we're missing some pertinent information. Besides, any male that hits a female (past I dunno, infancy?) deserves just about whatever they get. Either this kid has serious issues and this was coming sooner or later and/or his parents hold some responsiblity for how he managed to get this far in life thinking that he could do this to anyone, especially a girl.
red
Liverpool linked, Pavon move, Real Madrid, defender, Real Madrid defender, Francisco Pavon, Francisco, Pavon, English Premiership, Liverpool, the future, Fabio Capello, Rafael Benitez, Anfield, transfer market, The Spanish,
Er, I think you're confusing [humus](http://www.thefreedictionary.com/humus) with [hummus](http://www.thefreedictionary.com/hummus).
So boring I couldn't even read it. Didn't help that the font size was 18+ and I couldn't skim. Garbage. The speed of this meme is 0, because it sucks.
Because it's harder and would probably be seen as unAmerican to actually attempt to rehabilitate anyone.  And by that I mean it would cost more. Counseling isn't cheap, and we could all probably agree that at least maybe a significant chunk of the prison population could use serious counseling.
Hmm, some pointers?... Sure: http://www.research.att.com/viewProject.cfm?prjID=67 http://www.faqs.org/faqs/computer-lang/Objective-C/faq/ Heck, even: http://www.research.att.com/~bs/C++.html http://www.java.com/
Wow. The perfect response. I couldn't agree more my friend.
From their CSS:  font-family:Arial,Helvetica,FreeSans,"Luxi-sans","Nimbus Sans L",sans-serif The font will be the first from that list for which your system has a match.
Woo. Hoo. Does the binary specify ASCII? No. What if I choose Unicode? Non-western ASCII encoding?  Totally lame.
well played
Well the first "e" is likely "emerge" seeing as how he has a bookmark for it on the toolbar above ;) Also, as mentioned by cecilkorik in a different comment, the "o" in browser is orkut.
India is and should be proud of sons like Hamid. He is a businessman. But thats just his profession. Actually what he is doing is bring affordable healthcare to the millions of poor people in India and worldwide. While it is true that patents need to be protected for providing incentives for innovation. Practically, patent protection in todays world means protecting the unfair and inhuman practices. Because, the pharma industry is so organized that they jack the prices up by so many times. Most of the new drugs are produced by unorganized pharma in university labs and small r&amp;d units (again mostly with govt funding). But ends up being patented by big sharks who use them as tools to extract that every last drop of blood.  Patent system has lost its relevance becasue it was initally installed to protect the unorganized researchers. These big pharms should be able to use their abilities to market and manufacture for making money rather than legal blackmaling. How wlse can one explain that a one dollor a day anti-Aids drugs can be manufactured and marketed by Cipla profitably, whereas the Big Pharma charges atleast $400 for that. Over 4000 % profit margins are immoral esp. when many die for not getting them simply for not being able to affotrd them. In another country Hamid would be a Hero. But in India terrorists become Bollywood stars, scamsters become politicians, Criminals run sympathy campaigns to avoid being hanged, Rapists teach religion and enterpreniers portrayed as Thieves.
Stop it.  LISP is better than that.  Why must you reply to every single fucking comment with your rudeness?  Grow up!
And by that token, one of the "s" favicons is on the bookmarks toolbar too: Sovrat.se
It was every comment he's made, actually.  He's behaving like a bear with Asperger's, PMS *and* a sore head.  He's rude, and he shouldn't be, because it's not like a LISP fan being rude to a non-LISP fan is exactly a fresh new concept.
Stupid
What is LISP? I've heard of Lisp, are the two related?
It would be fun if I could figure out how not to shoot the puppy! I tried everything possible, and the little mutt always dies. EDIT: Took several tries, but I got it. Try not to move your mouse at all! Suprisingly it's quite hard to do.
Well..only if the indian politicians show a little respect to him...
&gt;it is the height of arrogance to think that we know everything there is to know, and that nothing new will be discovered. We look back on people a 100 years ago and think they just didn't have a clue. The mindset 100 years ago was very different than it has been since WWII.  The invention of the atom bomb, man's going to space and landing on the moon, and other remarkable achievements sparked peoples' imaginations.  Look at how popular sci-fi was back in the 50s, for example. The tendency 100 years ago was to discount new inventions.  The tendency 50 years ago, and it continues to this day, is to make wildly inaccurate and hopelessly optimistic predictions. Here's a quote for you.  Marvin Minsky: &gt;In from three to eight years, we will have a machine with the general intelligence of an average human being.  I mean a machine that will be able to read Shakespeare, grease a car, play office politics, tell a joke, have a fight.  At that point, the machine will begin to educate itself with fantastic speed.  In a few months, it will be at genius level, and a few months after that, its power will be incalculable. That's from 1970.
As much as I love listening to Barney Frank (the man has a great grace about him), these shouting matches just turn into white noise after a point. Nobody wins.
The sad thing is that not one media organization seemed to pick up on the error.  Do *none* of them do fact checking anymore?
Sign up to www.wiindicator.com and you get a text message or email sent to you when the Wii gets restocked at major on-line retailers. 
Many economists will tell you that the dollar has long been overvalued.  The result of this is too many imports and too few exports:  our ever-decried trade imbalance. An expensive dollar is great for tourists and importers but bad for American companies trying to sell their goods overseas.  If you're one of those types that gets all hot and bothered about outsourcing or the loss of American manufacturing, a weaker dollar is the cure for your woes.  I think talking about a "weak" dollar confuses people into thinking it's necessarily bad for Americans, but it isn't. Europe is getting royally screwed by this, though.  The dollar should also be sinking against Asian currencies, but isn't.  Asian countries like exporting to the US so much that their governments go to great lengths to keep the dollar expensive relative to their currencies, to make it easy for Americans to buy Asian goods.  So basically the people getting hurt most by the weaker dollar are Europeans.  Their exports to America are hurt and they don't get the advantage of cheaper consumer goods from Asia.  They get cheaper imports from America, but most basic manufactures don't come from here anymore.  It's like the big structure of the world economy is based around Asia and the US with Europe as an afterthought. Anyway, that's way oversimplified of course.  But I've seen a lot of talk in the blogs about how a weaker dollar is somehow a symptom of a bad American economy.  It actually could be the sign of an economy on the mend, undergoing a needed correction.  By itself, it doesn't really signify one way or the other.  (And I'm not sure if the artificial currency conditions relative to Asia are good or bad for America or Asia.  And I have no idea how it plays out with American companies that have stuff manufactured in Asia, like Apple.) 
I second this. I swear half the time I try to copy a dev project onto a portable drive I forget to close Visual Studio, only to get an error message (but not until it's already copied about 100 MB of data) that &lt;random project file no human ever looks at&gt; is open and the copy operation cannot continue. WTF? Why make open files that can't be copied? I can sorta understand the rationale for not wanting to copy files that may be in some inconsistent state, but either give me a choice or let the rest of the files copy regardless. Don't make me close my project just so the copy operation runs. 
I find the *other* way of being killed much more satisfying!
What does a compiler have to do with an application concept of container and containee? Nothing. OLE had nothing whatsoever to do with compilers. Thus (1) is absurd on the face of it. Not only that, the OLE API was part of the Win 3.0 SDK. Cheers
You win.
Well....we are talking about different aspects. Of course if the US continues to run heavy budget deficits the dollar will fall. And yes (to respond to borg) - over the last 3.75 years the USD has lost ground against the CAD. These changes do not occur in a vacuum. As the dollar gets weaker, American goods get cheaper - likewise Canadian, European, and Chinese goods get more expensive. Markets are naturally self-correcting. My statement of 'neuatral situation' was with regard to China selling its bonds on the open market. That does not fundamentally change anything. Moreover, the Fed can simply issue higher interest bonds to counteract any sell-off - which will entice the players involved to buy the new issues. I am not forcasting a rosy situation for the USD - I'm simply saying that the hysterical tone often found in these threads (which neither you nor borg is guilty of) is little more than Chicken Little claiming the sky is falling.
*Nobody* expects the Spanish Inquisition! (sorry, I can't resist)
I say we send Michael Richards in there to entertain them.
Can definitely relate.
I worked directly under Auren this summer
What the hell are you talking about?  What do any of you people think of Metallica trying to copyright the word "metal"?
At I guess I would imagine its because a CS degree is not supposed to be a vocational programing course for budding programmers, but they are often treated that way.  Its probably a good idea to expose students to the kind of languages, tools and ideas that they will probably never encounter in the average job. Let them know that "Theres more than one way to do it" to quote Larry. So when they get to the point where they are building their own tools, they dont just mindlessly repeat the patterns found in the mass market lowest common denominator toolset.
Do the rules also specify that it must be a hand, or will any appendage suffice? Nonetheless, I stand corrected.
So true, so true...
Is it just me, or did anyone else find the lines separating the articles sort of annoying (like speed bumps for the eyes)?
This is absolute bollocks, people are this bloody ridiculous nowadays? The sad bit is that I can see teenagers paying for this service...
My top 5, with links for those not in the 59 above: 1. The funniest joke in the world  2. [Harold The Sheep](http://youtube.com/watch?v=_eJTJHRqYX4) ('e doesn't so much fly... as *plummet*)  3. Four Yorkshiremen  4. Cheese shop  5. [Philosopher's Song](http://youtube.com/watch?v=m_WRFJwGsbY)  5. [Philosophical Soccer](http://youtube.com/watch?v=cGRXF4t_nHI)  6. Ministry of silly walks
This **is** a joke, right? right?
Cool!!!
story of 3 Iranian Guys getting drugged and robbed by prostitutes in Pattaya.
go to the original source: www.lottolab.org
I reread to make sure. P(B|A) != P(A|B). They measured the male/female split for IQ &gt; 120, that is P(Male | IQ &gt; 120), and not the fraction of male/female with IQ &gt; 120, or P(IQ &gt; 120 | Male).
For those of you who want to hear his 35 minute talk on this, you can download the MP3 here: http://boss.streamos.com/download/Townhall/audio/mp3/92c11f29-7701-4f95-aefd-2704b48802ec.mp3
Death or Slava?  Slava's not really a Lisp fan - he's someone who happens to know and respect Lisp, but is more interested in programming languages in general (as am I, for that matter). And unfortunately, complaining about someone's rudeness usually only succeeds in make them more rude.  If someone's really out of line - well, that's what the down arrow is for.
The reason you get downmodded so much around here is that you are the kind of person who chooses what tools you like based on what your manager wants. This is mostly a community of people who love programming even when they're not being paid for it, and they don't like it when people say that since some PHB won't sign off on X, X is worthless.  Edit: I don't mean to say that a half-complete port is the best thing in the world to use for every-day development. I mean to say that the problem is that your reason for rejecting it is that your manager wouldn't like it.
Here is the abstract: &gt;In functional programming, fold is a standard operator that encapsulates a simple pattern of recursion for processing lists. This article is a tutorial on two key aspects of the fold operator for lists. First of all, we emphasize the use of the universal property of fold both as a proof principle that avoids the need for inductive proofs, and as a definition principle that guides the transformation of recursive functions into definitions using fold. Secondly, we show that even though the pattern of recursion encapsulated by fold is simple, in a language with tuples and functions as first-class values the fold operator has greater expressive power than might first be expected.  
What is amazing is the deeper truth these illusions suggest: either that there are no illusions, or everything we see is an illusion. I prefer the latter. However, your description of the brain using things like 'shadows' to interpret the reflectance of objects isn't correct - though this may seem counterintuitive. The reason is that the concept of shadow is a post-hoc description of your perception of the world, and not an accurate description of the light that falls onto the eye. Indeed, the visual system has no direct access to surfaces or illuminants (shadow or otherwise) in the world, and so has no direct way of using a 'shadow' to generate it perception of the world. As such, seeing a surface's reflectance is mathematically impossible using the retinal image alone. Thus, all the brain has to go on are its statistics of what information 'meant' for behaviour in the past. It is these past behavioural significances that you're seeing.
Why can't Asia get respect?
Tucker Carlson is a very... very... very boring writer.
The headline in the story splits the line there.  The &amp;lt;TITLE&amp;gt; of that HTML page reads the same, but with a "/" wher the linke break would be.   Reddit will automagically pick up the page &amp;lt;TITLE&amp;gt; of a submission if you leave the title field blank.
How can this be true if the average commercial developer is worse than the average open source developer?
It will be interesting to see how this plays out, especially in terms of national media and whether or not anyone will give any time to this.  I'd like to hear comments on here from those of you who do watch CNN and MSNBC, as to whether or not they are covering this campaign. It does seem like they are reaching quite a bit, but I just hope that by them trying to shed light on this issue some of the other prosecutable offenses will come out into the open.
Fox has a point, the  U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit has ruled it is illegal to link to illegal content. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Universal_v._Reimerdes    
Excellent review of why the Blackberry is much better than the new Treo, and I completely agree!
Goes with my rolodex watch.
[LISP](http://community.computerhistory.org/scc/projects/LISP/book/LISP%201.5%20Programmers%20Manual.pdf) (PDF).  And yeah, I'd say they're related.
I LOVE C SICK AND ALL THAT HE STANDS FOR!!!
You know, that's just so great. First of all, you attribute FSM to Dawkins. ideaJack is okay with you I guess. Dawkins doesn't take credit for FSM at all, he very carefully explains his sources in 'the God Delusion.' Unfortunately, he is also sometimes downright spiteful in the book. FSM isn't any more peurile than what it was meant to attack: that teaching creationism isn't the same as teaching science. Perhaps society has taken it far beyond the original point, but if it wasn't for creationist mangling of the separation of church and State FSMism wouldn't have happened in the first place. The fact that people are willing to die rather than renounce something is not a case for religion, it is a case against. Jim Jones, Waco, etc. etc. etc. Christianity is a cult that is too pervasive to call a cult, at least in america. But your implication that the only real things are those people willing to die for is not peurile, it is sophomoric. And on that 2006 A.D. thing. The fact that a cult is powerful and manages to leave cultural baggage around it isn't an indication that it is somehow right. Witness Mao, the Nazis, Stalin, and so on, all of whom impressed their immoral ideology on the local environment and left lots of (local) baggage similar to the zero point in some time system or other.  And I didn't downvote you. And it isn't up to you to decide who thinks. Unless you think that you have some kind of supernatural superiority about who is thinking and who is not.  I don't deny you are thinking. I just don't agree with you. (and unlike the cults, I don't believe that those not part of my cult will be tortured for an eternity by their 'benevolant' god).
parrot is the duke nukem forever of programming languages/virtual machines
We used to have condom machines all over the place in the U.S., too.  I think the last time I routinely saw them was sometime in the early 1980's. I'm baffled how a bunch of prudes managed to take over affairs for the rest of us. Were our parents too busy having sex to make it to voting booths and town meetings?
Really? He quotes him quite carefully in the stuff I've read. And if you're talking about a speech of conversation, who do you know that provides references for every idea they use in conversation? If you have a link that demonstrates your comment, I'd love to see it. I find RD a bit annoying but at least so far, not one to avoid referencing sources.
I went to school too, but fact is that most of the time we can't adequately detect the harassment, sexual abuse (in elementary school!?), racism, etc.  I recommend homeschooling to everyone whose means allow it. But that cop had no right or necessity to use a Taser when she could have used good, old-fashioned physical force.
And Carver killed himself afterwards, if I recall correctly, out of shame for walking on.   
[No](http://userscripts.org/scripts/show/3190).
No I agree. I'm not sure why people like that layout more. To me the lines break the flow of the site somewhat.
&gt; So everybody just uses Emacs when they write lisp? Spend enough time in a language as flexible as Lisp, and you will start to wish for the same kind of flexibility in all the apps (or OSes, if you wish) you use. When you get to that point, you start to realize that vimscript is only going to get you so far.
caps warning: **ALL YOUR BASE ARE BELONG TO US!!!** :end caps
Extend that a bit. Is it okay to exploit children? Is it okay to explot people with deliberate misinformation when they have pretty limited understanding? Is it okay to use legalistic wording that is counterintuitive? I agree, educated people should read the fine print. And I have limited sympathy for people who should know better. But many people who HfH helps are pretty disadvantaged mentally. Preying on them is low.   
$80,000 in goods?  He stole the entire store?
I honestly agree with you. I was referring to defensive actions, not first strike. In no way was I supporting our current military objectives. Hell, I wasn't even thinking of Iran either. I just hate the old "fighting is bad period!" argument. I believe in defending my country from real threats, not different cultures and beliefs that scare some people irrationally. Diplomacy is always the best choice if possible. Of course, this is all assuming humans are rational creatures, which we are not.  (Thank you for your support: U.S. Army Combat Engineer)
That would be my headlock/armlock option--I _know_ it isn't always legal to do that. The thing is: Police have by-the-book responses for situations, and I don't think "pulling one kid from another", or getting into that sort of wrestling match is really among them. This varies from city to city and state to state, and (again) someone more knowledgable about real policework would have to comment.
Bob, as it appears I have new information on this, it appears that Bob Cringely's accusation was not founded in anything but confused hearsay. Therefore, I'll grant you that one. To the point, however, I'm making products for Linux to be released soon, and want Microsoft off my aching back. Ballmer's accusations of Linux IP infringement get me very litigious, and I don't like to have to go into that space.
I thought it meant that 50% of redditors were non-living Americans.  Thanks for clearing that up. :)
read the article again. the school resource officer was a female.
another argument without stats to back it up
Actually, it is beginning to look a lot more complicated than just immediate environment and genetics; epigenetics studies recently seem to indicate that there are triggers that reflect your lineage and which may indicate that your grandparents had poor nutrition, for example. Very interesting stuff.
Microsoft has put up threats and scared CIOs over Ballmer's recent statements beyond this announcement, and for what may amount to nothing but a gross misconception. The Microvell agreement also is like giving to the mob. It's like SCO Part II. It's like, "Hey, Mr. Ballmer sir. I use Linux. Do you want your cash in unmarked envelopes left under the trashbin on the corner of 51st and Vine this time?" 
I wonder how long will this administration ignore the rest of the world?
Ha!  That's the only positive spin I've heard on the dementia problem.
The point is not to teach using a mainstream language, but to teach using a language which is good for teaching computer science. If mainstream languages are taught, this is almost always due to political pressure, and usually not because people thought they were the best idea for actually learning about the theory of computation. One important thing to note is that computer science is a total misnomer: It's neither a science (it's not empirical), nor is it about computers. It was named before it was well understood what it was that we were studying. Computer science is the mathematical study of processes of computation. What you really want when you're teaching a CS course is a language which helps in making concepts taught in the course clear to the student. You most certainly do not want a language where the semantics are unnecessarily difficult to reason about, and you don't want a language which requires too much attention to details irrelevant to the course, especially those which will be out of date in a few years. On the other hand, there is always pressure from the outside world, and faculties always have to decide how much to cave in to this pressure. In the case of co-op programs, this pressure is often overwhelming, and often to the detriment of the program's quality. In this regard, I don't think Python is a terrible compromise. It's sufficiently mainstream that it could conceivably be used in real-world applications. Personally, I favour Haskell as an initial programming language for CS students, because I really like the top-down approach to explaining CS, progressing toward lower-level details and potentially aspects of the hardware implementation later on. Of course, there are many more even less mainstream languages, but one usually wants something which is going to have a decent and usable set of tools, and so there is somewhat of a limit on obscurity. There is at least one exception to that, and that's the possibility of designing a specific language tuned to the courses. This is not as unreasonable as it might initially sound. Once one understands the theory and concepts behind a language well enough, the specific syntactic details of the language are comparatively unimportant, and can usually be learned relatively quickly. Others might take the bottom-up approach, but I find that infecting people's minds with the ideas of stateful computation and imperative computation too early tends to lead to making functional and declarative programming harder  on students later, while I haven't observed too much of the reverse: people who don't impose unnecessary ordering on computations to begin with usually have few problems imposing an arbitrary order on them when that's necessary, and avoiding excessive use of state is a good idea in essentially any language. (In things like assembly, it can't be avoided, but still one wants to minimise its reach in order to have a good hope of structuring programs in a manageable way.) Java is certainly not the right place to start. It has few solid advantages over other languages apart from market share, which should not be a concern for people who are studying computation. It is horrifically verbose, which detracts from being able to reasonably use it as a form of expression on paper or on a blackboard. C# is better in lots of ways, but not really by enough in the ways that matter for teaching. PHP is a horrible mess of a language, and I won't even bother talking about it. Perl, while it's good at what it does, is also a horrible mess from this perspective. Actually saying what a given Perl program will do formally is really difficult and mostly defined by the implementation, not to mention that the syntax is so complicated that the only thing which parses Perl is perl. C is good at certain points for teaching low-level aspects, but I really think there ought to be better options in that regard. It's also certainly not a good first language, as it requires attention to things which are entirely irrelevant to beginners. If you're going to teach imperative and/or OO programming, I'd say Python and Ruby are your best bets from really mainstream stuff. Smalltalk is also a fairly decent language  in this regard if you're willing to go a little less mainstream. For functional programming, there are lots of good options. Scheme is a really excellent language to start with, because there is a wealth of very high quality teaching material for it. SICP is really quite excellent, and it would be hard to go wrong with any course which was modelled after the MIT lectures. Haskell is also a decent language to start with because the reasoning involved is very equational and algebraic, and ties well with mathematics courses. It also has the virtue (!) of being very different from anything students are more likely to have seen in earlier years. This levels the playing field quite a bit, and gets students to think about computation in a new way whether they are new to programming or not. Lazy evaluation ties in nicely with a discussion about the various options for evaluation mechanisms in a language. Even moreso than with most functional languages, it also means that they will learn to program things without any unnecessary sequencing of operations or additional unnecessary state, for reasons which I've touched on above. Anyway, my whole point is really just that the languages which you might feel are appropriate for getting things done in the business world are not necessarily those which are best for students of the theory of computation, and this I feel is a really important point which is being missed or ignored even by some faculties.
Gonzales is so completely obsessed with sex and porn, he makes Ed Meese look like Larry Flint.
Don't forget Muslims. 
Yes, but what can I teach them *first*? You often need to introduce more and more complex ideas as you go. If you have a language that, right off the bat, requires you to declare the variable type and do all kinds of funky things before you can get your first wage-hours-salary program complete, you're going to have several potentially good people get up and quit. But that's okay on what you think. My vote is on Perl for CS 101 students, and then go into more complex languages after that. 
&gt;I could have taken down an 11-year-old boy. I might hurt him rather badly in the process. But that's better than Tasering him Are you stupid or something?  Why do you think tasers are popular?  Why do you think sky diving is popular?  They probably have similar fatality rates.  If skydiving had a near-guarantee that it would result in lasting physical injury (as use of manual, brute force in restraining violent people does), do you think anybody would do it?  *Hell* no. .001% chance of death vs. 50% chance of broken bones, large scars, facial disfigurement, bad knees, torn ligaments, etc.... I'll take that taser, designed and tested by scientists for the best combination of safety and efficacy, **any** day over being tackled by Officer Jim-Bob, who listed "Pig Wrasslin'" under 'prior experience' on his job app and only went back and got his G.E.D. so the Police Academy would let him in.
I live in the Atlanta area, and on tonight's news one of the stations mentioned that the 6th grader weighed **200** pounds. I'm 6 foot 2 and weigh 185. So, I'm not surprised that a taser was needed, twice.
I don't have a Wii yet, but if I get one, I'll see if my mom likes it.
It shows no such thing. We American people are laughing our asses off.  What it shows is how completely out-of-touch our government is with the rest of the country. Edit - Also: America is more religious than I'd like it to be, but not nearly as much as our government would suggest.  The problem is that the religious folks are concentrated in lots of sparsely-populated states in the Midwest, therefore, due to the way our Senate and Electoral College work, they're overrepresented.
Did you say Haskell? I'm sorry, but for all these crickets I have here with your standup routine I couldn't barely make that out. Okay, jokes aside. Good luck with your decision. Perhaps you'll influence a few CS 101 professors. It might improve my job situation by having less competition because a bunch of CS guys never made it out of college. 
That was great. I'm curious about why this is being voted down.
My favorite, the Pengiun on the tele: (BOOOM) Oh dear, the radio's exploded. Hmm. ..... Well what's on the tele then? Looks like a Penguin. I didn't mean what was on the TV set! I meant what program! Oh, well, i 'spect i'll turn it on......  (get's up turns it on, pause......) If it lays an egg, it will fall down the back of the television set. Mm, we'll have to watch that....   *pause* ...unless it's a male Oh, i hadn't thought of that...... it looks fairly butch. Perhaps it's from the zoo. which zoo? how should i know which zoo, i'm not doctor bloody Burnofsky!! how would doctor Burnofsky know which zoo it was from? he knows everything oh, i wouldn't like that, it would take all the mystery out of life BURMA!!!!!! *pause* why'd you say that? i panicked anyway, if it WAS from the zoo, it would have "property of the zoo" stamped on it no it wouldn't! they don't stamp animals "property of the zoo"! You can't stamp a huge lion! they stamp them when they're small! what happen's when they molt? Lion's don't molt! No! But Penguins do! There! I run rings around you logically! Oh intercourse the Penguin! Television announcer: Hello, it's just after 8 o'clock, and time for the Penguin on top of to television set to explode.  BOOOOOM! how did he know that was giong to happen? TV: it was an inspired guess  
Do U use win expolrer?
Yes, think oil drilling platforms
Perl is a terribly complex language. I challenge you just to write out a grammar for its syntax, let alone describe its semantics in a formally meaningful way.
This is a fun tool for any Realtors out there as well as anyone who wants to get their real estate license.
&gt; Reddit will automagically pick up the page &lt;TITLE&gt; of a submission if you leave the title field blank. Does that still work ??..It didn't, for me since the last few weeks..
Thank You! ;)
Britney is just white trash,I said it from the start and I am still saying it.I think she should release the sex tape if there is one for free because K-Fed is only looking to get paid.
Cale: Would using Text.Regex help any in making this more of a one-liner? Just curious, having found that recently in 6.6's release notes.
No kidding, I work out a lot and according to the BMI scale I'm "Obese".. (the scale only works if you have flab and not muscle)
A Place for Michigan Fraud, Investor News, Education, and Michigan Investor Events
Fantastic, cool article, perfectly titled here. Who's voting it down? Why?
I'll second it.  I am much more interested now in Lisp -- partly thanks to Python.
Actually, without any programming knowledge, haskell is way easier to learn than most procedural languages.  I came from an 8 year procedural background, and have been learning haskell for 3 months.  I already love it and work in it more naturally than other languages i've known. Haskell would be a great language to start out on because it gives you a much more logical basis.  I wish I had started with it. Also, as for the droppouts bit - if everyone started using haskell (magically), we'd need a lot fewer programmers, and program quality would go up up up. BTW, PHP is your favorite language? My god...
Stop posting such rants on your computer. Go out into the woods. Prosper?
I think I have read this on reddit before.
My favourite has always been from Vampire Settle On Police Camp: SO! YOU WANT TO ATTACK MY BREAST?
The homophobia of these inbred redneck bible-nuts is getting increasing disturbing.. I hope that gay-couple sued AA, for like a nice tasty settlement..you know, for shoes and stuff..   
Never make a security policy without examining all the attack vectors, weighing them, and then solving the most significant first. Those posts address a common security concern. That is good. Times however, have changed. First, all of my packages/plugins are from gentoo so they have been verified at a cursory level and gpg signed. It's not just random junk from some site on the net, as is the case with most of your links. Second, historical evidence demonstrates that maliciously altering a base package, getting it reviewed and approved in a major distro, and having it in the wild for over a year (about the age of my install) is a highly unlikely attack pattern. A person has limited time to put towards security. Is this particular place the best to focus? Definitely not. Your position reminds me of those who put so much effort into "security" only to be phished or some other trivial attack. A major point- if we were *so* concerned about security then we would not be using linux in the first place. OpenBSD is the demonstrated winner. Ideally though, some sort of chrooted/virtualization approach could be used to allow this separation to be used more consistently for a large number of similar privilege problems. Btw, I am going to upvote you out of spite. There is a reason why forums like slashdot prevent a person from voting on the same thread in which he is commenting.. Finally, my comment was no troll. I've posted the definition of this before, I won't again here. Now, saying that vi is the solution to this problem most definitely **is**. If that was your intention then great, it spurred a lively debate as intended.
But what good is doing backups if your backups are on the same drive as the data you need to recover? Maybe this will save you from accidental deletion, but not from disk failures.
Python sucks less (tm) than many other languages but it has two major problems, both related to performance: 1. It's sloooow  2. Even worse, the GIL is per process! The GIL as it stands is a major mistake in the era of multicore processors.  It doesn't matter if you use multiple interpreters, not only because most of the C-GIL-interface doesn't expect it, but because there are global variables used by Python (and some libs). If you spawn new threads, even in C, they all still share the same GIL.  So, for the moment, forget thread threads -- if you want two processes to be able to operate on the same object at the same time, you have to serialize it and de-serialize it every time a different process wants it!  Yeah, that's super fast. Lisp compiles to roughly half C speed.  Which implementation supports threading?  I mean really supports, not "experimental" buggy crashy stuff. 
Oh, and perl6 does have an implementation - pugs, written in haskell.  First implementation, I believe.
interesting he doesn't appear on any of the other team roster pages? is this an espn joke?
Seconded.  I have a "Common LISP: The Reference" from 1988 by Franz Inc, and about half of the front cover is taken up by a huge all caps "LISP."
First off, it's never too late to change directions.  I switched majors from physics to CS in my last semester at college.  Yes, the department was pissed.  Yes, they said "Absolutely not" when I asked if I could.  They let me anyway, though they delayed my official graduation a semester so that I was officially a CS major for a year (which didn't really matter, since I finished courses on time and could go get a job).  Be prepared to work like a dog though. Anyways, to compete with recent computer science graduates in the workforce, you will need to know: * The language that your prospective employer's looking for.  This will usually be one of: C++, Java, C#, or PHP.  Python, Perl, and Ruby are also often useful.  Typical CS undergrads will usually only know C++ or Java, plus a few languages that are useless in industry.  * The basics of recursion and pointers.  Most CS grads have forgotten these, but they are taught in class, so you look good if you remember them.  * Data structures.  Specifically, you'll need to understand linked lists, binary search trees, vectors, hashtables, possibly heaps, basic complexity theory and big-O notation.  * Simple algorithms.  Sorting is important - you need to know how bubble sort, insertion sort, selection sort, merge sort, and quick sort work, and how to select the correct one for the problem.  Extra points for bucket sort or radix sort.  You will never ever have to write a sorting algorithm once you actually get the job, but it's expected that applicants can do it on a whiteboard.  You should also know binary search.  Many algorithm courses spend a good deal of time on graph algorithms - shortest path, all-pairs shortest path, minimum spanning trees, depth-first search, breadth-first search, etc.  These are also rarely used in industry, but occasionally an interviewer will give you a graph problem as an interview question.  * Concurrency.  For some reason, I got this question from all my prospective employers, and I give it to almost all my interviewees (maybe because I was looking in the financial industry).  You'll be expected to know some of the problems that arise with concurrent programs - deadlocks, race conditions.  You'll also be expected to know some of the common solutions to these problems - synchronized methods (monitors), semaphores, message queues, and so on. That's basically all that the average CS undergrad knows.  As you can see, I hold a fairly dim view of average CS undergrads.  So here are some things that the typical CS undergrad does *not* know that will be useful to a practicing programmer: * IDEs.  Go download Eclipse or Netbeans and play with it.  Most interviewers will want to know what tools you are familiar with - not because they really care, but because knowing *any* of them indicates you've worked on practical programs, and that matters.  Also learn how to use the debugger on your favorite IDE (or gdb if you're an emacs + shell person), because you'll be spending *a lot* of time with it.  * Version control.  Absolutely essential for the working programmer.  All version control systems basically work the same; the interviewer cares more that you have experience with at least one, so you don't try to grab the files you need off another developer's desktop and e-mail them to yourself (as I did at my first job).  The big open-source ones are Subversion and CVS; other popular programs include Visual SourceSafe, Perforce, and Darcs.  * Build systems.  The Java world uses Ant, the C/C++ world uses make, the Haskell world uses Cabal, but you will never encounter Haskell in the real world.  Learn one of those two.  You likely won't be asked about this (most companies have a build system already setup), but you will want to know it when you start work.  * Libraries and toolkits.  Having experience with *one* big framework is a plus, because it shows that you can navigate API docs and link against foreign code and know how to search for appropriate libraries.  I'd pick *one* GUI library and learn it well - some of the big ones are Swing (Java), SWT (Java), .NET (C#/VB/C++), MFC (Windows C++), native Win32 API (Windows C/C++), GTK (UNIX C), QT (UNIX C++), wxWindows (cross-platform C, with bindings for Python and probably many other languages), and Tk (C, I think, with bindings for just about every language).  For networking, learn BSD sockets because it's the base for just about every network library.  Learn the standard file-handling functions for your language of choice.  If you can, learn about mmap and memory-mapped files, and about asynchronous IO via select/poll/epoll.  * Learn regular expressions.  Most uses of them are really horrible abuses that get you in more trouble later (Jamie Zawinski: "Some programmers, when faced with a problem, think 'I know!  I'll just use regular expressions!'  Now they have two problems").  However, they're very good for quick-and-dirty text munging.  Besides, they're theoretically interesting, and some interviewers (i.e. me) like to give out problems involving the theoretical structure of regexps.  * UNIX.  You need to be able to get around via the command line.  Interviewers will probably not ask you this, you'll just feel stupid when you start and don't know how to get around the servers.  You don't need to be an expert sysadmin (unless you're applying for a sysadmin position).  You do need to be able to move around in directories, copy files, edit files, compile things, set environment variables, etc.  * vi (the editor).  Yeah, emacs vs. vi is a holy war.  I don't care - just about every UNIX machine has vi installed, which makes it essential for quick &amp; dirty file editing.  * Design Patterns.  It'll make you sound smart.  Also, it's nice to have a common vocabulary for discussing proposed solutions.  * Refactoring.  You need to get into the habit of doing this automatically, else your code will suck.  If you want a good vocabulary for it, pick up the Martin Fowler book.  Fundamentally, you don't need this - refactoring can be summed up with "If something sucks, fix it", and you'll usually have a good intuitive sense for what's sucky code (hint: if you can't understand it, nobody else can either).  But the Fowler book will help you understand the IDE tools for this better, and again, it's useful for communication.  * Write programs.  Startups are very good.  So are internships and open-source projects.  Make sure you have something to show for your efforts; many places will ask for code samples. Additionally, here are some things that you will never, ever use in the real world, yet will mightily impress a smart interviewer.  Most potential employers will go "Huh?" if you mention one of these, but if you find one that goes "Oh, cool!" and goes off on a tangent with you, you'll know that it's full of smart people: * Advanced languages.  Learn Lisp - Scheme is probably easier to start with, but you can learn Common Lisp if you're feeling ambitious.  Then learn Erlang or SML to get used to pattern-matching, and maybe Ocaml for more practice.  Then you're ready to tackle Haskell, which is about the most advanced non-toy language out there. * Functional programming.  Learn to program without using mutable state - all the advanced languages above are functional ones.  Not only does it sound cool, but it will change the way you think about problems in imperative languages.  You learn how to solve problems in Haskell, and you'll have many fewer bugs in Java.  * Type theory.  The added rigor this brings to your thought process will make you much stronger at solving problems.  Plus, you won't get scared if someone says "Curry-Howard isomorphism" or starts talking about existential types or generalized algebraic data types.  * Theoretical models of computer programming.  Personally I'm partial to lambda calculus, as it's the basis for all these functional programming languages.  Turing Machines are nifty too, though.  Also make sure you understand the Halting Problem and what it means for a problem to be undecidable, what it means for it to be NP-complete, and what it means to have a polynomial-time algorithm.  * Process calculi.  These are formal models of concurrency.  Communicating Sequential Processes is probably the easiest to understand.  The pi calculus is the basis for much of the more recent work, and there's also new stuff like the join calculus.  * Compiler and operating system design.  Learn about lexing, parsing, typechecking, intermediate representations, register allocation, activation records, and instruction selection.  Learn about pipelining, branch prediction, and cache misses.  Learn about scheduling, virtual memory, interprocess communication, and filesystem structure.  It's helpful to understand what's going on at the bits &amp; bytes level, particularly if you ever have to optimize things. Have fun Googling.  Also, I can give you some book recs if you want.
This just in: Poor people are stupid.   Let's take advantage of them!
&gt;And finally, once marijuana is legal, it is effectively no longer available to kids (because we won't sell to kids, right?) and who now resort to harder drugs. The association will be eagerly made by hateful people in the media that liberalizing drug laws equals more harmful drug use by kids. I'd think that it would be easier for kids to obtain, since they could get adults to buy it for them.
Well it's certainly not very nice, but I think it gets quite a bit more despicable. Rape? Murder? Starting unnecessary wars leading to hundreds of thousands of civilian deaths?
Ah, so you prefer PHP because you dislike language design?  Makes sense...
Math is hard.. Let's Go Shopping!
Really, you think your *high IQ* is the problem? Or could it be that your "devilish grin" is actually a pervish leer?
I don't think CS majors have all that stuff. Experienced and excellent programmers have most of that stuff. But most of it is stuff that's not expected of someone just out of college.
Actually it looks like he was the second person to do it. That looks like SO much fun. It really gives you a feel for how big the mountain is if you can decend that fast for that long.
It's actually a really complicated and interesting issue. You got the thrust of it with your statement: "While it is true that patents need to be protected for providing incentives for innovation..." In the past several years of the thousands of new drugs created, only a tiny, tiny fraction have been created specifically for the developing world. There's just no money over there for the companies to recoup their costs. Anyway, you say: "How wlse can one explain that a one dollor a day anti-Aids drugs can be manufactured and marketed by Cipla profitably, whereas the Big Pharma charges atleast $400 for that." I agree that $400 is probably excessive. On the other hand, it takes on average about $800 million in R&amp;D to develop a new drug, which is more than Cipla makes in a year selling all their drugs. So the answer to how they can sell it for $1 is that they don't have research costs to overcome. Another interesting thing is that when pharmaceutical companies *have* allowed for much cheaper selling in developing countries, those drugs always find their way back to the US.
Which bones and how did he break them? Not doubting you, just curious.
You are right...this is old news...but is still apt to fuck with people's heads that don't understand science or stats.  "There are no female Mozarts for the same reason there are no female Jack The Rippers."  - Camille Paglia.  Some chicks get it.
C++, but only because *all* code is ugly in C++. Beauty is relative.
&gt;Does this not ignore the issue of stack vs. heap? In high performance C, I tend to do very little dynamic allocation Hopefully :-), generational GCs will evolve enough to allow us not to think about stack/heap at all. It's a very low-level design issue, so, for the most part, we just shouldn't care. Obviously, with C/++ we do. Pitty!
Your objection just sounds like bigotry.  Python is so useful that the only person you're punishing is yourself. 
The sooner you get over worrying where Math starts and Computer Science ends, the better. The two are intimately related.
How about app settings? Lots (if not most) apps don't follow the, um, best practices you describe.
Do you really want to reveal this much?
According to that logic, if you see a comment you like buried deep in the comment hierarchy, you should upmod its parent comment, the parent of comment of its parent comment, and so on up the hierarchy. Similarly, it would be OK to upmod the parent comment of this thread if someone found a good comment in the thread. In practice, this doesn't work.  Users leave OK comments alone, downmod comments that rub them the wrong way, and upmod comments they like. &gt;(anyone who's bothered by being downmodded is fucking retarded) You mean, anyone who's bothered by being downmodded is a woman, a gay man, or someone who's having a bad day.  In other words, being bothered or not is an emotional question, not an intellectual one. You'll have a hard time getting laid if you equate thinking emotionally with being a fucking retard.  (Or at least that's what my friend said, and I think he gets laid a lot, or else the girls probably wouldn't call him 'Sexy Mcgill'.)
Probably memory-mapped files with dirty writes not yet written to disk.  You wouldn't want the inconsistent file off disk in any case.  The error message, though unhelpful, is a safeguard against more subtle problems later.
Same for yours.
First, read this: http://www.pathname.com/fhs/pub/fhs-2.3.html . Try to understand the rationale for each separation. This conversation will cannot go anywhere useful without an understanding of these concepts. I am certain that no one here will bother, so here's my quick rundown: * Writable data is separated from frequently modified data. This is major for backups. * User data is separated from system data. What if you want to migrate all of your data to a totally new system layout. Windows makes that a nightmare. Also makes a secure encryption system a huge pain. * system data is separated from site-wide data, ala /usr/share * predictable location of installed files and directories. Many windows apps still install to c:!! and other strange places. * certain partitions need to be available at different times. the /boot first, and /root has to be around even if /home dies. * Much more. Yes, achieving so many goals is complicated. If you can state that windows' fs layout in one short sentence then you know it's not achieving sh*t! &gt; which could be symlinked--I don't know what it's called--into another drive It's called **mountpoints** and in the most incredible show of inferiority, windows doesn't support it!! Really, without this, everything just has gone downhill. &gt; And there're always system variables (%TEMP%, %APPDATA, etc.) How is that unpredictable? How about that damn registry???? Just how do you propose that gets backed up. LFS has a better solution.. /etc Really, FS layout on windows is perhaps the worst disaster that Redmond ever let out. It's the feature that I despise the most. I should probably leave this thread now, before I break my keyboard in half.. 
Does this surprise anyone?
Is Java really increasing in use along with C++???
The only thing that interrupts the pleasure of seeing how Keith makes his arguments powerful, eloquent, and relevant is that his commentaries make me as angry as he is at this subjects. Which is the point. Newt is an ass.
It could happen to you...
It appears to be legit, and is corroborated elsewhere: http://scoreboards.aol.com/football/ncaaf1aa/player/22957/player_gamelog.aspx Apparently he's since changed his name: http://www.deadspin.com/sports/college-football/ladies-and-gentlemen-meet-lucious-pusey-188653.php ..and he's now better known as Lucious Seymour: http://sportsillustrated.cnn.com/football/ncaa/players/46584/index.html
It'd be better if the chart was rectangular instead of circular.  A circle makes it more difficult to compare years.  Maybe we should recommend some of Tufte's books for them? 
Why PHP?  I don't like declaring variables. It's a waste of time. I know that could introduce typos, but I tell you I get more done without this. I do good debugging and catch stuff on my own without having my IDE catch this. Sure, throwing all the functions into the global namespace -- yeah, that sucks a lot. But that's what we've got until the community can convert it. I wish they would phase in namespaces in PHP6 and then phase out the old global namespace (as far as functions go) by around PHP8, or provide an INI option to turn it off right away. Having to use -&gt; when a perfectly good "." will do, yeah, that sucks too. Using "." as a concatenator could still work because a future PHP could require "&lt;space&gt;.&lt;space&gt;" for it to be considered a concatenator. (Perhaps I can figure out a way to hook the PHP dev environment compiler with my own C code to do this? Of course, then my open source projects would then have to get bundled with this forked PHP environment then. Might only be a good solution for an office environment.) Lack of Unicode support -- I expect that to get fixed soon. Right now I have to hook it with functions that switch data to HTML entities, convert the international characters to English characters, and then convert it back. That's a bit of a speed hit and I use it only where necessary. Some purists would rather store the data in Unicode format, but most of my stuff doesn't need international support. I just want to block the app from crashing or returning a funky search result because it stored stuff with international characters. Function parameter order all screwed up -- yeah, I hope that gets fixed when PHP acquires a namespace. With so much talk about PHP and namespaces, I anticipate, and hope very much, that it adds it in and migrates all the functions in the current global namespace to it. But other than that, there's not much else I would think it needs. 
I have no idea how i should feel about this, i'm so conflicted.  my dad was a chemist. i know the facts behind big pharma. most of it isn't evil assholes hoarding cash. their profit margins, generally, are fucking *LOW*, so cipla is fucking over those companies by stealing profis from their 1 successful drug for the 20-50 failed ones where billions were spent and it didn't pan out.  on the other hand.. they're helping to save lives. :/  though, most countries enforce a profit margin on new drugs anyway, so the us ends up subsidizing new drug development. you know that? it's kinda insane :/   
Please elaborate.
"Checked" via online test or via qualified psychologist?  I know several girls that scored around 160 on an online IQ test.  Granted, *everybody* I know who took that test scored around 160.  Hmmm....
Holy shit!
&gt; In height, hair color and body weight there seems to be just as much variability in females as there is in males. I'm not sure I'm buying it. Cite a source. &gt; Come to think of it, wasn't there a story a while back about how blond hair arose first in females in order for them to attract more males? This doesn't prove "women have equal or greater variability than men". Was it supposed to?
We do not need to introduce Mohammad Yousuf, the Pakistani batsman who converted his religion last year. It is very interesting to add some facts on his conversion. Yousuf’s batting average was 47.36 when he was a Catholic. Now his batting average is 83.06 over the last few seasons. Did it happen because of change in the religious faith or something else?
I haven't heard of this case, but are you referring to trademark perhaps?
Are the 'ONE'?
&gt; The reason you get downmodded so much around here is that you are the kind of person who chooses what tools you like based on what your manager wants. Yep, and damn proud of it. I have a boss who knows a decent amount of tech, a lot about business, and who listens to the developers. In return, I only bring him tech that I can stand behind.  &gt; This is mostly a community of people who love programming even when they're not being paid for it, and they don't like it when people say that since some PHB won't sign off on X, X is worthless. I'm not expecting that they would like it, but look at it from my perspective. I'm a software developer, I love making peoples life easier through software. For people like me, programming languages are tools, means to an end.  
Yes, I have to use C for low level OS API programming on Linux (thankfully). What I want to know if there are ways to manage an increasing code base with support for unit testing as in other languages.
Satirical news, sports, entertainment, web comics and video.  It's like a daily newspaper of made up stuff.
How about you do some work on your own finding "serious citations"? Although, most modern evolution textbooks have the relevant links and facts.
What textbooks have you seen? At least both TAOCP and "Introduction to Algorithms" by Cormen et al. use = for this purpose.
Interesting...in my anecdotal experience riding the subway in Boston, women are *more* likely to be reading the paper than men. I never understood the supposed correlation between reading the paper and IQ or intellectual curiosity.  Reading the news doesn't make you smart; I'd argue that with today's "soundbite culture", it actually makes you stupid.  Reading *books*, working on *problems*, and talking to *people* makes you smart.  I generally see women doing those a lot more than men (who waste their time on silly things like Reddit), so IQ or not, I tend to think women are smarter.
Ah, what language do you program in, Oh Great One?
What happened to talking to people?
Can you explain this to me. I've heard John Taylor Gatto point out that the prison population is the same size as the military, but I wasn't able to find the significance of it.
This comment delivers.
+1, and http://www.gigamonkeys.com/book/
via the [Haskell wiki](http://haskell.org/haskellwiki/Humor).
/me inserts Python skit.
The problem was flying faster than sound in an airplane. Guns were already accelerating bullets to greater than mach 1.
Funny, I tend to call these things [batshit](http://del.icio.us/jdunck/batshit).
I had assumed the GPL2 made it worthless.   If someone else wants to throw this onto the programming subreddit, feel free.  I'm not staying up to get around the filter telling me I am submitting to fast.
One word: DMCA.  Okay more than one.  You shouldn't be shocked because, according to the DMCA *gasp* it IS illegal to link to copyrighted material.  Sorry to burst the collective outrage bubble but it's on the books. *Disclaimer* This doesn't mean I agree with it.
Help! I don't get the dropWhile/dropWhile' example on pages 8/9. This is supposed to return a list from which the first elements satisfying p are dropped, paired with the original list. Here is the code:  dropWhile' p = fold f v  where    f x (ys, xs) = (if p x then ys else x : xs, x : xs)    v   = ([], []) Now I don't get how this can even type, as the if expression returns either a list or a pair of lists. Also, I don't get how the list pair is making any difference. In a strict language there is no way to implement dropWhile with a fold(r), because the evaluation order is wrong, from the inside out. foldl would do the trick pretty well though. Thus there must be something related to lazy evaluation here (even if Mr. Hutton doesn't appear to be concerned about strict vs. lazy), but I can't see how it works or why it should work only on the paired list result case and not also on the single list result case.
No, it wasn't the town.  It was the homeowners association, which has no more affiliation with the town than a mcdonald's in the town does.
&gt; our entire holistic perceptions of people may be bullshit. This is news?
You do know that he probably pronounces Lucious as 'loo shus', not 'lush us' (luscious), right?   Maybe his last name starts with the 'pus' sound, not 'puss'.  However at this point we've descended to the Uranus debate: do you prefer urinous or your anus?
Credit is just like anything else in life, it can be advantageous or it can be destructive. Your outcome depends on how you use it. There are plently of situations where borrowing on interest is in your best financial interest. An example would be student loans, some of them have such low interest rates they dont keep up with inflation hence you pay back less then you borrowed.
I never said I doubted that science couldn't someday figure out why we do in fact have free will.  I'm suggesting that, like consciousness, free will may be one of those whole is greater than the parts deal.  Nothing about chemistry or cells says free will, but connect them in a trillion ways back by 500 million years of evolution, it may be a possibility.  And it would cool if science one day undertood how free will works, and consiousness too.  I meany how it "really" works.
He really should get Tab Mix Plus extension and have tabs in multiple rows.
Simple: skill as a developer correlates poorly with skill as a UI designer.
My quick and dirty answer... Use C++ if you can and minimize your use of pointers, encapsulating them when you need them. Unit test heavily (with any language).  CPPUnit offers a workable testing framework. The best reference I've found is the C++ Standard Library by Josuttis: http://www.josuttis.com/libbook/
http://programming.reddit.com/info/6bm5/comments
Seymour... setting himself up for failure when he has kids.
This is true. He still has a right to free speech, however.  You have a right to not read / view his material. The guy might be a donk but this arrest appears to be wrong.  Given that it is Jones, there may be extenuating circumstances that aren't being explained...  such as if it's not truly a public assembly, perhaps?  i.e. a private event that he crashed.  If it was public then the cops were in the wrong.
Haskell's precedence rules are throwing you.  f x (ys, xs) = (if p x then ys else x : xs, x : xs) parses as  f x (ys, xs) = ((if p x then ys else x : xs), (x : xs)) To answer the second part of your question: I find it easiest to think about fold in terms of replacing (:) with an arbitrary binop and [] with an arbitrary constant.  Thus, foldl becomes:  ((((elem1 `op` elem2) `op` elem3) `op` ...) `op` c) And foldr becomes:  (elem1 `op` (elem2 `op` (elem3 `op` (... `op` c)))) Now, anytime your op (`f` in the example) includes a cons, you *have to* use foldr.  Cons is always right-associative, so if you replace cons by cons but change the expression from right-associative to left-associative, you've changed the meaning. Since dropWhile uses cons (or a function thereof), we must use foldr.  However, foldr works from right-to-left.  And dropWhile's effect is to throw away the leftmost part of the list.   Fold has only the information in its return value available; if you need more information in the computation, you need to explicitly put it into a tuple and pass that down the computation. See why we need to save the original list now?  If we didn't, dropWhile would've already thrown it away by the time it determines whether or not to keep it. The rest of the function's pretty simple, once you get the precedence right.  With each step of the fold function, we add the left element onto the front of our total list.  We also check to see if it fits our predicate.  If so, we drop it (i.e., return ys, the previous return value).  If not, we cons it on to the head of the result list.  The second element of the pair is effectively an accumulator that stores the reconstructed list; the first element of the pair is a pointer into that list that stores where the new list should start.   Strict vs. lazy doesn't matter with fold, except for efficiency &amp; nontermination.  You do have to watch out for one thing: foldl is tail-recursive in a strict language, but builds up an O(N) chain of unevaluated thunks in a lazy language.  As a result, most Haskell programmers either use foldr or foldl', the strict version of foldl.
Do you know what this means? A Software QA guy was actually given enough power to put a "ship" on hold.
Hum. Well, let's successively rephrase it. Statistics was even evented my A LOT of men:) Statistics was even evented the many men I've had. Statistics was even the cause of the event of the many men I've had. Odds are, *somebody* would have as many men as I have.
On the back of recent launches with Vox in Europe, Starbucks and Skype have joined forces together to built the world’s first global private WiFi network. Customers at Starbucks will be able to use the WiFi connection at any of the participating Starbucks for free, when they purchase a coffee. At the time of ordering, the customer will be given a reusable USB token that will allow them to register their machine for a dedicated period of time, allowing the free WiFi access.
Dead people generally sleep quite soundly.
I'm not sure if Lisp's problems are documentation and user friendliness. Take a look at Haskell and OCaml. Both have friendly and active communities (seems especially true of Haskell), piles of documentation (OCaml has great docs), and they're both relatively easy to set up and start coding. You don't see them catching up to Python though.
are all movies gonna start to open like this?!
HaHA!   I go to school with this kid! He has changed his name to Lucious Seymour There is a whole facebook group dedicated to how he is a "pusey" for changing his name. http://eiu.facebook.com/group.php?gid=2204865299
Bullshite, Adobe. Flash 9 is lagging behind for Linux because you don't care, and you have devoted few resources. From reading [your linux developers blog)(http://blogs.adobe.com/penguin.swf/2006/05/) this has been very clear. The guy porting it (yes one guy) knows next to nothing about *nixes and  again and again asks reveals the fact he's just spent two days struggling trying to get foo to install when he should be using bar, and it's already installed. I truly pity the guy, tasked with a job Adobe cares little for, for a comunity that cares a lot, and do it with a blog.
Ahh.. very disappointing, this law.
All that seemed to really indicate was that PHP lacked good Unicode support, namespaces, and security violations because people turn off magic quotes and don't inspect their SQL before posting it to the database (thus getting SQL injection attacks). I turn off magic quotes and inspect my SQL. For Unicode, I know that's coming. For namespaces, I am strongly trying to encourage the community to consider it because it simply makes sense. Another thing that would be useful in PHP namespaces is the ability to permit automatic lookups if I use a special keyword like "using". For instance: Instead of: $sResult = Strings-&gt;Substr($sSource, $nStart, $nLen); I could use: Using Strings; $sResult = Substr($sSource, $nStart, $nLen); But I dunno -- perhaps it needs more discussion in the community to come up with the right technique. I'm also not a big fan of the "-&gt;", but I use it because I have to do so. If I could use "." and make all my string concatenation either with another character or use "&lt;space&gt;.&lt;space&gt;" I would do so in a heartbeat. 
I don't follow some of those jumps, but I love it.
How do you put bookmarks next to the start menu?
Yeah, the ratio was inverted as well as the axis. One was yen / dollar and the other was dollar / euro.  So the math was right, it just looked a little unnatural.
I didn't read the link because I was laughing too hard at the name of the site.   What's an endo-fart?  Not sure I want to got to a web site whose name means inside a fart :-)  John. 
i am sorry, scale matters in the universe. its cute and reassuring to talk about how once crossing the ocean was considered "impossible" (yet we did it!!) and how once breaking the sound barrier was "impossible" (yet we did it!!!), but these do not relate to interstellar travel.  why? because scale matters in the universe. it matters that sailing the ocean is a 7000 mile journey while proxima centauri is 4.2 light years away (don't bother going there, we already know it would be a waste of time). its not just an issue of, ah shucks! trying!. no. that people draw such analogies i can only conclude comes from a deeper knowledge of science fiction than science fact. i doubt even in the context of his comments would stephen hawking tell you that your analogy is valid.
*There are twice as many men with an IQ of 120-plus as there are women, there are 30 times the number of men with an IQ of 170-plus as there are women.* No wonder it's almost impossible to find interesting women to date.
Their illegal business practices are not soley the ones they perform by virtue of being a monopoly. Alot of their questionable practices aren't strictly illegal, or it is hard to prove them esp since they've paid for good lawyers from the start.
If narcissism was a disease, Olbermann would have killed himself by now; to argue that Gingrich wants to do away with freedom is to be an infantile, liberal fool - a common condition these days.  Sad.
And what is that reason?
argghh! how do you plan to learn about a planet you haven't visited yet?????? plan on waiting 10k years for r2d2 to return with a report? do you know how humans have "learned" about the "unknown" in history? they put it in their mouths.  one guy watched the other choke so he knew not to eat the poopoo. now thats putting it in a crude manner, we of course have test and measurement equipment that will only become more advanced, but all this will tell is that something that is toxic is in fact toxic. if you could just push a button to sanitize the ecology of another planet, you wouldn't have to leave earth!  
&gt; My dog would make a better president then Bush [Are](http://www.buzzflash.com/contributors/03/10/con03161.html) [you](http://www.workingforchange.com/comic.cfm?itemid=17850) [sure](http://www.workingforchange.com/comic.cfm?itemid=17611)? 
Wow - the two new features are better access to the windows features... Also, NTFS has nothing to do with networking. The files are written to the hard drive by the host, not the client.
They rapped?  Where does it say that?  Or mention O'Reilly except to give context to this Ludacris guy?
i was going to write a detailed answer but you should just review high school science instead
Learn the phrase Contributory Negligence. You might not agree with it but, it's currently the law in the US. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Contributory_negligence
you are part of a long line of posters who sadly understands science fiction better than science fact. at least you are willing to admit it!
OUTSTANDING
&gt; Yeah, but the lambda returned from the slavaiswrong function cannot mutate the lexical variable a, so I'm right, as always. I'm gonna call BS on this; plenty of pure functional languages have closures but make it hard or impossible to mutate _any_ variable, closure or no. Meanwhile, the fact remains that a piece of code is accessing a variable which normally would be out of scope, but which was preserved or "closed over". Hence, it's a closure and no amount of weaseling will make you right.
http://www.cstar.com/preview10Items.html  ...by the way
It's a miracle that this doesn't bring aliens to Earth or create some kind of [Hutchison Effect](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hutchison_effect). Oh, no wait! I can just see it now. Two dorm girls go down for popcorn. One turns her back to get the napkins while the other puts the popcorn in to turn it on. Poof. When the other girl turns around, she says, "Jamie? Where did you go?" Somewhere in the middle of town in ancient Egypt, a really dumb blonde in pajamas appears. 
http://video.google.ca/videoplay?docid=-2565287072886554182&amp;q=psa+joe
My head was turning on every change of direction and it looked like his feet were barely hitting the ground, I just loved that. Is this a new sport?
Don't point it at your eyes.
That IS X-treme
Take the test -- do you have what it takes to be a venture capitalist?
Australian free advertising portal, classifieds, personals, free website, online games and forums
Designing usable UIs is part of being a developer. Denying this is arrogance (*scoff*, those end users are stupid and I don't want to bother with a nice UI, *scoff*)
I figured Auren for a bottom.
I'm not sure what urinous is so I prefer my anus :) To add something, I was thinking his last name could be pronounced pooh-say.
Sorry.  zip()
yeah, the point is Morgan Freeman just promoted the link on Leno, I wasn't aware that movies are marketed this way now?  Is this a trend?
It is hard to sympathize with big pharma and their position on IP when they spend twice as much on sales and marketing as they do on R&amp;D.  See http://finance.google.com/finance?fstype=ii&amp;cid=664730. 
"do you prefer urinous or your anus?" I prefer her anus.  Well... that was easy. (damn you deadfones, for making a joke before me!)
Here is another video that gives a better perspective of what the setup looks like: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u156J537Eow And without snow, you need a real glider: http://youtube.com/watch?v=dg3Ui7lW3FY People here in California strap on gears like this and take off by just jumping off cliffs.
And what exactly would a "geto" mother be Kramer?  Jeez!!!
The question: [How many 5 year-olds could you take on at once?](http://forumserver.twoplustwo.com/showflat.php?Cat=&amp;Number=1556673&amp;page=0&amp;view=collapsed&amp;sb=9&amp;o=14&amp;fpart=1&amp;vc=1)
People who spell Lisp in all caps tend to have a conception of it which is frozen in time since the 70's; slow interpreted "AI" language with only linked lists as a data type...
How about I get all my taxes back, and the government spends a few thousand dollars less on institutionalized puritanism?
They're Russians, they probably know how to drive on ice. I live in one of the coldest habited places in the world. We drive on ice all the time and don't lose control. Just takes know-how and practice - and yeah it that includes "slamming" on breaks. Whenever I drive with friends down south in the winter they are always freaking out thinking i'm going to crash.. took me awhile to realise that in most places, people don't learn how to drive effectively in a variety of cold conditions. This is Lefortovo Tunnel - Moscow
&gt; I'm a software developer, I love making peoples life easier through software. For people like me, programming languages are tools, means to an end. I have similar goals and principles, but wildly different interpretations.  My parents use the computer *only* for e-mail, websurfing, and word processing.  I suspect they're like most older folks in that regard.  I perpetually have to clean up after their mess - not because they did anything wrong, but because the the software makes it impossible to do anything right.  Crashes, misconfigurations, spyware, viruses, freezes, deadlocks, lost data - just about everything that can go wrong with computers does go wrong. Then I look at the code I write.  As a quick &amp; dirty estimate, 70% of my bugs are due to mismanaged mutable state - the system does not currently hold the data I expect.  Another 20% are type errors of some sort.  Only about 10% of defects are logical errors, cases where I didn't actually understand the problem enough.  (This is for JavaSE programming - when I factor in the Unified Expression Language that Sun saw fit to introduce with JavaEE, 50% of my bugs are mistyped tag/attribute/variable names.) Then I look at Haskell, which has completely eliminated state from the programming process.  It has also completely eliminated type errors.  That is 90% of bugs, **gone** - they simply can't happen.  It's not *hiding* bugs, it's not *testing* for bugs - the types of errors that you make with mainstream programming languages simply cannot occur.  In my actual experience programming with Haskell, programs are usually correct once they pass the typechecker.  If they're not, it's typically either some cosmetic issue that can be fixed in literally 30 seconds, or I didn't understand the language somewhere. I'm willing to put up with a lot of pain to never pick up a debugger again. If there was no C++, there would be no buffer overflows.  It sounds like simplistic hyperbole, but it's not: the memory model of most other languages simply doesn't allow it.  If there were no null pointers, there would be no NullPointerExceptions.  If everyone used languages that make you declare variables before you use them, you wouldn't have mistyping errors that silently propagate bad values through the program. Languages matter.  There are *huge* classes of problems that can be eliminated - completely - with some of these newfangled languages.  The problem is, they usually introduce new classes of problems, and they require that you solve the old ones again.  That's a big barrier to entry.  But I think that things are fundamentally broken enough in the software industry that it'll pay off, over the next 10-20 years.
Draconian 2.0
I wonder how far we can take this.  Is it wrong to try to gain an advantage from anyone who is less able than you yourself?  Where is that fine line that everyone talks about crossing?
Good, but I'd guess a good 75% of these are exagerated or flat out wrong. A few of them I personally know to be false.
dude ... End of Art! I really hope you were being humorous =\
Could someone just silence O'Reilly please.  Who has to raise their voice to make a point?  Someone who can't rely on the lucidity of their arguments.
What does this have to do with Java? And for what its worth, last time I tried it, the VisualWorks GUI toolkit was far less usable than Swing on Mac OS X. Lots of flicker, funny looking widgets.
Just curious, but what if you're atheist and to hold office requires swearing on the bible (though as the article points out, it's not the case in this instance)? 
Really smart people, especially really smart programmers can be a pain to work with.  While I wouldn't go so far as to say that's a rule, it sure seems like a trend.  Software is developed by teams, if the team doesn't function well it doesn't matter that it's made up of the A group.
&gt; But other than that, there's not much else I would think it needs. I would think that the list you provided would be enough to at least disqualify it as a favorite, if not judge it as "barely usable". Either way, that you consider that list of deficiencies nearly complete - not to mention at all acceptable - goes beyond being laughable into just plain sad. Please put some serious effort into learning another (hopefully non-broken) language, for you and your co-worker's sakes as much as ours.
Here's a good one to start with: 133... the bill in question is a $50 note, not a $2 one -- look it up. And it's not completely sure whether that is the case. Don't believe everything you read.
is this for real? starbucks will own everything soon.
Not as crazy as this one http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=O4uSJWp3gVQ And this one is extreme but not too extreme given the circumstances: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hMiI0iL8BZQ
&gt; A normal person wouldn't steal pituitaries. Who wants to be *normal*, anyway? I don't care about being popular or fitting in. I want to do my own thing no matter what other people think. I'm going to go steal some pituitaries, and I DON'T CARE IF YOU DON'T THINK I'M COOL!!!
I guess it's one thing to make a common sense determination that unwanted babies are probably not going to be born into nurturing environments.   But now we have empirical data.  You're absolutely right, this is pretty obvious stuff.  What they will not say because it's not quite politically correct is that, therefore abortion is a good thing.  You're only killing people who would have had miserable lives.  Just like that Freakenomics guy who's data was used by people to say that abortion reduced the amount of criminals so abortion was a good thing. They like to leave the conclusion out there like low hanging  fruit for you to pick from their data. "The fetuses that we abort would have been criminals or been disadvantaged, ...Hmmmmm.  I wonder what conclusions we can draw from that Mildred?"
#144: a grep on .*dous$ returns nearly 50 results. #136, I also get "amt, undreamt, adreamt."
there are a few entries i disagree with, but a pretty entertaining read regardless
Riii--ght. Yeah, I believe that one. Sure, pal. 
Funny, I've had working Parrot code in the Parrot repository for years.  Are you running DNF on your machine or something?
.#167: a human eye can distinguish between 500 shades of grey... yeah right. Open up photoshop and try to find the difference between #A0A0A0 and #A1A1A1, or even worse, #000000 and #010101. No chance. And that's only 256.
Yeah here is what [snopes had to say about the American flag](http://www.snopes.com/business/money/redensign.asp)
I can't take it anymore... there is just too much utter bullshit that can't possibly be shown to be wrong: A study of 200000 ostriches showed that in 80 years, none of them stuck their head in the sand? How the hell am I supposed to show that that is wrong, even though it obviously is?
That Beretta video from your link is crazy.
Science-centric education would be a better target for *everyone*, not just women.
Amy Sohn? is that a Korean name?
I'm pretty sure the DMCA says no such thing. Everything on the Internet is copyrighted material unless the copyright has expired or it was specifically put into the public domain. That would effectively render hyperlinks illegal. Sounds silly to me. The DMCA contains a few provisions that suck pretty badly, but this isn't one of them.
Did you even read the linked article? It's about more than just Unicode, namespaces and security. http://tnx.nl/php Suggesting Perl over Python is absurd. You should learn Python so that you can see how similar they are (both are byte compiled, both have ref-counting memory management, both use _the_ implementation as a spec, both added lexical scope at some point in their evolution) and that the advantage of Python (aside from commercial use) is greater simplicity and consistency. For example, Python doesn't have Perl's flip-flop operator '..' (and '...') (when evaluated in scalar context) and that's a _good thing_ for an intro class. http://www.linuxjournal.com/article/3882 Aside from all of that, I still think that CTM is a great way to introduce programming, even though Oz syntax is somewhat strange. http://www.info.ucl.ac.be/~pvr/book.html
Yes the Fox folk aspire to neanderthality
So somebody at Fox apparently read mark cuban's blog. http://reddit.com/info/t78o/comments It won't work. Any "victories" will ultimately destroy Fox's mindshare. Family Guy and the Simpsons have much shorter shelf lives and value without the active fan base.
A book I've found to be excellent is Peter Van der Linden's, "Deep C Secrets". It is not presented in the, "55 ways to..." fashion, but it does cover a lot of the darker corners of C and teaches you why certain things are the way they are. My personal favorite books pertaining to C programming are:  * The C programming Language (Kernighan &amp; Ritchie)  * C, A Refernce Manual (Harbison &amp; Steele)  * C Traps &amp; Pitfalls (Koenig)  * C Interfaces &amp; Implementations (Hanson)  * Deep C Secrets (Peter Van der Linden)  * Memory as a Programming Concept in C and C++ (Franek) 
Fox will quickly alienate its own content consumers and be viewed just as negatively as the RIAA. Dumb. Dumb. Dumb.
Who was the first?
  Everyday there’s a new a post with ‘My Favourite Plugins’. Well, here's a list of Wordpress plugins NOT to install. List of wordpress plugins to UNINSTALL OR NOT INSTALL if you want your pages to load nice and fast and to reduce cpu and bandwidth usage.
thaimassagen in berlin
I have. I learned C#, Perl, Python, Java, and dabbled a little in Ruby. I invested several months of time in C# and almost a whole year on Java. I also have done Pike, Fortran, VB/ASP, Pascal, COBOL, RPG, C, C++, and, god forbid, Prograph. During my Mac days I did Symantec's Think C. I'm nearly 40 and have been working with PCs and languages since I was 14. But PHP's deficiencies have not outweighed the deficiencies in any other language. I simply get more done in PHP and in shorter time. Pike has some interesting things in it that I liked, however. And if it weren't for my work in PHP, I'd be doing Perl on Linux, more than likely. I also like C++ and C, but I'd have to use a really think abstraction framework on that so that I could focus just on the business process I want and less on the semantics of the language. 
Excellent. [They should start hosting Fox media content....](http://reddit.com/info/t672/comments)
not mainstream? look up gentoo! The best part about using python is that it has far better error reporting than any other language I've seen. 95% of the time it leads me right to my coding error. My experience has been that 90% of the time spent in introductory computer classes is *wasted* on tracking down trivial errors.
Thaimassage in Berlin
Photoshopworthy!
Zanimiva ugotovitev glede na trenutno politično situacijo najdena v Mencingerjevem delu Moja hoja na Triglav it leta 1897.
It would be great if it were easier to write your own scripting programming language based on a common runtime. It would be sort of like [Parrot](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Parrot_virtual_machine) but easier. Using a common, Pike-like or Perl-like metalanguage, you define the language semantics and rename the functions, statements, and control structures inherent in the runtime namespace. If your language becomes popular enough, then everyone uses it. 
http://www.udel.edu/educ/gottfredson/reprints/pubtopics.htm#life  Please shut the hell up.
Let's torture him for having a ridiculous name. LOLercoaster Then let's find black people and make fun of them for being black. choco-choco coo coo for coco puffs! LOL!!!
But strangely enough, US goods bought in Canada still don't have the proper exchange rate. A perfect example is the Economist magazine; it's -way- more than a 0.88 US to CDN conversion.
LOL, I totally missed the hidden message.
http://itre.cis.upenn.edu/~myl/languagelog/archives/003420.html  Yay for retards with anecdotes!
vSocial, Relic Games some of them i recognize but cant remember from where shows up uncreative a lot of places are
http://www.udel.edu/educ/gottfredson/reprints/pubtopics.htm#life  Maybe you have no clue what you're talking about?
This has been discussed before, but atheists don't hold office. Or rather, when they do, they lie about being an atheist. It's political death to not believe in God. Funny, for a country which advocates separation of church and state. Oh well.
Why not change the first name (seymour pusey)?
Then don't post it.
The divorce fact is so sad...
&gt; From what I've read about IQ tests, most of them are deliberately designed to yield identical means for the two sexes. Well, shoot.  We could design the world's fairest IQ test.  Same results for everyone! My dog just got an IQ result of 2 million, making him as smart as me!   And you!  And a cardboard box! :P
&gt; "RE: Unauthorized Use of Fox Properties - 24, FAMILY GUY, FIREFLY, FUTURAMA, KING OF THE HILL, MY NAME IS EARL and THE SIMPSONS" If I would get an email with such a subject, I would consider it spam, and not even read it. Isn't spamming illegal?   
Amazon? Which is actually suggested in original article.
bah i could have done it at 8 years old if .net was around back then
So it would seem.  What's the competing ideology?
He must be named after his mother.... ;-)
Woah, a book on F# [is on the way](http://www.apress.com/book/bookDisplay.html?bID=10240)! &gt; Functional programming (FP) is the future of .NET programming, and F# is much more than just an FP language. Every professional .NET programmer needs to learn about FP, and there’s no better way to do it than by learning F#—and no easier way to learn F# than from Foundations of F#.  &gt;   &gt; If you’re already familiar with FP, you’ll find F# the language you’ve always dreamed of. And all .NET programmers will find F# an exciting real-world alternative to C# and Visual Basic. This book is likely to have many imitators, but few true competitors. Written by F# evangelist Rob Pickering, and tech reviewed by F#’s inventor, Don Syme, this is an elegant, comprehensive introduction to all aspects of the language and an incisive guide to using F# for real-world professional development. F# is the future of programming (not just on .NET), and the future is now. APress seems to have an amazingly hip attitude towards functional programming compared to O'Reilly.
Good point. Can we raise the age from 30 to, say, 46?
I would be willing to chip in for a billboard with a Granny who "won't give it up."
Does anyone think the USA is in dire straits when foreign countries start dumping the USA dollar like I've been hearing about? Could that cause another Depression (or Depression-like) era in the USA? I keep hearing about this but need more info to form an opinion. 
Don't go just yet. I like this sort of conversation, because I can actually learn something from it. [This was what I meant](http://img84.imageshack.us/img84/7127/scr00438oj8.png), and [this is probably what you meant](http://img83.imageshack.us/img83/1446/scr00437iz5.png). Notice how I have my home folder in C:\Users\Alpha, and my Pictures folder in B:\Pictures, which is actually on a network drive located on another machine. Windows has been natively supporting both features since 2000 (though the latter is only available with NTFS drives). Before that I had to make shortcuts, which, admitted, could be a nightmare for maintenance. I like many things in the LFS layout, such as how everything has been well-seperated consistently for decades, but that leads to another annoyance (at least to me) as well: why is it that they have to call user 'usr', and temp 'tmp', while 'home', 'root' and 'boot' can have their 4-letter luxery? While is it that most distros name stuff in users' home folder in properly Capitalized English, while almost everything else is in lowercase txtspk?? And why is there a folder called etc? Is that where you stuff 'everything else' in? And you call that hierachy!? (Yeah I know /etc is for config files, but why wasn't it named so?) Had these things been changed, older applications would break as well! Windows is unarguably inferior when it comes to system backups, but many of your concerns are outdated. User data is now technically seperated from system data (as it has been for over 6 years), but there are a lot of legacy applications out there whose programmer would not bother to follow convention (remember that Windows has a much wider developer base, and thus of lower quality on the average as well). Registry is one hell of a nightmare, and Microsoft realizes its mistake, but breaking 70% of existing software when releasing a new version of an OS is simply not acceptable. I tried to state Windows' FS layout in one sentence because I only wanted to show how predictable it is. That in no way implies it cannot achieve anything. Many things is simply a matter of taste as well: capitalization, use of spaces, seperated temp folder for each user, etc. If there's any inconsistency in your filesystem, it's most likely the software vendors you need to blame.
Mr Fiske knows nothing about evolution. The science of economy is nothing but speculation. As the article makes perfectly clear it is just speculation about human behaviour.  Worse is that the speculations in this case extend to  evolution. The speculative methods of economists should not be applied to evolution.
Revolt?  You first.
&gt; [warning: some might find this offensive] I find that tagline offensive!!!
&gt; The lowest economic classes have almost 2 to 3 times the number of children in the middle and upper classes. Now the psychology; why are they having more children? Because upper middle class childrearing is expensive. From the time spent with the child, to the cash spent on private schools, a middle class kid is an expensive proposition. And middle class folks, by virtue of their economic skills, are likely to be able to anticipate these costs, and plan their childbearing accordingly.
could not stop laughing
I like Kasparov's idea of combining computer programs with human play to create "cyborg chess", where a chess player's abilities are augmented by a computer that can search quickly but can't formulate strategies like a human.
I wouldn't go that far.  I would say they are well researched though.
What does this guy have against progressive rock?  Outside of Yes, he rags on just about every band worth mentioning in the entire genre.  (And he rags on Yes member Rick Wakeman's solo albums, but even Yes fans do that.) 
In case you were wondering, we are all trying to forget the nightmare of the dark ages, brought about by your "god," yet too lazy to renumber all our years in testament to that folly, ergo, "C.E." http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Antikythera_Device
I thought that was interesting too. Obviously, founding myths are going to be more resistant to change than the how-the-giraffe-got-its-spots myth, but 70,000 years is 3500 generations!
For the same reason it isn't legal to kill ignorant [redditors](http://reddit.com/info/t6wc/comments/ct72z).  Thank God for the downmod.  It's like a dagger.  Hmmmm.  So is the upmod.  Oh, I don't know. Just be nice you guys!
You need information to form an opinion? Are you sure you're on the right internet?
Just because it's on the books doesn't mean it's enforced. It's legal to shoot Scottsmen on sight in New York. Also 14th amendment pretty much makes such laws null and void.
Well, it will be no suprise until Palestinians start keeping to their word and stop thinking agreements are just for the Israelis to keep. No country in the world(Israel the least) will let its neighbors shell and launch rockets at it. No way in hell is Israel letting suicide bombers and weapons from Egypt flooding its territory and killing its people.
Right, this reminded me of the infamous [speed of art /speedo fart url](http://www.speedofart.com/)
&gt;It's not because of complexity. The rules of supply and demand aren't inherently more difficult to fathom than those that apply to, say, politics, or cooking, or sports. &gt;... &gt;In other words, to have an intuitive grasp of economics, you might just need to take a step or two up the evolutionary ladder. It would make a lot more sense -- to me at least -- if it were taught and treated like electronics, with circuit diagrams and 'components' that reflect the circulation of money.  I think this [individual](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/A.W._Phillips) had the right idea by using [hydraulics to model the workings of the British economy](http://www.cs.man.ac.uk/CCS/res/res12.htm#e).  ([diagram](http://www.cs.man.ac.uk/CCS/res/images/res12b.gif))
the point is, they cant win elections anymore, and they cant keep you from displaying a peace sign anymore. we're one step away from fornicating in the streets. (kick@ss!)
Perhaps.  Or perhaps it's 'cos the old one isn't filled with purple links. Also, I think the Javascript elements have been stripped. But ... if you flip between 'em quickly I think you'll find that the new one is da bomb.
"Never enough tabs in my browser ." Very nice, though I only recognize a few of these.  Can anyone name them?  Looking thorugh it, I can see Netscape, Google, Yahoo!, and Wikipedia.
Two wealthy sisters, both heiresses to their family’s cosmetics fortune, are given a wake-up call when a scandal and ensuing investigation strip them of their wealth.
&gt; From then on, it should just work. In the background ...
I'm pretty sure it takes 3 years accelerating and 3 years deaccelerating (with the destination as a reference point).  Also, anti-matter is created every day in large machines at research labs.  I guess that a spaceship making the intersolar journey would require a large amount of antimatter for fuel. The current known methods to create antimatter use partical accellerators and incredible amounts of electricity.  I speculate that space-based solar power plants will be necessary to manufacture the antimatter fuel.  Lifting the power plant machinery off the planet, into space, will be very expensive.  It won't be practical with rockets.  We need a space elevator. It seems to me that a space elevator is the next step in the progress of human expansion.  Once we can affordably lift machines into space, all kinds of space industry will develop.  This industry will lead to interstellar space travel and extrasolar colonies.  I doubt that Dr.Hawking will see such advances.  I hope he can at least visit space and experience it once.
Old.  We already know that you can substitute two candles for the "sensor bar".
FTA:"And no one smokes pot any more", well it's all clear now she misses her pothead buddies.
Major reason why developing countries are not able to produce new drugs:  1.No (singnificant) public funding for research. Universities do zero research.   2. Trained researchers migrate to developed world.  3. No public infrastructure for conducting research. In west, a lot of public money is spent on research that indirectly contributes to the drug development. Health research is probably the most inefficient sector, huge money spent on people / projects with no planned results. 800 Million figure seems highly inflated. Anyway lets say the Anti-aids medicine was sold at $2 per day to people here, profit margin to the company would easily be about $400 per patient per year. Divide 800 million by 400 and you get 2 million. That means you need 2 million patients to recover the cost of new drug development in just one year. Lets spread the recovery to about 3 years (10 years is standard in most infrastructure projects). You need less than 700 thousand patients to be able to recover the cost in 3 years. I think its clear pharma sector is quite greedy simply becasue they are so indispensible. And because Japanese and Koreans have not ventured in this sector. But every sector needs some japanese to revolutionise it. Like Japanese did to Auto, Koreans and Tiwanese to Electonics, Chinese to the Dolloar-store products. Indians have to the potential to do that to the Pharma sector. But there is no doubt that India has to implement the Patent rules to be at par with the world. But at the same time provide level playing field to companies like Cipla. Its probably not very easy. But then nothing else is.
For comparison, here's [a dozen or so solvers](http://www.haskell.org/haskellwiki/Sudoku) in Haskell, including one by Lennart Augustsson, author of one of the first Haskell compilers, and another by SPJ himself!
I suspect that he means he is the third owner of the vehicle.
I think the other upcoming F# book "F# for Scientists" deserves mentioning in the context of John Harrop:  http://cs.hubfs.net/forums/thread/801.aspx
Possibly. Or possibly there was a whole load of crap that happened to the *boy* before he lost it and ended up tasered, arrested and a social outcast.
[B3ta](http://www.b3ta.com/challenge/celibacy/) as ever are on the ball. NSFW in (most) places.
&gt; SpecTcl is a GUI builder for Tcl/*Tk* If it had been wxWidgets, it might have be interesting
Why must *every* Lisp-related discussion always end up in flames? Just what is the problem with the Lisp community that  simple feature requests and even the slightest criticism brings out such an enormous amount of bile? 
Written by a California attorney working in China.
Yes, exactly. Why do these people want to behave in public as though they're not disgusting? The only possible reason for that is if they're just foul people and enjoy pissing others off. It makes perfect sense.
examples abound and this is yet another of example of the the US and the UK supporting a war of terror. just as western sahara is annexed by morocco and its rich fishing grounds sold to europe no doubt west papua will be explouited for the benfit of the 1st world to the detriment of the planet. 
You're assuming that being born with high-IQ means you "merit" burying those born without alive.
I admit your sarcasm illuminates a very important point, namely that this is a very real person being made into a joke in a public forum.  Honestly though, please lighten up. Yes, this is juvenile humor.  Yes, juvenile humor can be reckless.  However, while I do not condone the making fun of a large portion of mankind based solely upon the arbitrary color of their skin, I do tend to make allowances for those few members whose names sound like "luscious pussy".
Apparently it's entirely invisible to you. Ask yourself this, fool: at what point does a bunch of stones become a pile of stones?
His parents were thinking: yummers! Or was that just me?
"NASA researchers at Johnson Space Center, Houston have found organic materials that formed in the most distant reaches of the early Solar System preserved in a unique meteorite. The study was performed on the Tagish Lake carbonaceous chondrite, a rare type of meteorite that is rich in organic (carbon-bearing) compounds." Joro  http://astore.amazon.co.uk/evolutiresear-21
http://blogs.msdn.com/dsyme/archive/2006/09/06/DraftChapter2.aspx wow, 2 will be coming out through APress. is F# really that great?
This video really makes you think twice...what goes around comes around!
Hey, you would like haskell - you don't have to declare variables.  You barely even have to specify your types, as the compiler infers them.  It also has good unicode support.  I wager given a week you'd at least grow to appreciate it as a superior language (yet perhaps not yet practical for web purposes).  Then again, if you've been programming procedural for 34 years, that's a giant paradigm leap.  Would probably take a few months. So, I suppose in that position PHP is a valid choice as favorite.
I'm currently writing a language (you could call it a runtime, I suppose) similar to this in haskell. Probably take a while though.  Getting a mutable parser set up, and ensuring a stable, able kernel language is difficult.
Actually, this is much worse than rape and murder because they'll get away with it. They'll even get fat bonuses because of it instead of what they truly deserve; bullets to the back of their heads.
I respect the sentiment in your statement, but I think it's a bit misplaced in this situation.  This ain't tiddlywinks, this is politics.  When the fathers of our country were creating the constitution they didn't do it by quiet and polite debate.
Wow, I wonder what kind of twisted fucking scumbags would downmod a simple condemnation of evil.
I'm not sure what you're trying to get at with your pile of stones thing.  To one man, a pile may be any stacking of stones.  Another might define a pile as any grouping of stones, stacked or not.  Another may have some arbitrary definition where a certain number of stones must be stacked together before it is a pile.  A final viewer may have no set definition at all and just choose by their feelings on the subject. I wasn't trying to imply that any of my Random's situations were okay.  I only wanted to point out that we have to draw the line somewhere.  Where each person thinks that is may vary, but the slippery slope argument Random used could turn on its head and claim that *any* leveraging of advantage over a weaker party is wrong.
Basically, the problems with php are due to some of the same reasons that you like php's developer community - non-academic community which doesn't care about language academics. Haskell, by the way, has the great combination of a pleasent and academic community.
Maybe she'll meet a rich lawyer.
NO ONE has a "definition" of a pile of stones. And no one has, or needs, a definition of a pile of evil, which is exactly what you were demanding. Slippery slope is a fine argument to use to expose people who don't care about children being exploited, about slavery, about murder or about anything else. You think these people don't exist but they do. Hopper is an example of such a sick fuck who just *doesn't care* unless someone forces him to. &gt; could turn on its head and claim that any leveraging of advantage over a weaker party is wrong. Do you know why you didn't produce a slippery slope argument instead of this handwaving crap about how "someone could" make such an argument? Because you can't make one. Because human rights theory regulates moral claims and no argument you could make would or ever could stand up to it.
&gt; descended to Uranus I thought it had been [renamed](http://www.gotfuturama.com/Multimedia/EpisodeSounds/1ACV08/11.mp3).
Really?  Would god really curse you with a drug addiction AND a small penis?  That's mean god.  That's mean.
funny how a game that is, as has been demonstrated many times by how relatively easily it can be solved in a decent language, basically trivial can be so popular.
Is it not true that we cannot experience God by science,Please provide me chance to submit my research to your web,which is in details  Maheshjani
That's exactly when I realized this whole article is garbage.
&gt; prisoners and ex-convicts are the only groups now legally disenfranchised. You forgot minors. What politician would actually try to change this?  It's not like their campaign could actually win any votes by saying that they are going to fix it - everybody who is in favour of it can't vote, which is the exact problem. 
Is it just me, or is the world topped off with hatred and fear lately? We should be able to go for quite a while on this tank, I should say...
Providing someone unauthorized access to copyrighted material is illegal under the DMCA.  If you look at the article, it gives links like "download 24 TV episodes" and other links in a similar vein.  It's linking to unauthorized copies (the normal word of choice is "pirated" but I disagree with the usage; I include it merely for clarification) of copyrighted material and therefore the links are illegal. *Edit for typos, clarity*
Please contact me for getting my scientific ideas in thewholeuniverse@yahoo.com  Maheshjani
&gt;You do know that he probably pronounces Lucious as 'loo shus' If so, it should be spelled Lucius.
Votre attention à tous...  C'est bientôt Noël, c'est pourquoi la société de production ANDETCETERA vous propose un grand concours de saison avec la participation de DAILYMOTION :  - Un thème : "Le Père Noël est une Quiche"   - Un but : Réalisez votre vidéo de 30 sec à 6 min sur ce thème et envoyez-là dans ce groupe AVANT LE 21 DECEMBRE   - LE cadeau : Un budget de 10 000 € pour réaliser votre mini-série  ALORS DAILYMOTIONNERS.... SORTEZ VOS CAMERAS/TELEPHONES/APPAREILS PHOTOS NUMERIQUES ET LACHEZ VOUS !!!!!
Universe created by strobe light; film at 11!
Cute how number 48 is 5 days old and still on the front page.
Spot on!
2 wrongs not being right and all that.
I should lighten up?  You are the one lecturing me for apparently making fun of your mock-worthy efforts: Wahh wahh let us tease Lickumthe PussysoMMMMMMdelish without it being turned around on us :`(`````
Agreed, let's file this one under stupid web tricks and mod down.
LOS ANGELES - Auto makers will roll into the Los Angeles Auto Show with a new lineup of concept cars powered by alternative fuels. But activists complain the companies are still moving too slowly to curb the nation’s dependence on foreign oil. General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and BMW AG will unveil vehicles that run on hydrogen. Other companies, including DaimlerChrysler AG and Volkswagen AG, will show vehicles powered by E85 ethanol, electric-gas hybrid engines, biodiesel, natural gas and low-sulfur diesel fuel.
No, you're assuming pica's analysis of the situation is what he/she thinks is moral rather than just true. The last paragraph of the post seems to indicate that pica would rather it was different.
I agree with what you say here, but it doesn't really address the flaw I pointed out in your argument. I must admit my analogy was not too good. What I tried to show is that if you're being treated well or badly when dealing with representatives of a company, you're well advised to generalize that knowledge to other parts of the company, with some exceptions. The reason is that there is a chain of responsibility that should have ensured that you got a good experience. To the people in this video and the kids in the water-bottle video, these soldiers are the public image of the US military.
I read it as Endo Fart too! hahaha...add this to the list of crappy website URLs.
The line is called intent.
&gt; Probably learned more in those few seconds than the parents ever bothered to teach about respect for authority. True, few parents teach their kids not to respect authority.
You would *type out* "situationSummary" instead of completing it? :)
If it's too academic, you can count me out. When it's too academic, it has no feet grounded in reality. The academic types that come into the workplace that I've interacted with have been almost useless. They would rather sit in meetings doing OOP for a year than to turn out code releases every two months. 
links were shorter then.
&gt; I love #20 Damn those short hares...
I think ive seen some of these movies... but these lines are classics!!!
Note:  the difference between such closures and Java's inner classes is that inner classes simply copy (on creation) the outer variables, instead of referencing them indirectly like closures do.  (They're the equivalent of Python's `lambda x=x: ...` hack, from before closures were added.)
LOL!!!
That's not an HTML file.  It's close enough to fool a browser's error handling into displaying stuff, but it doesn't conform to any HTML specification.
Har Har... Nice! That guy is such a pansy. Appletini.
Somebody tried those test allocator programs on a 64bit machine?
This is **really** testing my faith now!
I second "Deep C Secrets" and "C Interfaces &amp; Implementations". I would also add to this list "The Pragmatic Programmer" (which will cover more than just the C pitfalls but is very important) and perhaps "The Practice of Programming". Another more general book is "Programming Pearls". Finally it's likely the poster wants to do programming on some specific platform. If it's POSIX, then I cannot recommend "Advanced Programming in the UNIX Environment" by the late W Richard Stevens enough.
Stop it! My side hurts!
Google his name for the answer. :)
Agreed - it's not particularly well-formed HTML _or_ Haskell data (which is not to say about the code quality, since I haven't done much with Haskell); it just exploits some nuances of software to interlace the data. So while technically it works, and the idea is nominally interesting, it's not _that_ clever. But then again, maybe I'm just jaded from following the IOCCC for too many years. IMHO it's much more useful as a demonstration of Haskell as an elegant language than as an example of data magic :-)
I took a chance and looked at the pictures linked to in the google cache page. While there's no way in hell I'd let my daughters dress up or pose like that in glamour shots, I don't think those pics are any different from the child beauty pageant pictures and videos the MSM showed while covering the Jon Benet case.  Yes, the sexualization of children in our culture is big problem. It's epidemic. It's all over. Just go to the girls clothing section at any department store and see what's being sold nowadays. *shudder* But those pics are not porn.
Interesting... I wish I had the time to do a raytracer that's fully functional (in both the FP and feature-laden senses of the term). The performance is a bit slow IMHO, even for a naive trace with no spatial subdivision, but then again I don't know anything about doing optimization in F#.
I'd like to know how people consider workarounds/shortcuts: does it give more choices and thus more headaches or can definitely help?
I always knew that I was smarter than every woman I ever met!  Woohoo!  Now I have proof that I can show my girlfriend, sister, mom, etc!  Snarf!
Yet another corporation deciding they want to play nation-state. Passengers are customers, not prisoners. We PAY a LOT of money for those crappy seats and I'll kiss/read/draw/sleep/snore all I want, with whomever I want, thank you very much. Unless American explicitly states in a contract that all passengers sign before boarding rules of conduct on board the flightm then American has no authority to tell you what to do. Conduct should be one the same level as a public space, meaning you can't whip it out and do the dirty deed, but you sure as hell can kiss. Luckily I stopped flying American airlines many years ago.
chalk one up for the good guys?  This guy ripped off this lady for $43K? And there is SO much of this going on in New Orleans at the present, it's the Wild West :(
The impression I got was that he was feigning ignorance to put more emphasis on the data, which speaks much louder than the theory. As someone who doesn't know much about the fine details of evolution, your argument sounds very unconvincing.  I'm not saying it's wrong, it's just that I don't have a large archive of evolution 'case law' in my head to compare against.  You probably could have argued the complete opposite and I would not have noticed. On the other hand "we did lots of IQ tests and men had a much greater standard deviation than women" is easily understandable and doesn't rely on large bodies of data nor complex arguments. Hence more convincing for dullards like myself.
I was actually just crying at my desk. I love this kind of stuff...more of this on a friday!!
Hmmm...I was always under the impression that the reason Fords sell well in the UK is that they're relatively cheap. As far as reliability goes Ford are nothing to write home about.  They certainly don't score too well on the [Top Gear survey of owner satisfaction](http://www.topgear.com/content/features/stories/2005/11/stories/01/3.html).  In last year's, they came 25th out of 36 manufacturers whereas 5 of the top 6 were Japanese.   
You basically get a bootstrapping problem when you let people swear their oaths on different things depending on their religion, on what do you make them swear that it is really their religion if they don't feel bound by oaths on other people's holy books?
Offers international calling cards to make cheap long distance calls.
Is it possible, when tasering somebody in order to _separate_ him from somebody else, to taser that other person as well?  I've never been that good at physics, but common sense begs to at least consider such a possibility.
A responsive and efficient government with a terrible user interface.
They're not simulated:  it's more accurate to say that Haskell's primitives are flexible enough that the continuation implementation can be moved out of the core language and into a library. Stated another way, Haskell is not imperative:  it does not *have* any built-in, implicit call stack to expose as a first-class continuation.  Instead, said call stack is implemented as the continuation monad.  (This is in contrast to most imperative languages that already have continuations, but don't expose them.)
&gt;That being said, the recent events at Reddit have proven that we need an added layer of security to prevent people from ruining the experience for everyone else. No.
Usually I would agree with you, but I think Barney did come out of this one looking like the reasonable human being. I've never seen him before (Brit) but I was quite impressed.
great 
I like the newest layout better, but the old Reddit beats this one hands down in terms of content.  I suppose that's the price of becoming popular.
"Our passengers need to recognize that they are in an environment with all ages, backgrounds, creeds, and races. We have an obligation to make as many of them feel as comfortable as possible"  Yes, well, that's not what you were doing, was it? You were trying to make sure noone was offended. Well get this through you your head allready; People do NOT have the right not to be offended!
I wouldn't put people who don't even bother reading a contract for a several dozen or hundred thousand dollar purchase into the "smart people" category.
Genuinely impressed. Well beyond my photo ability, when I tried to take a pic in the duomo in Siena my flash went off accidentally (clumsy oaf), thankfully the guard blamed a nearby japanese tourist group. But I think I've worked out why a lot HDR pics bug me. It looks like an Unreal Tournament map. Now where's a good campsite?
&gt; The future decline in the dollar is due to its use as the petro exchange currency of choice. I never really understood why this should be the case.  Just because oil is traded in dollars, it doesn't mean that people have to hold on to them before or after the transaction. *  Buyer - Asset X &amp;rArr; Dollar &amp;rArr; Oil,  *  Seller - Oil &amp;rArr; Dollar &amp;rArr; Asset Y. The dollar is only held for an arbitrary small time period in the middle, so would not be expected to affect demand greatly.  Not affect demand relative to the trillion dollar reserve of the chinese government, that is.
This is yet another great example of how a good picture tells a thousand words.
The only US export product I use is adsense. Considering that visitors are not from US, will our adsense revenues fall?  
If the thought of crisp mountain air, fresh powder and breathtaking vistas isn’t enough to set your mind racing, the Volvo C30 concept by Heico Sportiv and Burton Snowboards will. Customized, sport tuned and outfitted for active lifestyles, this one-of-a-kind show car embodies the snowboarding spirit of living life to the fullest.
At least he seems to be really devoted...
I don't think captchas will solve the problem. I have proposed a different method for spam prevention based on targeting, social networks, and dominator trees here: http://targetyournews.com/ajax/TargetYourNews.html#cmd%3DMore%26link_id%3D656584 Not only would this reduce spam, but I believe it would yield better recommendations.
The blue sky, white beach and red doritos make for beautiful photographs.
Oh come now, people, don't be so trigger happy with the validator. The handful of errors are all venial: mostly missing `alt` or `type` attributes and orphaned `img`s. It took me less than a minute to fix them and now my edited copy gives me a beautiful green "This Page Is Valid HTML 4.01 Strict!" message. I think it's quite a nice proof of concept, and just a handful of errors shy of being The Right Thing. What gave you the idea that it's out to win points for clever magical hackery?
&gt;Details on how the Nazis planned to use the carrier in action have been lost to obscurity. I'm not nazi, but I bet they planned to use it to carry planes over water to fight enemy planes and bomb enemy territory.
Definition. Stat.
&gt; advocates separation of church and state.  ...instead of actually practising it.
We?
ok
Great idea for viral marketing.
OMFG! it looks VERY similar to today's reddit ¬¬ the next time I hear someone complaining about the actual reddit I'm gonna kill it! :P
Good points! My more simplistic comment was referring to this soldier's seemingly sophisticated take on the locals and the region in general - as opposed to the usual dumbass grunt view. And my belief that if more military and politicians were this savvy we wouldn't have allowed ourselves to become mired in this sandtrap. I've spent some time in Afghanistan, Iran and that part of the world and would like to see bought to justice, those ultimately responsible for the carnage and evil instigated against these people and the dishonor, disreputation and collateral damage bought upon us. That, of course, will never happen.
I know in Ireland, you can choose to 'affirm', rather than swear.  Word of honour.
LOL
All our audio books, podcasts and pdf's available for immediate download. Secret Strategies to sell Your house, Online Gaming Parents Guide, Mama Angies Cookbooks for the Holidays and much more
You've come a long way, baby.
Um... the US has a navy. And yeah, they are under our protection--so we'd definitely have the element of surprise.
Python:  `s.encode('rot13')` Har!
Nicht immer ist teuer erkaufte Suchmaschinenoptimierung auch das Geld wert, vor allem wenn Keys verwendet werden, nach denen kaum gesucht wird.
Because ... oh, never mind.
thanks SeanC! when someone tells me something bad that happened to them, i always say 'luxury' in that accent. friend:  'i wrecked my brand new car, broke both my arms and was arrested'  me: 'luxury'   :D
"Whoops"?
Is this transformation practical without tail-call optimization?
Given the example above (intelligence on X chromosome) we can only pass it to our daughters.
EdRoberts, another Republican apologist and closed-mind 'thinker'. I am not an American, and I hear people every day all over the world complaining about the Republicans and their blinkered policies. Sad? Yes, people who won't see in the land of the seeing are especially sad sir!
Yes, there are quite few Vim-using Lisp programmers. As an aside, I wonder why so many people complain about Emacs - it has menus and toolbars, the arrow keys work, and it even has a CUA mode if you really want Windows-style keybindings. I don't see why it's so different from other random visual editors, provided you don't dig into the stuff that actually makes Emacs special. Does anyone complain that Visual Studio is by far the best (only?) choice for C# programming?
&gt; Just because Guido misunderstood some academic literature and thought "ooh, lambda, fancy name" Actually, according to Guido: "Sometimes I've been too quick in accepting contributions, and later realized that it was a mistake. One example would be some of the functional programming features, such as lambda functions."  -- [1998](http://www.amk.ca/python/writing/gvr-interview.html) "Python acquired lambda, reduce(), filter() and map(), courtesy of (I believe) a Lisp hacker who missed them and submitted working patches.  But, \[...\] I think these features should be cut from Python 3000."   -- [2005](http://www.artima.com/weblogs/viewpost.jsp?thread=98196)
Cute snowman. Anyone got an idea what it's about?
Use -wall, plus a reasonably strict lint, plus ideally a "smarter" static analysis tool. Coverity is the market leader, but there is an interesting little open-source one called UNO from Bell Labs. It finds everything gcc -wall finds, and then some. And it's programmable, so you can use it to check your locking policies and such. Don't be tempted to do something your compiler warns you about. In 99.9% of the cases, your compiler knows best: just avoid those dangerous practices.
More talkative people or not more intelligent by rule. In some psychology books I read about introverts/extroverts and differences between them, they all mention the fact that despite common belief, introverts are often leaders, because they are better at contemplation and thinking about things, while extroverts get it out of their mouth and soon as it entered the mind. If you want a train/metro example, just count the number of times when two people are talking a lot (3 times more likely women) and they're actually SAYING something, i.e. have an intelligent conversation on topics like politics, environment, live, the universe and everything. Something that challenges the brain. I can't remember the last time I heard two women talking on public transport and it was beyond hair/date/hate boss/blah. Of course, it does maintain and train your social aptitude and social intelligence if you will. It doesn't make you a rocket scientist.
I think there are probably a few services the US exports to Europe, memberships on websites, webhosting,... Books are probably a factor too.
screenshots? sources?
I read endo-fart
Ah, there's nothing quite like Englishmen in drag.
The [Polystation](http://darkwatcher.psxfanatics.com/console/poly.htm) (a NES clone) is a popular Chinese import around here.  I've even seen a Polystation 2 once.
Actually, this is true. When I first arrived in Eastern Europe, I was ASTOUNDED by the women. You can't count to 10 without seeing a drop-dead gorgeous lady walk by wearing something straight out of Ultraviolet. One of the first things I noticed was that the men walking by never seemed to notice or care, except for the British stag parties. Now I hardly pay any notice myself.
[CLISP](http://clisp.cons.org/)
Bubble 2.0-- and I agree that there is a bit of one-- is not likely to pop as catastrophically as Bubble 1.0 for the following reasons: - Much less money per company has been invested this time around.  Bubble 2.0 is driven more by "pro-ams" and micro-startups. - People aren't trying to go public with no profit (or even no *revenue*) like they did in the late 90s.  That's a sure way to have a spectacular flame-out. - VCs and angels are at least a little bit smarter this time around.  The first question they ask is "so where's the business model" and they are less impressed by dot.com BS lines, "impressive teams," "first mover advantage," and other ethereal things. So like I said... I do think there's a *little bit* of a bubble in 2.0-land predicated on fallacies like "if you make something people want, you can usually monetize it."  But I think it's more likely to just deflate.  Psssssssssssssss...... 
Take my advice, or I'll spank you without pants.
but he doesn't even appear in the "daily top posters" ?!
...and about fifty characters!
Without their knowledge, millions of Americans and foreigners crossing U.S. borders in the past four years have been assigned scores generated by U.S. government computers rating the risk that the travelers are terrorists or criminals. The travelers are not allowed to see or directly challenge these risk assessments, which the government intends to keep on file for 40 years.
I take issue with the title. I nominate the Check Advance business as equally depraved and despicable.
&gt;The explanation is, as usual, evolutionary. It's becomming increasingly popular to come up with an evolutionary explanation for almost everything. These are easy to find and usually pretty convincing, but there is no evidence to support them. To prove a theory like this one would require huge studies and might not even be feasible.
Mr Gaidar’s daughter, Maria, said that her father had succumbed to “a poison unknown to civilian medicine”.
I'm up-modding this because I want more people to see what a bunch of very perverted people work at DOJ, people who are wasting tax payer's money on witch hunts like this. I agree 100% with mshiltonj. These pix are NOT porn. They are just pictures of beautiful young girls. So what? My daughters are both models. The eldest one, 7 years, recently modeled underwear on the catwalk along with about 12 other young girls aged from 4 to 14. Of course, here in Asia people have a realistic approach to sex and life. Pity American officials who obviously hate their bodies and envy others more beautiful than themselves.
&gt; The alternative is to simply have separate syntaxes for the two actions, an in Lisp/Scheme. I've always been curious why Python designers didn't take this route; it seems in line with their "explicit is better than implicit" mantra.
I believe that I'll be sticking with Windows XP for just a wee bit longer.
I don't know what the rules are like in the States (but from the look of things pretty lax) over here there are all kinds of legal bits in place to make sure people don't get pressured into taking loans they don't need. I know this because I'm IT manager for a company that offers home owner loans, I thought quite hard about taking the job but think I made the right decision. For instance over here if someone wants to take a loan we send them proof versions of all the paper work to read and are legal obliged to have no contact with them for seven days so they can read it and decide. They can't even sign those copies they are only for reading and understanding. At the end of the day people have to accept the blame for their decisions though. If someone takes out a loan secured on their home they should be sure they can pay it back.  But like I say the rules will be different in the States.
Thanks, Joseph!
The "Genome" book suggested that IQ was highly influenced by genes, as long as a child had a 'good' upbringing (i.e. not hungry, abused or deprived of education). In other words, nurture does have an effect, but mostly a bad effect when it is not provided.
It's really unsurprising that you can do this: An lhs document treats every line not starting with "&gt; " as a comment. Hence mixing Haskell and HTML is very easy, and this isn't new, it's been done many times before. Another form of literate Haskell treats everything outside of \begin{code} .. \end{code} as comments, which allows mixing Haskell code with LaTeX, which is very handy for getting nice documentation PDFs from your code.
&gt; People always talk about that smug Lisp community Oh shut *UP*!
Yeah...I mean how  dare they expect to earn money from their work!?
Two finger bones, when the marine punched him on the head.
You considering it spam doesn't make it so.
Steve where were you hiding that tongue?
This is more correctly titled "Adobe Acrobat/Reader" opens a critical hole in Internet Explorer. For most people who just need to read the odd pdf Foxit Reader would be a better alternative: http://www.foxitsoftware.com/pdf/rd_intro.php  Its smaller and much faster than the bloated Adobe product
Last time I checked most of Congress - including some Democrats - supported his "insane legislation". The Republicans didn't have enough of a majority to pass anything through the senate without some Democratic support - or did you forget the whole filibuster thing? Oh, and leave it to a democrat to accuse random people of being a republican without evidence. Last time I checked, politics wasn't a binary proposition.
Not a hack but a simple work around method. Useful stuff.
Can't they(FOX)write a script to redirect outgoing links to certain pages and prevent hotlinking?  Is that what the contributory negligence is about?
kewl article...
Single Matthias Süß, im Beruf Suchmaschinenoptimierer, will auf Platz 1 bei Google-Suche mit dem Suchbegriff "Single Regensburg" ... bewegt sich allerdings inzwischen um den Platz 20 mit dem Begriff "Single".
&gt; Perpetual motion machines have long been used to scam investors.  *Now* you tell me!
I've installed IE7 via Windows Update, plus [Multiple IE from TredoSoft](http://tredosoft.com/Multiple_IE) which provides an installer for versions 3 to 6 of IE. Note that the rendering engine in Firefox 2.0 hasn't changed from versions 1.0 and 1.5 so there is no need to test in multiple versions until Firefox 3.0 comes out.
I find the line "If you are content with working 35-40 hours a week..." a bit troubling, personally.  Is he implying that I should want to work 50-60 hours a week?  'cos I'm having a time making myself do 30 at my job.
That's my 20th birtfday! I agree, pretty special...
I like the fjords particularly.
buhaha... you may be right about that
mmm.... drug pillows
&gt;I've seen a lot of talk in the blogs about how a weaker dollar is somehow a symptom of a bad American economy. It actually could be the sign of an economy on the mend, undergoing a needed correction. Of course a weaker dollar is a sign of a weaker economy.  A weaker currency is only "good" in the sense that it may have some beneficial side effects, kind of like when you have the flu you might also lose weight. One of those beneficial side effects, and I'm surprised no one here has mentioned it, is to decrease the size of the American debt.  America has a peculiar habit of running up huge debts, typically by building weapons and fighting wars, and then de facto defaulting on those debts by devaluing the dollar.
On the internet, everyone is an economist!
I read that as &gt; Bizarre deep-sea creatures imagined off New Zealand at first
Don't you mean "dome" not "doom"? Nice shot, would like to return there myself. How did you hide your tripod from the guards?
It was first defined as a distinct condition in 1943 but researchers believe it existed long before that.
Ha ha, pointer, I get it.
I'm tempted to try this on a IBM Mainframe with awful amounts of memory, but I'm afraid my fellow co-users won't appreciate it that much :) My best guess is that it doesn't make any difference since you'll run out of memory much sooner than you'll run out of virtual address space. More interestingly: how much pages can you map into a 64bit v. address space until the kernel runs out of allocatable memory for storing all those page tables.
is there nothing the simpson's can't do?
Death to the fanatics!
this was on the front page last week
That guy's way too enthusiastic about "squirting" things with his Zune.
&gt; Really smart people, especially really smart programmers can be a pain to work with. Depends what you mean by "really smart". If you're referring to the bordering-on-autistic, "my entire self worth is defined by my code" type "smart" person, they can be a pain work with, typically because of obnoxious behaviour, an inferiority complex that makes them highly argumentative and an inability to consider their work and actions in a broader context (such as multiple people working on the same project). I'd argue that kind of person actually isn't smart, just obsessive. It's like [Nigel Short](http://www.chessgames.com/perl/chessplayer?pid=12181&amp;kpage=36), the 1 dimensional chess playing nerd/prodigy who's entire life since walking was chess vs. [Kasparov](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Garry_Kasparov) more of an all-rounder who retired from chess and went into [politics](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_Civil_Front).
I would use chile paste, too. I've only made it with cabbage. And it's been hit or miss. Does anyone know if the weather has anything to do with the success or failure of kimchi? Or is it all sterilization of the container?
&gt;Why would you want to join a big high tech company (Yahoo, Microsoft, eBay, HP, Oracle, or Cisco) when you can join a cool startup? How does an article with something as retarded as above make it to number 1?  Oh yeah, cause redditors are friggin numbskulls.
Perhaps [foldoc](http://foldoc.org/index.cgi?query=strongly+typed&amp;action=Search) has a clue?
Whoa!  I LIKE this article!!
Figuring out optimum parameters to build snowman's with Scheme? Well it's an idea... :)
Everything you could want to know about fermentation is here: http://www.fao.org/docrep/x0560e/x0560e00.htm#con
"As I became more circumspect, my friends found other friends who drank more, still smoked, and never looked at their watches."  Yeah, these are the kind of people I want to hang out with. What's cool in your late teens and early twenties is just pathetic in your thirties, or, god forbid, in your forties. I purposefully trimmed such people from my life a long time ago. My wife and I have a very active social live. We're regularly having friends over for dinner, taking day-trips or vacations with other couples, accepting invitations for all sorts of things from friends, and the like. We also have our own separate interests; I'll sometimes meet a friend for dinner without her, and she'll occasionally do the same. The idea the interests must match 100% is a recipe for misery. If she wants to stay home and read while I spend an afternoon at the rifle range, that's perfectly okay. These kind of things do require being proactive; you're not going to become a person other folks want to have around by watching "Seinfeld" re-runs.
Agreed.. By God, can't we do better than this? Both words are clearly not pronounced anything like that, and being barely literate, I can see that Pusey bears no relation to Pussy except in the mind of what, here in England, we would call a Knob.
Actually the link you supplied says &gt; Most jurisdictions in the United States have abolished the doctrine [of Contributory Negligence] altogether. INAL but I wouldn't think you could use that defence in this case anyway.  Would you expect a shoplifter to be able to claim 'contributory negligence' because the shopkeepeer didn't chain everything down? As far as I can see, contributory negligence is about being just that - negligent.  Failing to stop people stealing from you isn't negligent unless you virtually invite them to do it.   
&lt;sniff,sniff&gt; Yep, this smells just like the crap we stood up-to-the-waist-in back in 2001-2002. 
&gt; republitard Dear oh dear.
That's easily done. Just include a smell test ;-)
I'm tired of all of these HDR images.  It's like the lens flare filter on crack.
Good for you. This is no reason to downmod those who don't get it though.
Germany isn't US.
It's pretty much the same concept though: 1. Target low-income, fincncially desperate people who need quick cash. The less financially educated they are, the better. 2. Use complex, hard to understand financing systems and hide the true costs in legalese and fine print. 3. Use hidden fees and penalties to kick them when they're down. The only real difference between the method in the article and the Check Advance business is the scale.
Having a high IQ does NOT necessarily make you good with money. In fact there are many "High IQ'd" people walking around who can barely look after themselves.
Really fun overview, but you missed my favorite take-along chopsticks, from Snow Peak, makers of the titanium spork: http://www.snowpeak.com/gears/sct003.htm
Self-loathing.  Brainwashing by religion.  Peer pressure.  Take your pick.
I think the some weird conclusions are drawn in the article. For example it states: "Microsoft has had over two billion downloads of its malicious software removal tool in the last year, which tells us something about the overall size of the malicious software problem" In my knowledge that particular tool comes with windows update, so no wonder it has been downloaded so many times. It tells nothing of the malicious software problem.
Is optimistic memory allocation really that useful?  Who allocates more memory than they actually use?
im too pretty to do math  *LOL*
what's wrong with you (LouF)? and you Cookie? If I can kiss my partner in public, they can kiss theirs.  You (both) have a real problem.
&gt; Yet another corporation deciding they want to play nation-state. You're kidding right? If you don't believe that corporations *are* nation-states in their own right, you haven't been paying attention. Large corporations wield a ridiculous amount of power in the world today.
&gt;while I do not condone the making fun of a large portion of mankind based solely upon the arbitrary color of their skin, I do tend to make allowances for those few members whose names sound like "luscious pussy". What if we just make fun of a few members of mankind with different skin + eyes?  The name was no more chosen by the individual than race and illustrates nothing about whether the person, in justice, deserves mockery.
"Officer, there's a guy selling crack at the corner of the street." "Citizen, you're under arrest for drug dealing."
Metallica = Cavemen. Clearly.
**Bite the wax tadpole!**   For more see http://www.engrish.com
As a non-American, Olbermann describes an America I actually like! Ever time I watch his speeches (very well written, btw) I think, "Now that is an awesome ideal". Build a nation on the ideals of the Constitution, America, and I will be a booster, not a critic.  Oh, and the "Good Night and Good Luck" sign-off was particularly ironic.
This kid is a fucking thug. He deserved it.
&gt; Just go to the girls clothing section at any department store and see what's being sold nowadays. Forget that; just go to a mall and look at how the 12-year-old girls are dressed. We used to refer to them as prosti-tots.
I would say "Photoshopped" instead of "amazing"
D is a little bit [more integrated with HTML](http://www.digitalmars.com/d/html.html). It strips all tags *within* the code for example.
They help their own kind...
I wonder where are all the comments about this just being part of the normal working of a free market.
Choose a technically correct, open and best practice approach, but if there are multiple comparable options (which there mostly are) give a serious consideration to the people who will live with the solution, maintain and develop it.
I think he meant *Fox News*.
great story and great for Silver Spring
Then a *lot* of people are going to have to start being more accepting of other people.  Is that really too much to ask?
How would you know there is a different type of love that occurs between 2 guys named Doug or 2 girls named Monica? I can pretty much guarantee there isn't, being close friends with a few gay couples (who are married, I might add, and have been together for over 15 years).  I am saying that those two relationships are exactly the same.  What is the difference?
Wow, good quality stuff! That's why I read Reddit!
I don't agree. I think you could take say the top 100 banks and do a profile of each CEO, accompany it with several graphs like "birthplace by state" and "age" and "which university" and "religion", etc. As long as the data is *not* accompanied by conclusions like "teh jooz are controlling the banks and media!!!!!!" there wouldn't be a problem.
I hope you mean, "other people's work that they purchased."
Urgh. Try writing some threaded code without the GIL before you complain about it.  :)  It maintains more sanity than you may think. Besides, claims of the GIL's performance impact are greatly exaggerated: &gt; If you spawn new threads, even in C, they all still share the same GIL. They don't all have to lock it, though.  Threads that execute bytecode or C/Python API calls do, but the rest (threads doing I/O, C code, native library calls and so on) can release the GIL and can run concurrently. In other words, pretty much the only way for the GIL to become your bottleneck is to have multiple, interdependent threads doing heavy, non-I/O number-crunching in pure Python on a multi-core machine that is otherwise standing idle.  Not exactly your average application, but even then, there are several ways to circumvent the GIL: * If possible, delegate the critical parts of your processing to an extension like NumPy.  (Which should greatly speed things up anyway, compared to pure Python.)  * Otherwise, if feasible, use [Pyrex](http://www.cosc.canterbury.ac.nz/greg.ewing/python/Pyrex/) to compile the critical parts to pure C, while releasing the GIL.  (Should also greatly speed things up anyway.)  * Otherwise, if your OS has shared memory, use [POSH](http://poshmodule.sourceforge.net/) to share objects between processes.  (Still Python-level speed, but very little code modification.)  * If all else fails, restructure your application to use message passing.  (Something you have to do anyway if you ever want to scale beyond a single machine.)
You haven't met a lot of 11 year olds, some of them can be very physically capable.
An Orca, commonly known as a "killer whale", at San Diego's Sea World twice dragged its trainer underwater and attempted to pin him against the bottonm of the tank.
The dampening influence of the logarithm would be quite weak here though; it would be more of an educational rather than an elucidating measure rather than here to use it.
The guy got up and walked away after?
But she is so hot! [Sabine Ehrenfeld](http://sabineehrenfeld.tripod.com/)
Use these over-the-counter Chinese herbal formulas and you'll never get a cold or flu again. Cheap, easy, foolproof (NOT a sales pitch).
Lego should be sued, putting all those kids in that dangerous situation :p
Thank you Caboose263, well said!
I think it already looks much worse than RIAA
Being a Republican is as close to being a Nazi as you can get these days. And when idiots like Edroberts make excuses for these treasonist assholes in government. It makes every service man in women who died for the march of freedom roll over in their graves. It easier to be a complete clone and go along with our corrupt government, than to be an American and disagree with our bullshit foreighn and domestic policies. This country is filled with doublethink and speak, always making excuses for poor decision they made at the polls the last few elections. These are the same people who have never or would ever sacrifice their lives for anything greater than themselves. Who have never served this country. Only cowards would make excuses for the treasonous acts performed in this country.
Sometimes it takes less time to hop into vi into the server and fix something quick than to fire up an IDE, make a one-line change, build the project, redeploy it, and wait for the server to reload the context. It invariably bites me in the ass in the end, but it's still very, very tempting for small changes. Now, if IDEs loaded as fast as text editors and didn't have memory issues, I'd reconsider.  Then I could use them for quick fixes too instead of just sustained development.
lucious is certainly more like lucius than it is like luscious: http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/lucius  http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/luscious pusey is a fine last name and goes back quite a long way: http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/pusey  http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/pussy grow up, folks. really... this is near the top of reddit. unbelievable. http://babynamewizard.com/namevoyager/lnv0105.html look it up. lucious was a nearly as common spelling as lucius back in the late 19th century. you people make me sad. very sad. you're intelligent enough to use a computer but reveal yourselves as the shallow end of the wisdom pool.
You always use violence. I should've ordered glutinous rice chicken.
Linux has to be careful that it doesn't scare off otherwise honest (but still closed-source) software developers. If Linux wants some kudos in the desktop market, software developers need to know that their software can work on their system without huge deployment and configuration testing headaches. Currently the answer to these problems is, "make it open source!" I agree with this sentiment and was well happy when Sun finally open sourced Java. But Linux still needs to appeal to the companies who are still trying to make money the "old fashioned way" using closed-source and IP. There are a lot of business models in the IT world. Open source software developers seem to be restricted to only a few (software as a service, etc), which makes Linux either hard to make money out of (because of the open source business model thang) or really hard to deploy on. Linux needs to embrace the closed source world just enough that it doesn't risk becoming an isolated ideological island. Flash 9: Better late than never.
Pff, all I have to do to get around this is keep not having a social life now. How can you kill what's already dead?
Yes.
atleast they didn't got tazed.
If you have nothing to hide, what's the problem? Now, just shut the fuck up and do what your government tells you. What, are you communists or something?
When I hear something that I think is pretty ridiculous, I just ignore it. My blood pressure stays nice and constant. The author sounds very angry, like he's about to blow a gasket. That's just not healthy.
No, the math is wrong.  Plot 1/x and -x. They both have a negative slope (for positive x) but they certainly have different shapes. Now this graph is attempting to compensate for 1/x (the ratio being "upside-down") with -x (flipping the axis). Obviously, this will distort the shape of the graph, inviting invalid comparisons between the two traces. 
Attention all homphobes: Live your life with what ever beliefs and hangups you want, but at least have the decency to keep them to yourself and try and push them  on other people. You can think being gay is disgusting if you want but you don't need to in our face about it.
you've got to be pretty retarded to refinance on a no interest loan to a 9% loan.... and its not even a fixed rate. these people deserve what they get.
What I don't understand is how a family can have $1700 total monthly income. I mean, cmon, get a friggin job. If you have a US citizenship, you can easily make $5K a month alone. My friend - an international student (no greencard, no US passport, BS degree only) makes $75/hour. Americans just refuse to work for some reason.
If I cast off my friends when I get married because I suddenly decided to switch over to Old Fart Dinner Party Mode, well, then that would make me kind of pathetic.
I agree that it would be a silly use of a logarithm.  But it would make flipping the axis mathematically correct.  Better to invert the numbers instead.
Obligatory link: &gt; Nintendo has countered this behavior with a friendly and informative online [brochure](http://www.nintendo.com/consumer/wiiplay.jsp), whose bipartite wisdom can be expressed as &gt;- Hold On To The Controller, &gt;and &gt;- Do Not Let It Go, respectively. [Penny Arcade](http://www.penny-arcade.com/2006/11/29)
I've heard that LSD/mushrooms are also good for preventing migraine?
One of the Top Ten Coolest Toys in another reddit post, but needed it's own reddit entry, so I looked up the manufacturers website.
fantastic wikipedia article, thanks mr. davepage.
It appears as if Daniel missed some of the impact associated with this article. When he referenced the Best Buy Ad that only showed the 80GB iPod @ $349 vs the Zune @$249 with the iPod relegated to only 20% of the page and the Zune covering 60%. He forgot to mention that the Ad appeared a week before Thanksgiving the same week Apple announced the adding of 47 additional Best Buys that would be carrying the entire Apple product line. How's that for a spit in the face? On seeing the Ad and the Press Release I  e-mailed Phil Shiller to express my disgust with Apple's new Partner.
Well, if she's not physically capable of the job, then she shouldn't be in it.
Who was it who commented that rich and poor were equal before the law, because both would be put in prison for "living without visible means of support"? 
it's common because the church conquered and/or killed pretty much everyone around and instituted their common calendar. hint: the places where the calendar isn't 2006 are the places the romans didn't conquer and then spread their calendar to.
The lattest the better, the more chances [Gnash](http://www.gnu.org/software/gnash/) has.
&gt; just count the number of times when two people are talking a lot (3 times more likely women) and they're actually SAYING something, i.e. have an intelligent conversation on topics like politics, environment, live, the universe and everything. Something that challenges the brain. This is what I was commenting on.  There's an implicit assumption in many of these comments that "intelligent conversation" means politics, environment, life, the universe, or everything.  And if you define it that way, *of course* men are more intelligent - you've set the definition of intelligence to precisely those things that men, on average, care about more (read Deborah Tannen's *You Just Don't Understand* for more on this).  But that's victory by tautology. My point is that there's a whole different realm out there that is equally difficult - or moreso, for men - to master.  And that's the "micro world" of individual interactions.  You can't honestly say that this is less important than politics or the environment or the universe.  After all, you're far more likely to be thrown out in the cold by your wife than to have global warming bring on another ice age, and you're far more likely to be fired because your boss hates you than because your President hates you. As for challenging the brain - talk to a few girls and get to know them well enough that they treat you like just another one of the girls.  The gossip will make your head spin.  It's human nature to dismiss things that make our head spin as unimportant; women often feel the same way about politics, environment, life, the universe and everything.  That doesn't mean it's unchallenging or mundane - it means that *you've* chosen not to be challenged by it. (I should add that I'm speaking in generalities here - I know girls who absolutely hate smalltalk and gossip and would much rather talk about life, the universe, and everything.  But the article talks in terms of statistics, so I do too.)
I think what the author fails to realize is that you distance yourself from "cool people" and "friendly aquaintances" that you used to be relatively "close" to (read: used to binge drink and grey out all the time with) in exchange for one best friend that you choose to give your life to.  Conversely, If your truly close friends can't support you in what is probably going to be the biggest and most important relationship in your life, then those selfish pricks can go DIAF.
Sure! Incentive's what they're lacking! They live on the street because they like it so much!
I know, that's why there was the *Disclaimer* at the end
SPLUNGE! Back when I was in high school, my best friend and I had many of their sketches memorized. Python rocks.
Important safety tip: Don't use a refrigerator magnet to stick your grandfather to the refrigerator.
I gotta say this - or im going to explode. I AM SICK OF PEOPLE ASSUMING THAT GIRLS ONLY WANT PINK GADGETS! or that if they make it pink than girls will buy it! HEY! Marketing guys - guess what? my nintendo DS - white my digital camera - silver my ipod nano - white my phone - black   GET OFF THE PINK GADGET THING!
When people from other countries(like me) come to America and find conservatives et al, I ponder how come *Westen ideals* that we learnt in our textbooks (and how much we cherish them)and how this country was founded upon - are not being followed and respected by more than half of Americans. Please don't give me the "go back to your country then" response =)
Although no longer linked directly you can still get to http://reddit.com/top
That the average woman is smarter than the average man is a key take-away here.  I wonder if that remains true if you take away the ends of the spectrum. It would seem to go hand in hand with the research mentioned a couple weeks ago that good looking people "tend to have more girls" as an evolutionary trait as good looks are more of a reproductive advantage to women.
The guy is gonna sit for his exam on saturday but is in a fix whether to go with what the teacher says or believe in what the exam cd says. So hurry up and help him with your comments!
A clue not _the_ clue. The poster in the article is right, there is no common definition. The difference between static and dynamic typing is far more obvious for example. There was an article the other day that talked about safe typing, which I'd never heard of before in years of reading PL research, but you could guess what it meant straight away. In my personal experience I've only ever heard strong typing being used to grade static typing regimes with C normally assumed the lower bound (until reading the post that is). So to me calling Perl or Lisp strongly typed is similar to talk of square circles.
I know. Just wanted to point something out.
It's an interesting idea - controversial with egyptologists, to be sure, but it would solve the "how did they lift the blocks" question.
While it is without citation, you do realise that this perfectly explains the results reported in the main article? The samples were drawn from University students.  Assuming you lop of the bottom of the bell curve (say, everyone below 105 IQ), then a higher variability in male IQ will give exactly the found results - a higher average, and more very smart men.   
I can't think of a moment recently when Israel **haven't** been violating an UN agreement.
*applauds sarcasm* *hopes people's sarc-o-meter is working*
Not only that, I think that kid on the end is smoking!
&gt; Well, it will be no suprise until Palestinians start keeping to their word  If they were allowed to keep their own country, we would not be in this mess. If the USSR was to take over the US at the height of the cold war, it would be considered highly patriotic to fire missiles back at the occupiers. But like most stories involving Israel, most of the facts are glossed over.  
Just because it awakens latent attractions in you (and "a lot of people") that you'd rather have go away isn't my problem or anyone else's. It's yours. Is it really too much to ask that you consider the fact that you're not alone in the world?
I need that blender(page 4 of the article)!  There was a joke on I think the first episode of Home Improvement where Tim tells his wife that he has the only blender on the block that can puree a brick!  That has to be what inspired the guys at Hometec to make a blender that can turn 50 glass marbles into powder.
This is a excellent example of a professional soldier. His story is truely amazing and informative. I just wish all our politicians had this kind of character and integrity. We probably wouldn't be in this mess.
When I was in 5th grade I was in a classroom with a set of identical twins.  One was 'gifted an talented' and went to accelerated classes with me one day a week, the other had learning disabilities.  I don't know exactly what the deal was, probably a problem during their deliver that led to one of them having blood cut off long enough to cause some brain damage.  Anyway the 'nature vs. nurture' starts from the moment of conception and the two are hard to separate.   Nature vs. Nurture is not strictly a genetics vs. upbringing argument, but it should be.  That's a clear cut case.  If you don't start with good hardware as dictated by your genes, you're at a disadvantage for reaching the highest human potential.  And even with the best hardware in the world, if something goes wrong in your environment; missing a parent, stupid parents, falling on your head, getting the umbilical cord around your neck during delivery...  well it is all pretty obvious that both are important isn't it? Fastest car in the world is going nowhere without clean gas, good tires and a flat road.
Now you two stop kissing or I'm turning this plane around! Seriously, I'd have been sorely tempted to dare him to 'divert' the plane just to see what he did.  Sadly, in this day and age that 'diversion' probably would've been right to Gitmo...
Well, its december now, where are the details?
The guy right in front of him.
The USPS is the worst shipping service available!  Total incompetence on all fronts.
Great site for inflatable products. My experience was very pleasant.
I guess if you like .NET and you like OCaml (of which F# more or less is), it is great.
Wake up, Busheeple!
Oh noes!
How is linking to the "My Name is Earl" illegal?  Is Earl on DVD yet?  If not it was broadcast on public airwaves and is fair game until the company stands to lose money. If it is on DVD, it's not legal.
When I have the spare $399 I gotta get me one of those.  I've worn out so many cheep blenders over the years but anything that could do that.  Also fins the coke smoothe video, blend an unopened can of coke.
A taxonomy of typing systems:  http://eli.thegreenplace.net/2006/11/25/a-taxonomy-of-typing-systems/
Which movies are these for?
Reading the news doesn't make you smart, but smart people read the paper.
actually in this case it's more along the lines of: "officer, do you want to buy some crack?  there's a guy selling it at the corner of the street."
You can do that in the United States also.   I imagine that it was put in to accommodate Quakers, rather than atheists. President Richard Nixon chose to affirm, rather than to swear.   
Who can blame them, with a nuclear powered North Korea?  Nobody in their right mind would rely on the US for their defense in those circumstances.
looks delicious
